Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Number of Reviews
83

Author
Roger Gerbig
The Thumbs For Sale! review by Roger Gerbig
Believe it or not, these Thumbs! hitchhiked all the way from the sunny
Central Coast of California to Columbia, Tennessee (business trip)
to catch an opening night show of "Star Wars: Episode I - The
Phantom Menace." Sometimes you do what you have to do. After all, this
self-styled movie critic and his army of droids--er--interns is but
one of the legion of complete and total "Star Wars" fans who when all
else seems boring and mundane, turn to tracking small disturbances in
the Force like some turn to bickering about tiny variations in a day's
weather.
That's what I call an active lifestyle.
Fortunately though, I never let this obsession get the best of me.
I've remained cool, collected and placidly normal over the
years--never even once showing up to a job interview brandishing my
lightsaber.
In the sixteen odd years since the last installment, some things in
the "Star Wars" universe have changed, while others haven't. "Phantom
Menace" opens up roughly 30 years (or about the time it would take
George Lucas to crank out 5.45 "Star Wars" movies) before the original
trilogy. The tiny planet, Naboo--featuring what may be the first
viable ecosystem of any planet visited in the Lucas universe--is under
siege by the Trade Federation, which appears to be quite a sinister
Political Action Committee replete with deep pockets, an army of
droids, and leaders who have no noses. And judging by their near
complete inability to lip sync to their dialogue, the Viceroy and his
sidekick may just have been borrowed from the Japanese touring company
of "Star Wars on Ice."
Being that this is sort of a dicey situation, the Republic wastes no
time sending in a couple of Jedi Knights, Qui-Gon Jinn (Neeson) and
Obi-Wan Kenobi (McGregor), to negotiate a settlement of sorts. Of
course, things go a bit wrong and soon those lightsabers are pressed
into action. Then things get worse when the Trade Federation decides
to stray from the peaceful pasture of planetary orbit and stage a
full-blown invasion of Naboo.
All of which illustrates the first major problem I had with this
flick. You see, the Jedi are basically a couple MBAs (that's Mythical
Bad Asses in Thumbs! speak). Every line they utter (when not rehashing
"classics" from the first trilogy) drips with self-importance and
excessive knowledge of the way things are. And Lucas makes it
abundantly apparent that when it's a lightsaber vs. a legion, the
lightsaber reigns supreme. Sure, in the first 45 minutes alone they're
chased by battle droids, forced to stow away on enemy ships, nearly
stomped on by the Federation's war machine, hunted mercilessly by the
really big fish in the pond, and finally driven to flee to the far
corners of the galaxy. But there's never really any sense of danger
during any of this turmoil. They're just a couple of Jedi, caught in
an amazing universe of special effects.
The furious pace of plot and planet hopping are nearly guaranteed to
make you feel like you've embarked on an extended bus tour of the
universe. Sure, it's great to see the sights, but Lucas the driver
leaves you wondering if you'll ever get a chance to make a pit stop.
In fact, it's debatable whether or not this tour guide would ever stop
long enough at a roadside stand for you to buy some trinkets for the
folks back home.
The rather thin plot labors under being a setup piece for parts II and
III of this trilogy, and suffers from some ill-begotten cloning of
certain characteristics of "Return of the Jedi." When all the films
are completed, I can assure you that this one will be the least able
to stand on its own.
As our heroes rocket across the galaxy collecting cast members and
bumper stickers (Tattooine is for Lovers!), it suddenly occurred to me
how deficient the characters were--at least in comparison to those in
the first series. It's not bad acting, it's just the purely functional
nature of the dialogue. Apparently, as a species, humans aren't all
that funny (Han Solo being a notable exception). Just forget your
dream of having a career in stand-up comedy in the ring of clubs
dotting the edge of the Republic. Unless you've got floppy ears, fur,
or skin tones that lean toward the blue end of the spectrum, that is.
Which leads us to the requisite Jar Jar Binks paragraph. Every other
critic has one, so why can't I? For those of you doing time in Jabba's
dungeons, Mr. Binks is the klutzy amphibious alien dude entrusted with
96% of the humor present in the script. Already the most controversial
character in the "Star Wars" universe, I'll limit my critique to one
point: Upon occasion, someone really needs to come between Lucas and
his marketing "yes" men and casually mention that, "um...this ain't
necessarily funny."
Now, if we could just schedule him and a squad of Ewoks to engage in a
little Ultimate Fighting between themselves... There's a pay-per-view
event even I'd pay for.
While it's obvious that I have a few complaints, I will say your
entertainment dollar isn't wasted. Not only are the visuals
spectacular, but Lucasfilm had enough common sense to keep some of the
better ones out of the previews. And, if you missed subtlety the first
time around, as I did, rest assured. A second viewing does wonders for
the actors' performances. Portman's regal Queen Amidala makes a
plausible case against business casual dress in the workplace, and
Darth Maul's actually pretty evil despite his vaguely devilish good
looks and M.C. Hammer-inspired getup. Subtlety also befriends the
finer points of production design. These are fabulously-realized
worlds we're visiting here, though I still wish I could open the bus's
window!
Unfortunately, I'm completely incapable of lowering my expectations of
an event such as this, which didn't serve me well. "Phantom Menace"
just isn't a good enough movie to shatter said expectations. But it is
an event. It is entertaining. And it's got enough of those classic
holes in the plot (why wasn't Obi-Wan able to sense a certain dark
presence when he was standing less than five feet away?) to merit much
frivolous discussion over the next few years until the next
installment arrives.
And here's one perhaps all of you can help me out with: since main
Jedi characters tend to have hyphenated first names like "Obi-Wan" and
"Qui-Gon", why wasn't that other famous Jedi named something like
"Luke-Warm Skywalker?"
At any rate, a good show!

Author
Joe Gillis
Not since "Gone With The Wind" in 1939 has Hollywood (or America, or the world
for that matter) experienced the type of rabid anticipation surrounding a
single film as we've seen for the arrival of "Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom
Menace."  In case you've spent the last couple of years in a cave in Tibet,
this is the long-awaited first chapter of the new trilogy that will serve as
prologue to the events depicted in the first three "Star Wars" films, the last
of which was released in 1983. Although the film's distributor, 20th Century
Fox, has yet to go into serious overdrive promoting the film, the film's fans
as well as the news media (and those holding licenses for toys and other
merchandise spawned by the film) have been on a feeding frenzy of late, and
every day closer to the official scheduled opening date (May 19) we get, that
frenzy will grow, possibly in mathematical proportion to the approach of the
premiere.
The problem with any film that is hyped so much in advance is that it the more
the hype, the better the film must be in order to satisfy the audience's
expectations. In recent weeks we've seen the release of the film's exciting
second trailer, the formation of photogenic lines of fans outside theaters in
New York and Los Angeles that will play the film, the release of the first of
the zillions of toys that will be bought and sold from now until our  Democracy
falls, and the appearance on TV talk shows and in magazines of none other than
George Lucas himself to personally promote the film. All of this and more has
been brought into our homes by the news media, who have decided that the
arrival of "The Phantom Menace" qualifies as a MAJOR NEWS EVENT (whether or not
it finds the same place in the history of our civilization as the
Clinton/Lewinsky scandal or the Littleton shootings remains to be seen).
Anyway, there are now some serious questions to be answered:
Is "The Phantom Menace" the best film ever made? Not quite. "Citizen Kane,"
"Casablanca," and "The Godfather" will not be shaken from their well-earned
places atop the pillars of American film.
Is "The Phantom Menace" the best science fiction film ever made? No. "2001: A
Space Odyssey," "Forbidden Planet," and "Blade Runner" are still comfortably
ahead in my book.
Is "The Phantom Menace" the best "Star Wars" film ever made? It is certainly
the most ambitious. George Lucas has attempted to do more in this film than in
its three predecessors combined, and although he doesn't pull it off perfectly,
he does succeed in an entertaining and exciting manner.
The plot (and if you want to see the film "cold," then I suggest that you skip
the rest of this paragraph) concerns a blockade of the planet Naboo by the
Galactic Trade Federation. As two agents of the Imperial Senate arrive in Naboo
orbit to negotiate with the Federation Viceroy, the Federation is receiving
orders from the Dark Lord, Darth Sidious, to invade the planet. The Imperial
agents are Jedi Master Qui Gon Jinn, played by Liam Neeson, and his apprentice
Obi-Wan Kenobi, played by Ewan MacGregor. Their negotiations end before they
have a chance to start, and the two Jedi sneak on board a Federation ship in
order to make it down to the planet;'s surface. Once there, they encounter the
Gungan, a race of cartoonish creatures, who help them to find Queen Amidala
(Natalie Portman), ruler of the planet's human species. The Jedi help her to
escape her planet so that she can make her way to the Imperial Senate on the
planet Coruscant, where she can plead her case against the Federation. On the
way, her ship (which was damaged in an attack and saved by the droid R2D2)
stops on the remote world of Tatooine, where Jinn meets the young Anakin
Skywalker, a streetwise slave boy who is a crack pilot and a whiz at building
machines (among them a protocol droid named C3PO). Immediately, he senses that
the Force is strong in Skywalker, and that he may be The Chosen One, who is
destined to bring balance to the Force. Jinn wins the boy's freedom in a wager
involving a pod race (a dizzying sequence that plays out like a 1990's version
of the chariot race from "Ben Hur"), and takes him to Coruscant, but not before
the Queen's party is attacked by Darth Maul, apprentice to Darth Sidious.
Maul's mission is to stop the Queen at any cost. As the Queen pleads her case
before the Imperial Senate (which is undergoing a loss of confidence in its
leadership), Jinn brings young Skywalker before the Jedi Council, and asks Yoda
and the other members to allow him to train the boy. The action eventually
moves back to Naboo where Lucas culminates the film with four simultaneous
battle sequences that leave one gasping for breath.
Above all else, this is a very entertaining film. It moves at a very quick pace
(although sometimes scenes end when you think that they're just getting
interesting), but be warned: some younger viewers may be bored or confused by
the political intrigues and infighting that are essential parts of the plot.
The kids will love the droids and creatures, and of course, the action. Nothing
here lowers itself to the kiddie level the way the Ewoks did in "Return of the
Jedi," and adults should have no reason to cringe.
Lucas and company present things we've never seen before (or even imagined,
such as a neverending variety of droids and creatures), plus a few surprises
(an old Jedi mind trick doesn't work the way we expect it to, and the joke here
is why it doesn't work). After giving us tantalizing hints in the first three
films of what a Jedi Knight is capable of, we get to see two fully trained Jedi
in action here, and they are truly fearless and fearsome warriors.
But the most exciting thing here is the underlying story, a tale of masters and
apprentices. Qui Gon and Obi-Wan, Darth Sidious and Darth Maul, Obi-Wan and
Anakinwe see the way that the torch is passed from generation to generation in
both good and evil. In addition, the people and events of the film are doubly
interesting because we see everything on two levels: what happens in front of
us and what future events (i.e. those of the first trilogy) they will
influence. We know where some of these characters will be fifty years after
what we see in this film, and we know how they will have changed. When Senator
Palpatine engineers changes in the Imperial Senate, we are grimly aware of
where that path will lead him. When he says that he intends to keep an eye on
young Skywalker, we laugh nervously, because we know that they will eventually
become master and apprentice on the Dark Side. And when Anakin is told "You
bring hope to those who have none," by his mother, whose freedom from slavery
can't be won in a wager, it breaks our hearts, because we know that hope won't
be his to bring. That destiny will lie with his son.
Technically, the film is awesome. The computer generated characters and
locations (including the beautiful palaces of Naboo and the "Metropolis"-style
cities of the planet Coruscant) are truly state of the art, and the sound
(especially in the battle scenes) will shake you in your seat. If possible,
catch this film in a THX certified theater.
For more reviews, check out www.buttnakednews.com

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Liam Neeson; Ewan McGregor; Jake Lloyd; Natalie Portman; Ahmed
Best; Pernilla August; Ian McDiarmid; Ray Park; Samuel L. Jackson;
Oliver Ford Davies; Terence Stamp; Frank Oz; Kenny Baker; Anthony
Daniels
Director: George Lucas
Screenplay: George Lucas
In arguably the most anticipated movie this century, George Lucas has
achieved a very mixed reaction to a sure blockbuster. Despite the fact
the script and plot is a bit of a let down, the entire movie on the
whole can be considered a milestone in technical excellence, in the
sound and special effects department.
In terms of characters, by far the most outstanding and interesting is
Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman), whose mature performance far exceeds
her tender 14 years of age. She is one hot' babe who defines true
woman leadership'. She not only has a presence, but knows how to take
command of the situation and save her planet from ruination. No thanks
to the Jedi Knights who although led by the Force, lack leadership
qualities in terms of thinking up a plan to do anything.
The young Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) who has a bad hair day in every
scene, gets to kill a bad guy in the end, but lacks a love interest to
make him a desirable sort of hero. In fact all the Jedi Knight are a bit
asexual - there must be something about the Force which makes them all
hermits and loners. I mean it would be interesting to see Yoda's
girlfriend for a change, if he has one. Not much better is Qui-Gon Jinn
(Liam Neeson) who mostly broods, and has a better hair do than Obi-Wan,
but only to find the young Anakin Skywalker and make the biggest mistake
of his life.
Also fascinating is George Lucas Metoclorian' theory, which claims that
micro-organisms live within our cells and tie us to the fabric of the
universe. And it is the high concentrations of these organisms in an
individual which make them particularly powerful in the Force. More
humerous are the claims to the immaculate conception of Darth Vader, no
doubt a concept stolen from the Christian faith, except there will be no
Christmas to celebrate the birth of this dark emissary of the Force.
Overall an experience which is not to be missed because of the very fact
that it's predecessor almost command a viewing of this inferior
successor. By all means not the pinnacle of the Star Wars phenomena but
an adequate addition to the clan. Watch out for the next one, it should
be one steamy encounter between Queen Amidala and Anakin Skywalker - who
I believe should be portrayed by  Leonardo Di Caprio.

Author
Mr. Bryan Frankenseuss Theiss
Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom Menace
Why I love it, despite Jar Jar, and why it will be remembered
  I have a pretty vivid memory of being on the playground when I was in third
grade, either just before or just after Return of the Jedi came out. Some of
the older kids already knew the names of the characters from the movie, and
they were running around playing Return of the Jedi. Not with action figures,
but with themselves. "I'm Han Solo!" They fought over who got to be Salacious
Crum, Jabba's gremlin-like pet who I had yet to set my eyes upon. And as we ran
around the soccer field and through the geometrically arranged tires, we talked
about Star Wars movies and how there were supposed to be three others that took
place before Star Wars. "They're called 'prequels.'"
  I think we knew about them even before then, though. I remember a
neighborhood kid who prided himself on knowing these types of things when they
pertained to Star Wars. (He also liked to pee in ziploc bags and carry them
around with him, but that's irrelevant.) He had read many Star Wars novels,
which he thought were the movies yet to be made. He was fond of a book called
"Han Solo's Revenge" which he didn't seem to understand the title of. He
pointed at a piece of space debris on my sister's Empire Strikes Back t-shirt,
a part of some exploded space ship no doubt, and said, "That's a piece of Han
Solo's revenge." He thought "revenge" was the name of a machine, but he still
knew what a prequel was. 
  In recent years the anticipation grew as Lucas made it clear he was finally
making these things. I was in college when the Star Wars Special Editions came
out, and I must admit it was one of the happiest times of my life. As a
freshman living in a dorm for the first time, I had bonded with my roommates by
staying up all night talking about which Star Wars toys we had owned as
children. It seemed to be the universal connection between people our age, and
we watched the movies together in great excitement when they were re-released
on video in new THX editions. A few years later we were rescheduling our
classes and meetings so we could wait in line for the first shows of the
Special Editions. Now we had an excuse to write and think and talk about Star
Wars all day long. Being college students our favorite place to eat was Taco
Bell, which had now become Star Wars hype central. We could almost literally
eat Star Wars in addition to the sleeping and breathing and what not. 
  It is also important to note at this point that a) we traveled the city by
foot and by bus and b) Toys R Us was located directly across the street from
Taco Bell, i.e. within walking distance, and was stocked with many fine Star
Wars themed leisure products and accoutrements.
  In the school's computer center I read an Ain't It Cool News prequel rumor
about C-3PO being a computer generated mass of wires without his gold
sheathing. I thought it was a cool idea, if it was true, but it was time to
stay away from these rumors. I didn't want to know anything. But I could hold
myself off by re-living the old movies. This time around there were levels to
the movies I had never noticed before. Aspects I had never appreciated. They
were truly growing better with time, even while beginning to seem dated. 
  I have never been one of the hardcore Star Wars obsessives who knows the
names of every character who ever had an action figure, but the entire Star
Wars phenomenon has a strong connection to my heart, so the time of the Special
Editions was like a religious experience for me. And I just kept thinking,
"Man if it's like this now, imagine what it will be like when the prequels
come out."
  I bring up these personal details because being one of the most anticipated
movies of all time means bringing along a whole lot of baggage. Whether or not
you were part of that generation who grew up talking about Star Wars prequels,
you've certainly heard more than enough about them by now. Some people will
never be able to accept a new Star Wars movie after 16 years of waiting. Others
already wanted to hate the movie to prove they're above the hype, or the geeky
guys with the plastic light sabers, or whatever. No one, no matter how
eloquent, will be able to change your mind on The Phantom Menace. It's a movie
that, even more than others, cannot be reduced to a consumer report. But most
critics (many of them in a speeder bike chase, kessel run or pod race to be the
first to hate the new Star Wars movie) have urged people to stay away, making
The Phantom Menace out to be an abomination against cinema. And this after
several summers in a row of absolutely shitty summer blockbusters from Batman
Forever to Armageddon - movies lacking in imagination, common sense and even
style.  
   Although I'm sure these critics genuinely didn't like the movie, many of the
reviews seem more like cultural grandstanding than legitimate criticism. In
probably the most venomous review I've read, Anthony Lane of the New Yorker
admits that he can't call Episode 1 the disappointment of the decade because he
"had a sneaking suspicion it would turn out this way" - implying that he wanted
to enjoy it but it just wasn't good enough. This, though, only after saying
that Star Wars never was very good anyway, that its fans were "nerds" in the
'70s and are now "dweebs," and after blaming the movie for the de-humanization
of cinema, the military over-spending of the Reagan years, and (I swear to God)
the concept of "deathless wars" in Iraq, Kosovo, etc.
  But many who are less extreme than Lane also went in wanting to hate the
movie just because they're "sick of the hype." Unlike blockbuster films of
recent summers, The Phantom Menace did not require manufactured enthusiasm. The
demand for the film was so great that some grew tired of hearing about it
before most of the actual PR hype kicked in. Technically, it's an independent
film, an uncompromising vision without studio tampering or the soulless
anti-art gauntlet of test screenings and focus groups. Still, it's a
moneymaking machine, and every business in the world wants a piece. 
  I honestly believe that the excitement would have been nearly the same with
no advertisements, so when the Taco Bell-KFC-Pizza Hut-Pepsi onslaught began,
it was more than overkill. Meanwhile, every step of the way became a news
event. Both trailers were run uncut not only on Entertainment Tonight and MTV,
but on local news shows. Reporters covered the reactions to the trailer, the
web sites, the release of the toys, the predictions of economic loss due to
employees skipping work on May 19th. On one Seattle station I saw a feature on
what the Seattle Mariners think about Star Wars. 
  But then, when critics saw the movie and tore it apart, the story changed.
"Will it live up to the hype?" the news anchors asked innocently, apparently
not remembering who had interviewed a woman who painted her car like an X-wing,
or set up live cameras at the ticket lines, or started out half of their
reports saying things like, "Well, a lot of people are waiting for the new Star
Wars movie, but we're also waiting for a bit of sunshine this weekend. Harry?"
  So with so many significant pop cultural complications, it's hard to predict
how most people will feel about The Phantom Menace. But I don't think it really
matters -- I think it's a great film. It is probably more flawed than the
original trilogy due mainly to some inept comic relief. But what is good about
it is skin-crawlingly, adrenaline-pumpingly good. The story adds new levels to
the Star Wars mythology, the action scenes are thrilling, the costumes are some
of the best ever put on film, and the visual attention to detail is
unprecedented. I loved it on the first viewing and adored it the second. And
it's great after all these years to be awaiting the second installment, not
knowing what will happen.
  The film starts out brilliantly by illustrating exactly why Jedi Knights are
so revered. For all the talk about Jedi Knights in the original trilogy, Luke's
feats are a tiny plop in a puddle compared to those of young Obi-Wan Kenobi and
his mentor Qui-Gon Jinn (played by Liam Neeson, who I have finally stopped
thinking of as Darkman). The two are sent as ambassadors to the Chancellor, to
conduct negotiations and settle a tax dispute. They hear the sound of their
transport ship being destroyed, and without hesitation whip out their light
sabers. These Jedi oughta be called ambadassadors. They run through the ship,
slaughtering battle droids effortlessly and make a clean escape. At one point
Lucas plays with the icon-status of the light sabers, having the villains
terrified by the sight of Jedi through a cloud of smoke, just a pair of glowing
light sabers. 
  The two travel to the planet under siege, Naboo, to contact their Queen
Amidala. The queen (and her clutch of clone handmaidens) is played by Natalie
Portman, who has already achieved near-legend status as one of those rare child
stars who is respected by adults. I don't think it's too early to say that
Amidala is one of my favorite Star Wars characters. She is quiet and dignified,
but speaks boldly (and in a strange accent) when needed. Unlike the politicians
in our galaxy she tries to avoid putting her people at war, and when it seems
necessary she goes out and leads it herself, planning a three point attack and
storming her occupied palace with a pair of blasters. Her exquisitely designed
royal gowns (of which there are many) rival even the otherworldly beauty of the
blue skinned diva in The Fifth Element. She has an intimidating, regal
presence, comparable to Judi Dench's Oscar winning queen in Shakespeare in
Love. You truly feel like you are in the presence of royalty. 
  Amidala is a more serious and, I think, complicated character than Princess
Leia. My description makes her sound like Wonder Woman, but we also watch her
essentially doom the galaxy for years to come by putting her faith in
Palpatine. And it's interesting to see her surprise as she discovers that
despite all of her politics, some planets still practice slavery because "The
Republic doesn't exist out here." But I am confident that like Leia (her future
daughter), she will be adored and emulated by young girls who like to see
pretty heroines (and their clones) kick ass.
  Soon, of course, the heroes meet up with 9 year old Anakin Skywalker, the boy
who will become Darth Vader. Many have criticized the film for not showing a
seed of evil in the boy, foreshadowing his dark future. I disagree - I think
it's infinitely better to get the audience rooting for the kid, not only so
they can temporarily set aside the tragedy that awaits him, but also because
Darth Vader isn't a purely evil character anyway. After all, he is ultimately
redeemed in Return of the Jedi. So it is more appropriate, I think, to treat
him as a kid who says "Yippee!" a lot than as The Bad Seed.
  Other aspects of Anakin do tie in to his future. He is a master pod racer and
is able to fly a Naboo fighter  - this matches up with the original Star Wars,
where Luke is told that his father was a great pilot before he became a Jedi.
He is also a machine-building prodigy, having built his own pod racer and even
the protocol droid C-3PO. This, I think, is a fitting childhood preoccupation
for the villain who not only lords over enormous "technological nightmares"
like the Death Star, but virtually becomes a machine himself. There is even a
hint in John Williams' Anakin theme, which mourningly intones a few notes of
the unforgettable Imperial Death March.
  Anakin's best scene is probably the one where he barely speaks - the pod
race. A pod race is a dangerous flying drag race through the deserts of
Tatooine, and Anakin is the only human who has ever done it. The scene is as
riveting and full throttle as the speeder bike chase in Return of the Jedi.
It's kind of disturbing to see this little boy zipping through deadly terrain
in a vehicle that's sputtering and losing control and rapidly falling to pieces
- all so the Tatooine slavemasters can gamble with the Hutts. Lucas adds extra
seediness to the proceedings by revealing that Anakin's owner Watto forced him
to enter in previous races even though he doesn't think he's very good.
  I don't think there's even a single child spotted in the previous Star Wars
chapters (unless you count baby Ewoks) so it's surprising how well Anakin fits
the tone. There's an awkward scene where some of the neighborhood kids
(including a kid from Greedo's race) express skepticism about the boy's pod
racer, but for the most part the kids work. There have been criticisms of Jake
Lloyd's acting as Anakin. His performance, admittedly, is not perfect, and
Lucas doesn't help with the awkward editing into the should-be heartbreaking
scene where Anakin bids farewell to his enslaved mother. Lloyd may not be Anna
Paquin, but he hits the mark more often than not, and his boyish enthusiasm is
used humorously. I especially like the scene where Amidala, knowing that her
planet's fate may depend on Anakin winning a pod race, finds out from Anakin's
friend that the boy has never even *finished* a race, let alone won one. To
Amidala's horror, naďve little Anakin smiles, puts his arm around his friend
and boasts, "Kitster's right. I will this time."
  I think these types of moments are charming. I also like when he tells C-3PO,
who he's leaving behind in the slave quarters, that he'll "try" to get his mom
not to sell him. These things remind me of the priceless moment in E.T. when
Drew Barrymore says of the extra-terrestrial, "I don't like his feet." The
acting may not be as note perfect but these moments show a similar
understanding of the way children think. I'm glad that at this age Anakin isn't
talking about being a brave warrior or fighting for justice. Instead, he brags
that he gets to go on a star ship. This playfulness makes it more dramatic
later on when he realizes his purpose in life: to return to Tatooine and free
the slaves (a perfectly mythic subplot that I look forward to in Episode 2).
  While the heroes attempt to deal with the crisis on Naboo, we see the shady
dealings of a Sith lord named Darth Sidious, who is probably Senator Palpatine
in disguise, as he greatly resembles the hooded Emperor Palpatine of later
installments. Sidious dispatches his apprentice Darth Maul to assassinate the
Jedi. Maul has already become a pop culture icon just by appearing briefly in
the first Phantom Menace trailer. His simple look of primal evil - black cloak,
red and black face, crown of horns, demonic yellow eyes - has so captured the
fascination of fans that virtually every 12:01 showing on May 19th must have
had a guy dressed as him, toting a double bladed light saber. 
  After such a build up, some were disappointed that Maul turns out to be a
mysterious and briefly sighted presence in the movie. (But come on, man, it's
your own damn fault for building a cult around a character from a movie you
hadn't seen.) Maul's fanboy appeal is comparable to that of Boba Fett, who is
actually much less significant in the Star Wars saga, and has less screen time.
I think he's perfect. 
  At some point, I will be expected to choose one of three or four famous Star
Wars catch phrases and use it to attack the new movie. I'll go ahead and go
with, "There is a disturbance in the Force, and its name is Jar Jar Binks." Jar
Jar is a computer generated creature called a Gungan, an outcast from the
underwater kingdom on Naboo. He's also the comic relief character, and the
first character in the entire Star Wars saga that I can't stand. 
  I want to make one thing clear, before I attack Jar Jar: I am pro-Ewok. I
never knew until a few years ago that Return of the Jedi, and specifically the
Ewoks, were looked upon with disdain by many Star Wars fans. The Ewoks, goes
the argument, are cuddly little bears just thrown in to be cute and to attract
kids. Having watched the movie several times since learning of this school of
thought, I still can't find any way that it makes sense. The Ewoks are savage
little bastards who try to cook our heroes for dinner, and who stone, log and
rope stormtroopers to death in the climactic battle that culminates the
humanity-over-technology theme of the trilogy. The first time you see Ewoks,
they are creepy and irritable. They look more like rabid rats than teddy bears.
They're not half as cute as the Jawas, who as far as I know have never suffered
the "cute" criticism.
  And even if the Ewoks are adorably cute to some people, isn't that sort of
cool? Cute little teddy bears who eat human flesh? It's like saying the killer
dolls in Barbarella were just thrown in to appeal to kids who like dollies.
It's just plain wrong. Up with Ewoks, I say. 
  But there is an Ewok moment that I don't think is so hot: the one in the
middle of the battle where Wicket swings a rock around and hits himself in the
face with it. It's not a terrible joke, I can live with it, but it's
cartoonishly out of place. It kind of seems like it should be accompanied by
Three Stooges sound effects. Imagine a character that has none of the
rabid-rat-menace of the Ewoks, but swings rocks into his face repeatedly.
That's Jar Jar.
  Some people have called Jar Jar a racist stereotype - a rather ludicrous
description for a character that is more reminiscent of Slimer from the
Ghostbusters cartoon and Roger Rabbit than of any specific race, ethnicity or
nationality. I don't have a problem with his Gungan pidgin ("yousa thinks you
people gonna die?") which continues the Star Wars tradition of cultural detail
amongst aliens. I do have a problem with his voice, though, which is that same
annoying squeaky voice they used for Slimer, or for Punky Brewster's cartoon
sidekick Glomer. You know - the "funny" voice that Dave Coulier used on Full
House after he tired of his Popeye and Bullwinkle impressions. I want Jar Jar
to be a character I can take seriously on occasion, but he's not, because he
speaks in a voice that says, "I'm sure as hell not funny, but you know I'm
trying to be!" 
  If he were to speak in a lower voice he wouldn't be nearly as hard to take.
But even still, his purpose in the story so far seems to be to knock things
over, stick out his tongue and step in creature manure. His character doesn't
grow or evolve. He only helps people on accident. He doesn't show another side,
and worst of all he doesn't build a strong relationship with any of the other
characters - he just follows them around, but it seems like you're supposed to
assume they like him. If he returns in future installments it's going to be
hard to redeem him. Unless little Anakin first practices his long distance
strangling technique on the zany Gungan.
  But The Phantom Menace survives Jar Jar, because it's working on other levels
than just the wacky guy falling down. The plot is more complicated than
previous chapters, and although many have attacked it as a "kiddie movie" due
to the Jar Jar problem, it's hard for me imagine kids knowing what the hell is
going on. Even for reasonably intelligent adults like - I'd like to think - me,
it may take multiple viewings to keep up with all of the politics. How many
kiddie movies revolve around tax disputes, trade embargoes, votes of no
confidence? If this movie is for kids I wonder if tense senate hearings will
become the next big thing in PG rated movies, replacing the John Hughes
trademark of inept burglars who get pelted in the balls by Rube Goldberg-esque
booby traps.
  It wasn't until the Special Editions that I thought about the multiple
meanings of the title "Return of the Jedi." Growing up, I assumed it referred
to Luke's return to Tatooine. But now I think it refers both to the
resurrection of the concept of the Jedi and to the return of the Jedi Anakin
Skywalker, who has been buried inside the Sith lord Darth Vader until he
re-emerges in the climax. "The Phantom Menace" has multiple meanings as well.
Most obviously, it refers to the hooded Darth Sidious, who controls the
invasion of Naboo and the attacks on the Jedi without our heroes ever knowing
of his existence. Secondly, it refers to the invasion of Naboo itself, which on
the surface appears to be about taxes but is actually a front for removing the
Chancellor and replacing him with Palpatine. 
  With Anakin's boyish optimism and Jar Jar's wacky antics, the surface of the
movie is fairly light-hearted. But the menace lies underneath, because of our
knowledge of what is to come. This is a movie where the heroes put their faith
in something we know won't pan out the way they want it to. Roger Ebert has
said that Luke Skywalker is actually the chosen one who the Jedi are looking
for in Anakin. I prefer the more ominous theory that Anakin is indeed "the
chosen one, who will bring balance to the force," but that he will bring
balance by being the evil Darth Vader. The Jedi's evil counterparts the Sith
have been extinct for a millennium, so clearly the balance is leaning toward
the good side of the scale. I think Yoda and Mace Windu can sense that Anakin
is indeed the chosen one of their faith, but they don't want to face what that
means. 
  The film asks you to care about little Anakin, and it works. It wasn't until
the day after my first viewing that some of the irony hit me. At one point,
Darth Maul speeds toward Qui-Gon and Anakin on a sort of speeder bike. Qui-Gon
yells, "Anakin, drop!", saving the life of Darth Vader, the man who will help
conquer the galaxy and who will slay Qui-Gon's apprentice, Obi-Wan. While the
movie pretends to be a happy adventure about a boy and his Jedi buddies it
inches toward heartbreaking tragedy.
  And still, it's a hell of an adventure. The genuinely thrilling climax jumps
smoothly between the Queen's siege of her own palace, a huge battle between
Gungans and battle droids, Darth Maul taking on Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan in a light
saber duel, and Anakin's "accidental" attack on a space station. (I put
"accidental" in quotes because although Anakin doesn't destroy the control ship
intentionally, I suspect the Force is working through him to achieve its own
goals.)
  The light saber fight is the best in the Star Wars saga so far, containing
more nimble choreography than previous entries. Maul, played by the stuntman
Ray Park, works in a number of flips and martial arts kicks (things that were
stiffly hinted at as Jedi skills in The Empire Strikes Back) and takes on two
Jedi at once. One of my favorite moments in the film is when a series of
energy-walls separates the three combatants, so they immediately turn off their
light sabers and wait. Qui-Gon patiently meditates while Maul paces back and
forth, his eyes satanically glued to his enemy. In all of the depictions of raw
evil in Lucas' films, none has ever approached the pure hatred in this man's
eyes.
  For fans of the series, The Phantom Menace is loaded with precious touches.
We get to see the time when Jedi were plentiful, so much so that they had a
council led by Yoda and Samuel L. Jackson. We see cameos by rowdy sand people,
Wookie senators, even Jabba's girlfriend. But most of all, we get to explore
new planets and learn new details of the old ones, like the workings of the
Tatooine slave trade. I didn't like Jar Jar, as I mentioned, but another
computer-generated character, Watto, is more successful. He's a little, snouted
guy with humming bird wings (the first flying character in the Star Wars
universe?) who trades junk and makes Anakin work in his shop. He's a slimy
character who is never redeemed, but when he loses Anakin in a bet he looks
kind of sad, and you almost feel sorry for him. I often think it's this extra
dimension - like the mourning Rancor owner in Return of the Jedi - that makes
me love the Star Wars universe, and make it seem like a real place.
  There are other touches that weaken that real place feeling, though. Some of
the character designs seem a little out of place. There's a two headed
commentator at the pod races who talks just like a human sports announcer and
whose faces look kind of like characters from Antz. It damages the
slice-of-alien-life illusion that I loved so much in the cantina scene and in
Jabba's palace.
  But for the most part the illusion is there, and in far more visual detail
than ever before. Lucas has truly taken computer-generated imagery to the
logical next level, painting entire worlds with it, not just inserting a
monster here or there. Though I believe The Phantom Menace will be remembered
fondly for the same reasons as the other Star Wars movies, it will be most
notable historically as the movie that raised the stakes for digital visual
effects by about fifteen or twenty notches.
  Acclaiming the special effects in a movie usually sounds like faint praise,
and with a Star Wars movie it pretty much goes without saying. But I don't
think people are acknowledging the kind of unprecedented visual spectacle we're
dealing with here, where the vast majority of shots combine live action
elements with computer animation, matte paintings and miniature models. It's so
elaborate and non-stop that it becomes its own seamless reality. In the
original trilogy you might think okay, these are real actors on a real set, but
this next shot coming up - that's stop motion. The Phantom Menace visuals are
so elaborate that there's no room for that. There are stretches where, as far
as I know, nothing you're seeing on screen is real, but you don't think of it
as Toy Story, you think of it as a real desert with real podracers flying
through it. I'll be damned if I can figure out what's a computer image, what's
a model and what's just a pile of dirt.
  The phenomenal detail of The Fifth Element seems lazy compared to what goes
on in The Phantom Menace. I believe this will have a major effect on summer
event movies where the main gimmick is the visual effects. How can you make a
movie like Godzilla after everyone has seen this? "Hey, look at this - a
computer animated monster. Can you believe this? Pay me money." The Phantom
Menace has a sequence early on, one of the weaker ones in fact, that has three
computer-generated giant fish with headlights shining on them in the darkness
of water. All of them are far more impressive than the giant iguanaman in
Godzilla, which had nothing else to offer. In The Phantom Menace, they're a
forgettable throwaway, not the main event.
  Will this force the purveyors of big genre movies to put some more elbow
grease into their special effects? Or will it make them say, "Fuck it, I can't
deal with it, I'm doing something smaller"? I don't know. But I don't think it
can be ignored. Lots of people mourn the dominance of big budget effects movies
and prefer smaller, earthbound, character driven movies. Movies that take place
in the real world, or that leave things to the imagination. And obviously there
will always be a place for those. But Lucas is dealing in fantasy films, in
documenting worlds that don't exist and making them seem like they do. Since at
least the summer of 1990, when the T-1000 morphed into liquid metal, filmmakers
have been talking about how computer technology will narrow the gap between
what you can imagine and what you can put on screen. The Phantom Menace has
proven that theory. For some filmmakers this will be liberating, for others it
might be frightening. Because what if we can see into their imagination and
there's nothing there? What if all they can think of is a big iguanaman?
  Lucas gives us more than an iguanaman. Lots, lots, lots, lots, lots more. He
has given me a chance to see my 2 year-old nephew holding a plastic light
saber, not really knowing what it is, saying, "I'm going to rescue Grandma."
He's made me remember what it is that I felt in that drive-in so many years
ago, seeing Star Wars as a child. And at the same time he's made me realize
what the adults of the time - the ones who were turned on by Star Wars, anyway
- might have felt, and how they might have questioned the future of popular
entertainment in light of what they've just witnessed. I suspect The Phantom
Menace is the beginning of more than just the Star Wars saga. But I guess I'll
have to wait until the next episode to find out for sure.
"I write rhymes so fresh I try to bite my own verses." --Tash

Author
A. Estey
Review of Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Written and Directed by: George Lucas
Rating: **1/2 out of ****
        Perhaps the only thing I find more disturbing about the fact
that I had to give such a disappointing rating to the first episode of
Star Wars, is the fact that part of me feels overly generous about it.
I mean, I'm talking about Star Wars, the film series that has
transcended the boundaries of the silver screen and infused itself as
part of our social consciousness. Everyone who is alive and actually
interacts with the rest of society knows the story of Star Wars; and
they know who all the characters are; and they know at least a handful
of quotes from the film. Even if they've never seen the movie. 
        So I find myself in a rather frustrated position when I have
to sit down and announce that this film simply isn't as great as it's
predecessors, because the reality is: it isn't.
        The story opens as two Jedi knights: Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam
Neeson) and  Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) set out to diffuse a
potentially hostile situation dealing with unfair taxation levied
against the small planet of Naboo by the Federation. Unfortunately,
for all those involved, the hostile situation changes from potentially
to authentically, and the Jedis have to rescue the Queen of Naboo
(Natalie Portman) before she is taken prisoner. Eventually they all
leave Naboo to find Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd).
        Also, on the surface of Naboo, the Jedis meet up with Jar Jar
Binks (Ahmed Best), an amphibious creature who thereafter becomes a
central character. Now if I were forced to point out one reason why I
had such distaste for this film, well it's Jar Jar Binks. In all
honesty, this character should have been completely written out of the
picture. His brand of intellectually deprived humour is so unbearably
annoying, that I'm still in shock that Lucas thought it was a good
idea to include him in the cast. The pain of having to watch this
character is roughly equivalent to someone screeching their
fingernails endlessly on a chalkboard hooked up to a guitar amplifier
turned up to 10. If the mindless banter provided by C3P0 even slightly
annoyed you in the previous films, prepare to be squirming in your
seat and squinting in pain as you endure the cinematic catastrophe
that is Jar Jar Binks. After enough exposure to this character, I was
lamenting the fact that the concession stand didn't sell painkillers
to help ease my Jar Jar viewing experience.
        This illustrates another fundamental problem of Episode One:
the tone of the picture is far too light-hearted. Not for one minute
did I feel that any of these characters were in any real danger (with
the exception of the Jedi duel towards the end of the picture, but
I'll discuss that later). There are also no characters which challenge
what's being presented to them, they just sort of go from point A to
point B as if their lives are a scripted movie (and although there's a
pretty cool sense of irony about that, it's not a good thing). In the
previous three films, Han Solo was the character whose motivations
were, to a certain extent, guided by personal interest. He also
perfectly counterbalanced the juvenile antics of C3PO. None of that is
present in this picture.
        However, it would also be a mistake to argue that there is
nothing in Episode One which deserves commendation. Of course, the
special effects are breathtaking, and the scenes which focus on the
Jedis are especially interesting. If the film had only decided to
examine more of the lives of the Jedis and brought more screen time to
the antagonist Darth Maul (Ray Park); Episode One could have easily
been the greatest entry into the series. The lightsaber fight between
Obi-Wan Kenobi, Qui-Gon Jinn and Darth Maul is absolutely incredible
and managed to alleviate a lot of the boredom I felt from earlier
parts in the film.
        I really wanted to love this picture. Personally speaking, I
love the Star Wars trilogy - not in the quasi-insane "I'll camp out
for eight weeks to get tickets for a movie that will be in theatres
for eight months" way, but I do think they're really great movies.
What Lucas has produced with The Phantom Menace unfortunately
resembles a two-hour cartoon rather than an epic tale of good and
evil. I hope that future Star Wars films will be an improvement over
this one.
Reviewed by: A. Estey
Copyright 1999, by A. Estey (gbv_adam@hotmail.com)

Author
Long Che Chan
Star Wars, Episode I  The Phantom Menace
directed by George Lucas
starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Jake Lloyd, Natalie Portman, Samuel
L. Jackson, Frank Oz
Rated PG (sci-fi action and violence)
I wish I could say that there is something more to the new Star Wars
installment than what you see in the commercials, but there isn't.
George Lucas is an expert at crafting triumphant, special effects-bound
flicks and he has done it again.  This is the first Star Wars film I've
seen on the big screen, so, of course, the impact was much greater than
when I watched the three original episodes on video.  What is compelling
about The Phantom Menace is not its disposable story, but its amazing
visuals.
Basically, the film's plot is centered around trade disputes between two
planets.  Qui-Gon (Liam Neeson) and his young apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi
(Ewan McGregor) set out with the animated Jar-Jar Binks to fix the mess
that may result in war. When their ship breaks down and they are
stranded, they find a young boy, Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) and his
slave mother.  Qui-Gon strongly believes that Anakin is destined for
Jedi greatness and immediately takes him under his wing.  Anakin
participates in a heart-pounding Podrace, one of the highlights of the
film, to get the equipment needed to fix Qui-Gon's ship. However, most
everyone is doubtful about entrusting the future to some unknown slave
boy.  Meanwhile, Queen Amadala (Natalie Portman) is frustrated and at
wit's end, being naďve and young and having so much responsibility on
her shoulders.
There are hardly any emotional scenes in the film- even when we discover
that Anakin will be leaving his slave mother behind to begin Jedi
training, the frenzied excitement of the whole film wears down the
poignancy to the size of a crumb.  This does not prove that The Phantom
Menace is poorly made for it is brilliantly made.  In all the Star Wars
films, human emotions that we, the audience, can identify with are
usually nil, but the films are for pure enjoyment, not for uplifting
purposes.  Despite the fun of watching the movie, The Phantom Menace is
not without flaws.  For starters, we have the ill-conceived, moronic
character Jar-Jar Binks who should be considered a threat to Star Wars
galactic society and to the audience.  What a klutz!  George Lucas
clumsily tried to create a fun character that would be as memorable as,
say, Yoda, R2-D2, or C3-PO, but, alas, his efforts were in vain.
Secondly (this may be good or bad, depending on your point of view), the
movie's atmosphere is so different from the familiar comic-book feel of
the previous three Star Wars installments.  This is due, perhaps, to the
utter complexity to this movie's plot and the higher level of
sophistication of the visual effects used here.  The movie seems to be
reaching for epic proportions.
I can't say much about the acting, though acting has never been what you
saw Star Wars movies for anyway.  However, there is absolutely no
pizzazz to the performances- they are straightforward and, at times,
stale.  Natalie Portman has a great presence, but her turn as Queen
Amadala makes the queen a stoic, unfeeling enigma.  There is nothing we
can hold onto in her performance to make us believe the trade
predicament is anything of importance.  Jake Lloyd is the only actor
here who has an ounce of evident spunk.
Despite the inevitable faults, there is so much to enjoy about the
movie.  The heightened excitement of the final sequences doesn't quite
surpass the famous The Empire Strikes Back climactic scenes, but they
are amazing and edge-of-your-seat fun in their own rite.  The film is a
treasure to look at.  The visual effects are astonishing 99.8% of the
time- the awe-inspiring, mouth-opening, eye-popping sight of the
underwater city is nothing short of production design and special
effects genius.  Not since 1997's The Fifth Element has there been a
film as drenched in visual treats as this one.  The production design is
reminiscent of The Fifth Element, the previous Star Wars movies,
Kubrick's 2001, maybe even of Fritz Lang's classic silent Metropolis.
However, all the sets are so original.  The original Star Wars movies
can't even match the grandeur of this film's visuals and that is a sheer
pleasure for the viewer- it gives us hope of even greater things for the
upcoming episode.
The costumes are remarkable and have Jean-Paul Gaultier written all over
them.  Whether its Queen Amadala's gigantic wardrobe complete with
gold-embroidery and feathers, or the Jedis' simple brown uniforms, the
costume designer has fused talent with outrageousness.  The costumes are
one of the true delights of watching the movie.
As for John Williams' score, I don't think he's done one as complex or
powerful since I can't even remember.  It is as epic as his Schindler's
List score and as thrilling and zestful as Jaws.  It includes the bare
bones of his music from the previous three films, but Williams has added
on, made the music much more intense and moving.
What with the overwhelming hoopla that circled this movie, one might
come in with high expectations and be disappointed.  There is very
little to hate in the film: it's a very accomplished and skillfully made
flick.  It is the best "fun" film and the best big-budget film out
today, most definitely.

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
We waited out in the rain at the 34th and Lexington movie theater.
There were umbrellas up and rainslickers worn, but no lightsabres, no
one dressed as Chewbacca.  This was the 8:30PM show, and I suspect the
folks who would have come that way were going to the Ziegfeld at
midnight.  The line started to form at about 6PM, though it didn't get
serious until after 7PM.  The smartest man on line had gotten there a
bit earlier, and was sitting in a portable chair underneath the movie
theater's marquee, out of the rain.  We were in the first dozen feet of
the bunched together line, half the group in the rain, half out of it.
We did have a box of Krispy Kremes, so we were reasonably prepared.  I
have to admit -- sheepishly -- I took a bit of organizer's prerogative
and ducked out for half an hour to have a burrito dinner at Blockheads
out of the rain.
I think "Star Wars" was the first movie I saw in a movie theater.  I
guess I was seven.  This was the old RKO Keith's in Flushing, now a
burned out shell after a real estate development dispute.  A pity: it
was a landmark, decked out in a Beaux Arts style.  There's, of course,
great affection for the saga, though I realize that there's a certain
cheesiness to it all, that Harrison Ford doesn't figure out how to act
until about halfway through "Empire", and so on.  The momentum of the
movie carries all such deficits away, making them irrelevant.  It's
part of our secular mythology.
The new movie does well, and is not a godawful Godzilla-sized
disappointment, which is what some of the worst reviews make it out to
be.  Not as fun as "Star Wars", not as dark and somberly open-ended as
"Empire", but not as stupidly goofy and Ewok-ridden as "Jedi", it's
more an introduction, the first step on a path to Anakin's Greek
tragedy two films away.  Despite the cluttered plot and the slow wait
for things to get moving, it's not bad.  We see new vistas and familiar
characters in different settings; since this movie cannot be seen
outside of context, there is a purposeful, barely perceptible cloud of
doom hanging over some of these first meetings.  The action, once it
gets going in the second half, is fantastic, culminating in the
lightsabre duel between Darth Maul and the two Jedi.
It's a worthy beginning, but it could have been better.  As noted,
things took a while to get moving.  In "Star Wars", before we settle
into the story, there was a fantastic first punch of action with the
boarding of Leia's ship.  No such luck here -- the pacing failed for me
-- though we do have a fascinating view of what fully trained Jedi in
their prime can do, how much of a One Man Army they are.  Yes, it's
just like the computer game.
Darth Maul had too little to do.  We understand that he's bad, but he
doesn't do more than be the apprentice of a greater power, and
participate in the climatic sabre duel.  Vader, at least, had more to
do in the first film, and especially in the second.  His casual evil is
demonstrated in action, not simply signified in bad-ass black garb.
That the whole conflict was sparked by some sort of trade dispute is
somewhat silly.  I think it's Lucas's attempt to create a relatively
inconsequential reason for the Federation to go to war against Naboo:
mercantile issues shouldn't motivate combatants with thoroughgoing
passions in the way nationalistic fervor, the will to power or the
fight for freedom might.  At the end of the movie, the Federation's
leaders can be carted off for trial and the stripping of their trade
privileges, leaving the status quo ante relatively intact but the
insidious motivator still hidden.  My problem with this sequence of
events is that the trade dispute turned massively bloody.  It is far
too pat an ending.  I'm sure someone could have come up with a more
credible conflict to get things rolling.
I disagree with Lucas's attempt to give a pseudo-scientific explanation
for the Force.  It's deeply lame, deeply distracting: you think they're
basically mispronouncing "mitochondria", which is a real symbiotic
bacteria found in multicellular life.  This attempt robs the Force of
its mysticism, undermining the long-elaborated theme from the previous
films of spirit triumphing over machine.  Better for the Jedi to feel a
great stirring in the Force when around Anakin than to take a blood
sample.  I'd be thrilled silly if the following two movies never bring
up this point again.  By the way, I'm not touching Anakin's immaculate
conception with a ten-foot pole.
The fight choreography of the lightsabre duel between Darth Maul and
the Jedi is spectacular, far more dynamic or energetic than the duels
between Luke and Vader, or the somewhat stiffly geriatric duel between
Vader and Kenobi.  I suspect this is due partially to better effects
technology: a guy doesn't have to sit there and hand paint all the
glowing sabres frame by frame, because a computer can do this,
following the arc of a fast moving sabre more effectively.  Perhaps
more importantly, the fight choreography of martial arts films has
become more mainstream than it was in the Seventies and early
Eighties.  We expect flashy aggressiveness and balletic spins in this
sort of combat.  Anything bordering on stiff and clumsy is deemed
insufficient.
Interestingly, while the wonderful dynamics of the sabre combat exists
when the Jedi face Darth Maul, but it's not quite there when the Jedi
hack their way through hordes of battle droids.  Partially, this is
intentional: the droids pose no serious challenge to Jedi.  A more
compelling argument is that the actors have nothing to react to when
they're supposed to be facing the droids, whereas Darth Maul is
physically there in the form of Ray Park wielding a prop sword.  I
remember at least two instances where Ewan McGregor twirls and swing
the sabre casually into a droid.  There seemed to be no force, no
urgency in the action.  Well, there was nothing there to act against.
No wonder, then, that Liam Neeson wants to quit movie acting; no wonder
McGregor found the filming a chore: they spent a great deal of time
interacting with CGI characters.  This can't be fun for an actor,
spending weeks in front of a blue screen, talking to things that aren't
there.  Such is the result of technical change over the past decade.
Perhaps an intriguing analogy may be made with the introduction of
sound in film.  Silent film actors who were adept at the exaggerated
facial expressions and gestures of that type of film had a difficult
time adjusting.  What we may see in coming years is a cadre of actors
well-suited to the blue screen for one reason or another.  Consider,
though, Ebert's statement about an upcoming golden age of visual style
at http://www.suntimes.com/output/ebert1/clear18f.html.
I suppose we'll have to see what happens in the subsequent films.
Clearly, Anakin, as an apprentice Jedi, will attempt to free the slaves
on Tatoonie, and perhaps his passion to save his mother will be his
undoing, the tragic flaw through which he becomes Vader.  Hopefully,
Obi-Wan will be less stiff and constipated, with more screen time.
We'll just have to see, but I think it's a good start.

Author
Christian Pyle
I had the good fortune to be eight years old in 1977 when "Star Wars" appeared
at the recently-constructed two-screen theater in Danville, Kentucky.  I
vividly recall how the destruction of the Death Star seemed the most
spectacular thing I had ever seen.  I saw the movie several times and
accumulated an impressive collection of action figures which has long since
disappeared with my lost youth.  I remember reading in "Dynamite!" that George
Lucas planned for "Star Wars" to be the fourth part of a nine-movie series: 
three trilogies, the next to be set fifty years before "Star Wars," the third
fifty years after.
Twenty-two years later, Lucas has lowered his expectations to six movies and
has finally released "episode one" of the saga.  By its very nature, "The
Phantom Menace" will probably disappoint a lot of moviegoers:  it's the first
chapter of a serial, so it only hints at the conflicts to come.  We shouldn't
be surprised; after all, we've already seen the second half of the serial and
know how it all comes out.
After seeing "The Phantom Menace", I shoved the fourth, fifth, and sixth
episodes into the VCR and reflected on what a tall task Lucas had set for
himself in making "episode one."  There's no Empire and no Rebellion; all of
that will come later, out of the events set in motion in this chapter. 
Instead, "Phantom" concerns a smaller conflict as the Trade Federation, spurred
on by "the phantom menace" of a Dark Lord of the Sith, creates a blockade
around the peace-loving planet of Naboo.  The Republic, also a peace-loving
bunch, dispatches two Jedi knights to settle the conflict.
Enter Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan
McGregor).  Within a few minutes, the two Jedis are being chased by the bad
guys, befriending the Naboo queen Amidala (Natalie Portman), and taking on a
comedy sidekick, Jar Jar Binks (a computer-generated character voiced by Ahmed
Best).  Escaping from Naboo, they take refuge on the desert planet of Tatooine.
 While hunting for parts for their ship, Qui-Gon discovers a slave boy, Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), who seems to have a powerful connection to the Force. 
Anakin, we learn, was a virgin birth (prediction:  the Christian Coalition will
not be happy about this), and Qui-Gon becomes convinced that Anakin is the
prophesied Chosen One who will bring balance to the Force.  (This is a puzzling
turn-of-events-Darth Vader is the Jedi Messiah?  But I suppose by being both
the champion of the Dark Side and the father of Luke and Leia, who eventually
defeat the Dark Side, he did bring balance.  Or maybe Qui-Gon was just wrong.)
Meanwhile sinister forces are brewing.  The Dark Lord Darth Sidious sends his
apprentice, Darth Maul (body of Ray Park, voice of Peter Serafinowicz -- it's
strange they paid somebody to do the voice; Maul's dialogue is limited to "Yes,
master") after Qui-Gon.  Naboo's Senator Palpatine (Ian McDiarmid), who will
become the evil Emperor Luke faces in "Return of the Jedi," uses the conflict
to begin his rise to power.  (The movie hints heavily that Palpatine is Sidious
without actually revealing it even though it hardly seems surprising since we
know that Palpatine is Darth Vader's master).
Along the way, we find some old friends:  R2-D2 and C-3PO (played as always by
Kenny Baker and Anthony Daniels), Jabba the Hut, and Yoda (voiced as always by
Frank Oz).  As required there are several big battle sequences and a climactic
light-saber duel.  John Williams provides a score with many familiar themes.
There are a lot of reasons to dislike "Phantom Menace."  First and foremost,
there's Jar Jar Binks, who seems to be universally hated by fans and critics
alike.  He is a slapstick oaf who speaks in a pidgin English usually reserved
for native sidekicks in old adventure movies (you'll also discover that the
Trade Federation leaders sound exactly like Japanese officers in WWII movies
and that Tatooine junk dealer Waddo sound like an Arab with a head cold).  Jar
Jar even brings with him manure and fart jokes, which seem out of place in the
"Star Wars" saga.
Also, many of the most interesting characters, especially Darth Maul and
Obi-Wan, are underdeveloped.  Lucas seems more concerned with creating
impressive computer-generated aliens and landscapes than in dealing with the
human characters.  He should remember where this all started.  The special
effects of the original "Star Wars" are, by contemporary standards, cheap and
cheesy, but that movie has pleased audiences for twenty years.  Special effects
are a means, not an end.  There's a huge battle sequence between Jar Jar's
people and a legion of battle-droids that generates little interest -- no
character we know except Jar Jar is involved, so we don't care who wins.
And the movie's most impressive "special effect" doesn't come from Industrial
Light and Magic.  It's McGregor's Alec Guinness imitation, which is entirely
convincing.  When he was cast in the role, my first reaction was "Obi-Wan the
young heroin addict?" and my second was "how  the heck can he pull off the
illusion that his Obi-Wan will grow up to be the old Ben we know and love?"  He
did a great job; I only wish his part was bigger.
Despite the film's weak points, I still enjoyed "Phantom Menace."  The primary
reason is that Anakin appeals to the nine-year-old in all of us.  He gets to
pilot a starfighter in battle with R2-D2; that's all I wanted when I was nine.
To enjoy "Phantom," you have to view it as "Episode One" -- it's the first
chapter in a six-chapter serial.  The goal of the first episode is to set the
central conflicts in motion and to get you to come back for the second episode.
 I can't wait.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
It's hard to effectively rate a movie like The Phantom Menace.  If you
compare it to its previous three films, it comes up a bit short.  If the
first three films were never made, viewers would likely be as floored as
they were when the first Star Wars film was released over twenty years
ago.  Was I disappointed?  A little.  Am I going to see it again?  Yes.
Two more times?  Probably.
Taking place about forty years before the beginning trilogy (Star Wars,
The Empire Strikes Back and Return of the Jedi), Menace shares only a
few characters familiar with audiences.  Yoda (voiced by Frank Oz) is
back and appears to have less ear hair.  A much younger Obi-Wan Kenobi
(Ewan McGregor, Trainspotting) plays a limited role, but promises to be
a much bigger force in the next two installments, due in 2002 and 2005.
But, most importantly, a very young innocent named Anakin Skywalker
(Jake Lloyd, Jingle All the Way)  soon to become the enigmatic Darth
Vader, as well as the father of Luke and Leia  is discovered by Jedi
Master Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson, Les Miserables).
Menace seems like more of a set piece for Episodes Two and Three of
George Lucas' current trilogy.  This is the first film Lucas has
directed since the first Star Wars film  and it shows.  Acting and
story take a back seat to the special effects, which are nothing short
of goddamned unbelievable.  The script offers too many flat one-liners
and jokes geared to pre-school-aged kids.  And don't get me started on
the Muppets and computer-generated characters.  The worst is Jar Jar
Binks, a horrible Roger Rabbit knock-off that is immediately hated by
anyone without either a diaper or a pocket-protector.  (2:11  PG for
violence and the possible implication that Qui-Gon banged Anakin's slave
mother, Shmi)

Author
Jonathan Richards
     Say this for George Lucas: he still knows how to dazzle us
visually.  The hardware, the architecture -- there's plenty of eye
candy in this retro opening episode of the Star Wars franchise.
There's very little for the heart, and nothing for the brain.
Lucas's imagination fails him when it comes to spaceoid critters; he
seems to have cut a devil's pact with Toys R Us.  If the Gungan Jar
Jar Binks doesn't get on your nerves pretty quickly, you're probably
under twelve.  And for all the 20 years of computerized advance in
special effects, there's no moment to tingle the skin like that first
"Star Wars" jump into hyperspace.  The pod race here is exciting, but
it feels like a video game.
The ground is dutifully laid for the next episode with the anti-
Christ Anikin Skywalker (9-year-old Jake Lloyd), born of a virgin, and
destined to father the twins Luke and Leia and then turn to the dark
side as Darth Vader.  Yoda and the Jedi council have misgivings about
him, and right they are.  But he's successfully championed by Jedi
Knight Qui-Gon Jinn, effectively played by Liam Neeson.  Ewan McGregor
as his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobe is good at anticipating the great
Alec Guinness, but he gets a bit too emotional for a Jedi.  Natalie
Portman is Queen Amidala, and she's convincingly regal but not much
fun.  Nobody's much fun -- there's no cocky Han Solo, no feisty
Princess Leia, no doofus macho innocent Luke Skywalker.
In "Star Wars", Lucas created a futuristic "American Graffiti"
with jalopy jockeys and teen-age types he understood.  Now that he's
become Joseph Campbell, he's sunk beneath the weight of his own
significance, and been seduced by the trivial side of the Force.

Author
Christopher Meadows
A film review by Christopher E. Meadows
Copyright 1999 Christopher E. Meadows
Written and Directed by George Lucas
Produced by George Lucas (Executive) and Rick McCallum
Starring: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, etc
(The first part of this review will be spoiler-free; if you haven't
yet seen the movie, feel free to read it.  There will be a spoiler
warning and pagebreak at the end of the safe zone.)
I have only vague recollections of seeing _Star Wars_ when it first
came out.  I was only four years old at the time, and all I remember
is that I found the Jawas really scary.
Articles and even books can be and have been written on what _Star
Wars_ was and is and did for our culture.  On the face of it, it's
such a simple thing--it took elements from mythoi as old as humanity
itself and blended them together into an epic saga.  Critics have
attacked it for this very simplicity, calling it a predigested
mishmash of old stories that are much better in their original form
. . . and yet, are not _all_ stories taken from earlier inspirations?
Regardless of what one thinks of the trilogy now, or what Lucas has
done with it since, there can be no denying that when the original
_Star Wars_ movie came out, it burst like a bombshell into young
minds, and fired the imaginations of a generation.  Who in his late
twenties or early thirties now can hear that opening fanfare, see
those famous words in blue appear on the screen, and not still feel
that stirring deep inside?  All right, I'll grant that some of you
might, but I'll bet you're in the minority.
Now, George Lucas is hoping to pull it off again for the youth of
today's generation.  Can he?  Well . . . I doubt it.  Not for lack of
trying on his part--_Phantom Menace_ is a spectacular movie, and if
you were to transpose it chronologically into the place of the
original _Star Wars_, I have little doubt that audiences would respond
just as well.  But the atmosphere is different now.
In 1977, _Star Wars_ signalled the end of what had been a ten or
twenty year drought in big science fiction movies, and did it in a
rather eye-popping way.  There hadn't been a story quite like _Star
Wars_ in a very long time--or ever, by some definitions.  Not only was
it science fiction, it was a science fiction _action_ movie; a movie
that didn't just invent new worlds and technologies but _took them for
granted_.  While the audience is oohing and ahhing appreciatively at
the Millenium Falcon, Luke says, "What a piece of junk!"  It spawned a
variety of imitators . . . even to this very day.  And there's the
problem.
Sadly, if you show a kid of today the original _Star Wars_ trilogy, or
even the _Star Wars Special Edition_, the odds are good he'll shrug
and reply, "So?" and perhaps even make disparaging remarks about the
films' special effects.  The eighties and nineties have been, by and
large, the biggest decades for cinematic science fiction since the
horror movie era.  Perhaps even bigger.  Searching on "Genre: Sci-Fi"
in the Internet Movie Database shows, at the time of this review's
writing, 2,404 titles, and at a glance, most of these titles seem to
be post-1977.  Not having grown up in those days of little-SF-then-
Star Wars, they simply don't see it as anything special.  Unless
they're _big_ science fiction fans, no matter how much they might like
it, it's "just another science fiction movie."  And so, I suspect,
might _The Phantom Menace_ also be.
I couldn't help but be amused by the contrast in opinions between a
co-worker of mine and a person I happened to be standing next to in
the movie line today.  My co-worker was saying that _Star Wars_ should
be for kids, and was complaining about all the adults who were
snapping up tickets.  This moviegoer, on the other hand, was saying
that the first showing should be just for people who were old enough
to see the original, and that anyone younger than that shouldn't be
allowed in.  Both of these people were being at least reasonably
facetious in their opinions, of course, but it struck me as amusing
and at the same time poignant--this new movie, _The Phantom Menace_,
might have been _meant_ for the youth of today . . . but I suspect
that, in large part, only those people who grew up on the original
_Star Wars_ will truly appreciate it.  George Lucas might have made it
for the physically-young, but it will let those of us who are older
relive our youth again--if only for a glorious two hours and fifteen
minutes.
And now we come to the movie itself.  A comment posted to the Slashdot
news-for-nerds website pretty effectively sums it up--"as good as we'd
expected, but not as good as we'd hoped."  The movie had action,
adventure, special effects, and science-fiction settings in plenitude,
and yet somehow it didn't quite manage to live up to the hype.  This
should come as no surprise; it is doubtful that even the original Star
Wars could have lived up to this degree of hype, much less The Phantom
Menace.
But the big question is, is it worth the money?  If you ever liked any
_Star Wars_ at all . . . undeniably.  If not . . . well, it's still a
fairly good SF/action flick.
If you have not yet seen the movie and wish to remain unspoiled, read
no further.  Mark this post unread, save it to a file and come back to
it later, or otherwise wait for it.  Don't spoil yourself.  If you
read further, on your own head be it.
Like former _Star Wars_ films, _The Phantom Menace_ is action-packed
from the very beginning.  It starts with the two Jedi, Qui-Gon and
Obi-Wan, arriving at a Trade Federation battleship to negotiate for
the end of the trade blockade on Naboo.  The Trade Federation
representatives, under instruction from a shadowy cloaked figure we
know and love from the later movies, try to kill them, and fail.  They
escape to Naboo, meet a friendly (albeit overcutified) alien, Jar Jar
Binks, and go on to find a way through the "planet core" to the human
Naboo settlement to warn them of an impending invasion.  They arrive
too late, however, and the rest of the film revolves around their
quest to get Queen Amidala of the Naboo to Coruscant to plead for her
people before the Senate, then to return to the planet to save it.
Along the way, they pick up young Anakin Skywalker on Tatooine, who
proceeds to save the day several times (which is sure to infuriate
those people who dislike Wesley Crusher and his ilk).  We also meet
such worthies as R2-D2 (who saves the day once or twice himself) and
the "naked" C-3PO (who was put together by super-prodigy Anakin to
help his mother around the house), and of course Senator Palpatine,
Naboo's senator, who uses the crisis on Naboo to become the Senate's
new High Chancellor and, as those of us who've seen _Star Wars_ IV-VI
already know, is also the mysterious figure in the cloak; he turns out
to be a Sith Lord to boot.
"Always there are two," Yoda says, "no more, no less.  A master and
his apprentice."  The shadowy master (whom we know to be Palpatine),
dispatches Darth Maul, his apprentice, to find and deal with the Jedi
and the Naboo Queen.  And deal he does, though he barely has five
minutes of screen time and most of that is the climactic lightsaber
duel with Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan.  In the end, though there are
sacrifices made, the Trade Federation is defeated, and peace and
goodness reign once more . . . though as we older fans know, this will
not last for very long.  In fact, it is fairly easy to tell that
_Phantom Menace_ is meant primarily as build-up, a prelude to the
second movie that will, like _The Empire Strikes Back_, tell a darker
story.   
Where to begin?  The movie was very much a _Star Wars_ film.  There
was a new world, Naboo, an older world we'd not yet visited directly,
Coruscant, and an old familiar place which will, I suspect, pass into
and out of the _Star Wars_ limelight a number of times in this trilogy
as well as the next--that being Tatooine.  There were new races, new
monsters ("There's always a bigger fish"), new characters, and new
ships.  The technical aspects of the film were, by and large,
flawless.  If the story and the acting fell a little flat . . . well,
these things can be forgiven.
It was good to see _familiar_ places and races and people again, too,
to see how the Jedi lived in their heyday.  A number of questions were
answered, and others posed.  As a friend put it, "The sourcebook [for
the _Star Wars_ roleplaying game] for this one is going to be
amazing."  It's hard to say just when it really hit me--this _is_ a
_Star Wars_ film.  When you fully realize that, when you feel it deep
inside of you . . . you just sit back and enjoy the ride.
The fight choreography was stunning.  From the very beginning, when
Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan mow through combat droids as though smashing
pinatas, it's apparent.  They move with a grace and skill that is
almost poetry in motion, and makes quite a contrast to the later
trilogy.
There are, of course, a few things that are odd or don't make sense,
but that's to be expected.  A small sampler: are we supposed to
believe that the Jedi actually journeyed through the center of the
planet?  And the sacred place of an underwater-dwelling people is
above ground?  How can Obi-Wan's master be Qui-Gon when he's said in
the latter trilogy that it was Yoda?  Then there's the fact that Jedi
abilities apparently come from the equivalent of mitochondria
. . . who are also, if you can believe it, Anakin's "father."  And
Jabba the Hutt seems a lot _bigger_ than "young Jabba" is in _A New
Hope Special Edition_ . . . though perhaps this is meant to be Jabba
Senior.
And a couple of things are slightly annoying, not the least of which
is super-genius-cum-Chosen-One, Anakin Skywalker.  I'm not a
Wesley-hater by any means, but I still find it a bit hard to swallow
that this pre-adolescent boy could do all these things--make C-3PO,
win the pod race, singlehandedly destroy the Federation ship
controlling the droid army . . . it's kid wish-fulfillment.  There's
nothing wrong with that by itself, but this is laying it on just a wee
bit thick for my tastes.  Jar Jar Binks was a bit tiresome after a
while, too, but not to an onerous extent.  Oh, well.  Chalk it up to
incipient Ewok syndrome.
Also annoying is that after all the buildup, all the "Join the Dark
Side" T-shirts and caps with his face plastered all over them, the
Darth Maul pocketwatches that say "At last we will have our revenge"
when you open them . . . Darth Maul only has about five minutes of
screen time, and most of that is lightsaber dueling.  It would have
been nice to see more of him, to make him more of a menacing character
the way Darth Vader was, rather than a one-off throwaway.  Oh, well
. . . he wasn't meant to be the true villain of the piece at any rate.
Perhaps we'll see more menace in Episode Two.
As for the acting, Liam Neeson and Ewan McGregor were the stars of the
piece, and they both seemed to handle their roles quite well.  Ian
McDiarmid also shone as the diabolical Senator-then-Chancellor
Palpatine; it was interesting to see him sans makeup for a change.  I
completely didn't recognize him until I heard him called by name.  If
Jake Lloyd was a bit wooden in his acting, it is forgiveable; children
often lack the experience they need to make their portrayals seem more
real, and at any rate, he acted better than some adults I've seen.
The same could be said for Natalie Portman.
The special effects were top notch.  It was easy to forget that Jar
Jar Binks's head, as well as those of the rest of his race, was
completely computer-generated.  It all seemed so _real_.  _Star Wars_
has finally moved beyond the realm of rubbery alien masks into
completely lifelike CGI alien faces . . . and it's about time.  The
monsters in the "planet core" were also wonderfully done.
The score is very interesting for the themes Williams chose to reuse
(or foreshadow).  You can hear hints of the later Imperial March in
"Anakin's Theme," especially toward the end, and at a couple of points
in the movie the distinctive wistful horn solo associated with Luke
Skywalker in Episode IV makes its appearance.  "Duel of the Fates,"
_Phantom Menace_'s signature theme (which is receiving airplay even on
pop music stations, oddly enough), seems to have been inspired by the
piece "O Fortuna" from "Carmina Burana".  There is also, of course,
the de rigeur "alien band"--"Augie's Great Municipal Band," which
performs just before the end credits.
In conclusion, _Star Wars_ Episode One: The Phantom Menace_ is not a
_great_ film . . . but then, the original trilogy plus the
uncontrolled _Phantom Menace_ hype are nearly impossible to live up
to.  But it _is_ a _Star Wars_ film to the hilt.  The atmosphere, the
effects, the _feeling_ is there.  It's hard to explain, but for a
brief two hours and fifteen minutes, it's like being a kid again,
seeing the Trilogy for the first magical time.  For a _Star Wars_ fan,
no amount of wooden acting or mediocre writing can sour that (as the
past amply demonstrates--consider _Return of the Jedi_).  If you're a
fan, this is a must-see . . . but then, you probably already know
that.  If you're a _Star Wars_ agnostic or, Force forbid, have never
seen a _Star Wars_ film in your life, it will still be an entertaining
ride.  If you never really cared for "those _Star Wars_ films," well,
be advised that this is another one.
[This review is copyright 1999 by Christopher E. Meadows.  Permission
granted for Usenet distribution and associated archival, including the
Internet Movie Database, but other distribution rights reserved to the
author.]
-- 
Chris Meadows aka  | Co-moderator, rec.toys.transformers.moderated
Robotech_Master    | Homepage: http://www.eyrie.org/~robotech/>
robotech@eyrie.org | PGP: http://www.eyrie.org/~robotech/rm.key.txt>   
robotech@jurai.net | ICQ UIN: 5477383 

Author
Homer Yen
`Star Wars: Episode I'  The Force Is Still with Us
The hype has finally begun to diminish and after months of waiting (and
years for others), the highly anticipated `Phantom Menace' has finally
come to a theatre not too far, far away.  Even I was swept with
anticipation, for I am of the Star Wars generation.  I bought my ticket
a week in advance, and I was ready to once again be a part of the Star
Wars phenomenon.  The crowd showed an equal level of heightened
enthusiasm.  When I arrived at my local Loews theatre 30 minutes in
advance, many of the seats were already taken.  I was lucky enough to
find a good spot, and when the lights dimmed, a hushed silence swept
across the rows of patrons who had come, like me, to relive our
childhood and who had hoped that the film would live up to its hype.
In many ways, the film does live up to its hype.  Like the original
Star Wars that changed the landscape of movie making, this film shows
off many new advances in sound and imaging technology.  Visually, the
movie is absolutely gorgeous  eye candy galore!  Clearly there is much
imagination at work that can be seen in every shot.  Colors are
breathtakingly beautiful, settings are wonderfully detailed, and scenes
are beautifully envisioned.  For example, there is a bustling
metropolis filled with towering skyscrapers and an underwater city
whose landscape resembles a collection of light bulbs on a crystal
chandelier.  I was impressed with a battle scene pitting thousands of
evil battle droids against a small army of humanoids that looked like a
cross between a dragon and a duck and was captivated by a race sequence
that can only be described as a futuristic combination of Ben Hur and
Speed Racer.  The sound was equally impressive, especially a scene
involving a Senate debate.  To truly appreciate the spectacle of this
film, you'll need to see this film on a big screen with an advanced
sound system.  But is there as much force with the story and characters
as there is with the visual and sound effects?
The answer, unfortunately, is no.  The beauty of the original Star Wars
is that it involved uncharted frontiers and growing up in the face of
adversity.  That's not really the case here as it is a story about an
epic battle that may shift the balance of power.  In Episode I, the
evil empire is determined to assert its power and dominance.  They use
a group called the Trade Federation to further their goals and take
over planet Nabooie, which has immense importance in terms of regional
commerce.  But to secure their victory, they must force the noble and
strong queen (the Geisha-adorned Natalie Portman) to sign a treaty. 
She escapes with the help of Jedi Knights (Liam Neeson) and Obi-Wan
Kenobi (Ewan McGregor).  In their quest to regain control of her home
world, they also meet up with the future Darth Vader, Annekin Skywalker
(played by Jake Lloyd).  Annakin is able, inventive, and becomes a
great asset to their cause.  To stop the good guys, the empire
dispatches an evil warrior who has tremendous agility and fighting
skills.  He does battle with the Jedi knights with a very unique light
saber staff.  
Though impressive, this film couldn't manage to evoke that same feeling
of awe that I had hoped.  I'm sure that the amount of hype that
preceded the movie biased me as I watched the film.  Also, the
characters were not as well-defined nor as memorable as Luke Skywalker
or Han Solo.   I also think that when I saw the original Star Wars, I
was only 11, and at that time in my life, I was completely mesmerized
by what I had seen on screen.  As I've matured, my tastes have taken my
senses in a different direction that favors stories about the darkness
of humanity (like `The Matrix') over films brimming with cuddly
extra-terrestrials and star ships.  You won't come out of the film
feeling that you've experienced an event.  But, this is a film that is
stunning in many ways and always manages to be enjoyable.


Author
Steve Kong
STAR WARS: EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE (1999)
Don't Miss Star Wars: Episode I  The Phantom Menace.
There's just so much to say about this film.  But, lets get one thing out
of the way before we begin.  Does The Phantom Menace live up to the hype?
No.  This doesn't mean that it's not a fantastic film though.  This film
has enough eye candy, ear shattering sound effects, and action to satisfy
everyone.  Strip away the hype and what you have is a popcorn film that
entertains for its full running time.  The Phantom Menace is a feast for
the eyes and ears but not the brain  it's all dessert and no main course. 
Much like the first film in the original trilogy, this film serves as the
basis and introduction for the coming two films.  Being so, the film has a
lot of exposition which sometimes slows the film down, but this isn't a bad
thing because when George Lucas lets loose of his imagination, it is
something that makes you forget about all the slowness of the film.
There is an evil force working to eliminate the peace that exists in the
galaxy and to also take control of the Galactic Republic.  When the Trade
Federation sets a blockade of a peaceful planet, Naboo, a Jedi Master,
Obi-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), and his Jedi Appretice, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan
McGregor), are sent to negotiate.  The two Jedi's are met by an attempt on
their lives, which sends them down to the planet of Naboo.  At Naboo they
work to protect Princess Amidala (Natalie Portman) but are no match for the
army that is sent down to the planet.  From here the movie moves to the
planet of Tatooine where the group meets Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) and
the apprentice to a mysterious Sith Lord, Darth Maul (Ray Park).
>From Tatooine the movie moves to a few other worlds and the story moves
along with a reasonable pace.  The Phantom Menace story does not have any
of the wonder or awe that the first three films had, nor does it have a
strong character that people can like  from the original trilogy I found
Han Solo the coolest.  Among the other characters featured in the film are
some familiar faces like Yoda, Jabba the Hutt, R2D2, and a barely
recognizable C3P0.
The actors in the main roles all give decent performances, though most of
them are a bit wooden.  Liam Neeson is perfect as Obi-Gon Jinn, a Jedi
Master who is wise yet sometimes rebellious.  Ewan McGregor picks up the
mannerisms and voice of Alex Guinness (Obi-Wan Kenobi from the original
trilogy) perfectly.  He is enjoyable onscreen, but he is not given enough
screen time  though I think this will change in the second and third films.
 Natalie Portman is somewhat flat as Queen Amidala, but she does fulfill
her role adequately.  The only performance that I thought was sub-par was
that of young Jake Lloyd as Anakin Skywalker.  He does fine in the quiet
moments, but when he is asked to become ecstatic onscreen it comes off
wrong  watch as he flies around in a Naboo defense fighter near the end of
the film.
The cameo that I enjoyed the most was that of Samuel L. Jackson.  I knew
that Jackson had a cameo in the film, but I didn't know when and where.
Jackson has been high on my must-see actors list for a long time now and it
was a joy to see him in a movie of this magnitude  though he did have a
role in the second largest first-day-grossing film, Jurassic Park, his
presence in The Phantom Menace was more memorable.  I hope that he has a
larger recurring role in the next two films.
Another actor who didn't get many speaking parts but was very memorable was
Ray Park as Darth Maul.  Park doesn't get to speak much, but with that
hideous make-up and his lightning quick moves, his presence onscreen is
ominous and quite scary.  His make-up, for me, at first made me wonder what
Lucas was thinking.  But, after seeing Ray Park with the red and black face
paint and the little devil horns in action, I was convinced that Lucas is
brilliant in bringing Darth Maul to life in such a manner.  Is Darth Maul
as fear-inducing as Darth Vader?  No, but he's more of a formidable enemy
than Darth Vader was, as Darth Maul sports a double Lightsaber and has the
moves of a martial artist on speed.
I got John Williams's score for the movie the day it was released, about a
two weeks ago.  I enjoyed listening to the score  especially the track
titled `Duel of the Fates'  but, a film score is always missing something
when you hear it before you see the film.  After listening to the score
many times, I got used to the cues that were presented in the score and
during the screening of The Phantom Menace I got a taste of just how
brilliant a composer John Williams is. Williams's score plays for most of
the two hour plus running time of the film and at the 74 minute capacity of
a CD, you can see that there was a lot of music missing on the CD.  The
film score adds a whole new dimension to the movie.  As George Lucas writes
in the insert for the CD, `I like to think of the Star Wars films as silent
movies, movies whose stories are carried forward visually and by a musical
score.'  John Williams not only helps tell the story with his musical
score; his score at times is the story.  His score is restrained enough
that it does not overwhelm the audience and distract them from what is
onscreen, but it is powerful enough to move you.  Kudos to John Williams
for this dazzling score.
Lucas uses The Phantom Menace not as a storyboard to tell an elaborate
story with twists and turns.  Instead, he uses the film as a canvas.  At
the most basic level, The Phantom Menace is a film as a painting.  The
beautiful settings and sets in the film are enough to go see the film again
just to enjoy the views.  From the waterfall laden valleys in which the
capital city of Naboo resides to the underwater city to the ever-busy
Coruscant to the raceway on Tatooine to the Senate chamber, The Phantom
Menace screams of polished art, set, and production design.  The Phantom
Menace is a visual feast.
Not to let the art, set, and production design overwhelm you, Lucas throws
in gobs of `Isn't this cool?' type special effects.  Most every scene in
the film seems to have something digital added.  This brings me to one
complaint, although special effects can be used to help an audience see the
image that a director has in mind, sometimes the overuse of special effects
is detrimental.  And in some places in The Phantom Menace, the special
effects are just gratuitous, which jars the audience.  Science fiction has
to be somewhat believable and with some of the special effects Lucas pushes
the use of special effects a bit too far.  The biggest example of this
would be Jar Jar Binks, a completely computer generated actor.  Serving no
real purpose next to some comic relief, every time this character was
onscreen I flinched a little  his presence was not as bad as the Ewoks in
Return of the Jedi though.   Don't get me wrong, there are some special
effects that are jaw dropping good.  The best example of that would be the
pod race.
The action in The Phantom Menace is top notch.  The two standout sequences
are the aforementioned pod race in which we get to experience, both
visually and aurally, a high-speed race.  The race utilizes small pods
mounted behind big jet engines that gain speeds that are break-neck.  This
race had me at the edge of my seat, even though I knew how it was going to
turn out.  The way that the special effects were integrated and used in
this sequence was amazing.  The second standout action sequence is the
Lightsaber battle between Obi-Gon Jinn, Obi-Wan Kenobi, and Darth Maul.
I've never been so engaged by an action sequence before.  The sound in this
sequence shook the floor  every time Lightsabers clashed the floor shook
and the visuals of this sequence had my eyes glued to the screen.  The
sequence shows just how exciting a well-choreographed and tightly edited
fight sequence can be.  Both of these sequences were exhilarating.
Is The Phantom Menace flawed?  Yes.  Does it overcome its flaws?  Yes.
Should you go see the film?  It probably doesn't matter what my answer is,
but, yes, you should see this film.  Don't Miss Star Wars: Episode 1  The
Phantom Menace.  This movie can be enjoyed if you leave all the hype that
you've been exposed to at the front door of the theatre.  This film doesn't
have the awe of Star Wars or the smooth storytelling of Empire Strikes Back
but what it does have is enough visuals to make you want to come back for
multiple screenings.

Author
Aaron M. Renn

WARNING! This review contains SPOILERS.  You should probably not read
it unless you have already seen the film.  You have been warned.
In preparation for today's debut of Star Wars: The Phantom Menace, I
re-screened the original trilogy on video.  It's amazing really how
bad the first three movies really are.  Particularly the original Star
Wars.  The film is clearly aimed at a juvenile audience and the dialog
and acting show it.  ("But I was going into Tashi Station to pick up
some power converters").  The characters are mere props, the plot
cliched and transparent.  The second two are much better, particularly
The Empire Strikes Back, with better acting and a bit more mature
themes.  But the target audience is still clearly far below the age of
majority.
Those screenings brought my nostalgia-tinged rememberences of the
first trilogy back down to earth.  That, along with the generally poor
reviews given to it by legitimate critics, had me braced for a letdown
when I went to see The Phantom Menace.  Perhaps my low expectations
were one reason I was so pleasantly surprised by the movie.  High art
it was not, but it was good entertainment.  And beyond that it was a
lot of fun.  Clearly much of the disatisfaction with this movie stems
from the letdown that is almost inevitable after the mega-hype it has
received.  True, nobody was cheering and whooping, but then again
nobody did that when I went to see the special edition versions of
the original trilogy either.
The good parts are fairly easy to identify: lots of action and solid
special effects.  Like the original Star Wars, this movie is somewhat
a throwback to the old westerns.  There are the Good Guys, the Bad
Guys, the Damsel in Distress, the Dispute over the Ranch, the
Gunfighters, etc.  This movie, however, was released in a far
different era than the original Star Wars.  Today political
correctness rules the day and post-modernism rejects all objective
truth, especially old fashioned notions of good and evil.  Almost all
of the pricipal characters were white, and with the exception of Queen
Amidala, male.  I don't suggest that this is a good thing in and of
itself.  But it interesting to see George Lucas resisting the urge to
create a PC multi-ethnic cast.  (Indeed, the Jar Jar Binks character
reminds me of an old blackface comic, something clearly out of step
with modern sensibilities). There are numerous minority characters in
supporting roles, and it looks like Lucas hired them because they were
right for the part, not to fill some quota.  As for good and evil, the
line separating them is razor sharp.  The good guys are very good, the
bad guys are very bad.
Of course the critics hate this.  The New Yorker called the movie
"crap".  Among its supposed sins was having all the big players be
male, and stereotyping the female queen as a damsel in distress.  (Of
course, later in the same review the New Yorker said this would be a
boys' film since girls know junk when they see it.  So much for
stereotyping).  Incidentally, I think the New Yorker is wrong about
Amidala, and that is not the only review I've read that makes me think 
the critic was watching a different movie from me.
The Phantom Menace is almost unrelenting action and/or battle.  This
endears it to me far more than its predecessors, each of which had
long, boring stretches where the characters frolicked with Ewoks in
the woods and such.  I just love a good shoot-em-up.  Good space
battles are so hard to find these days.  With the Prime Directive and
assorted BS, it's a rare Star Trek episode when the Enterprise gets to
fire up its phasers.  No problem with that stuff here.  The characters
in this movie walk through life with their guns and light sabres half
drawn.  It's enough to give Handgun Control, Inc.  a heart attack.
Long, long ago there were no trigger locks on those blasters.  People
had weapons and they were meant to be used.  Critics who want to blame
this for Americans' supposed infatuation with high tech, remote
controlled war can just shove it up their arse.  I loved every minute
of it.
The special effects were cool, but hardly upped the ante like the
original Star Wars did.  In fairness, special effects have gotten so
good these days that it's hard to tell they are effects.  After
Terminator 2, how much better can they get?  We do get to see plenty
of cool equipment and spaceships though.  And a number of interesting
planetary vistas, though I got the feeling Lucas threw these in
just to impress.  Most of the aliens had that same cartoon like
quality from the original series, but this was doubtlessly
intentional.
(WARNING:  Lots of SPOLIERS start here)
Two particular highlights were the light sabre battles and the pod
race.  I though the sabre battles were far superior to the original
trilogy and Darth Maul's double bladed sabre was super-cool.  The pod
race has been beaten to death elsewhere, but I thought I would second
the almost universal praise it has been given.
Many of the criticisms of the movie leave me scratching my head.  For
example, Salon Magazine complains that it is never made clear why the
Trade Federation would want to embargo a backwater planet like Naboo.
Well, could it be that Darth Sidious/Palpatine convinced them to do it
in order to engineer his ascension to the position of Chancellor?  If
he can shoot lightning bolts out of his fingers he can surely use the
Jedi Mind Trick on the two dolts running the Federation.  There are
some unanswered questions that might call for a pre-prequel - such as
where Darths Sidious and Maul got their powers and ambitions from -
but not nearly so many as this critic complained about.
On the other hand, there were a number of legitimately annoying elements
to the movie, most of them only of interest to Star Wars geeks.  Here
are several in no particular order:
-- The movie suffers from the same bad dialog and flat characters
   as the first trilogy.  All of the major actors in this film have had
   much better roles in other productions.  Again, the plot is
   transparent and the film mostly predicatable.
-- Qui-Gon Jinn is just a little too close to Qui-Chang Caine for
   my taste.
-- The immaculate conception of Anakin Skywalker and this mysterious
   prophecy are pure fantasy elements that don't belong.  Plus, if
   Anakin really has no father, Uncle Owen and Aunt Beru can't
   really be related to Luke by blood.  Indeed the Star Wars web site
   confirms they adopted him in cooperation with Obi-Wan in order
   to hide him from Vader.  If so, why are Uncle Owen and Obi-Wan
   on such bad terms?  It could have been a ruse or some falling out,
   but an inconsistency in the plot is more likely.
-- Speaking of Anakin, the piloting abilities of someone that young
   are simply not believable, Force or no Force.
-- Why is Qui-Gon so interested in this prophecy and the restoration
   of "balance"?  What balance?  It looks like the good guys are
   in charge.  Balance could only mean more bad guys.  Maybe we'll
   find out more about this later.
-- Obi-Wan meets and spends time with R2D2 in Phantom Menace.  Why
   didn't he recognize R2 on Tatooine in Star Wars then?  He claims
   he doesn't remember owning a droid, which might be strictly
   true, but something tells me he should have reacted differently.
-- How come no member of the Jedi Council can sense that Palpatine is
   a bad guy?  The Force seemed to let them down.
-- How can an apprentice Jedi like Darth Maul be so effective against
   both Qui-Gon and Obi-Won?  They should have easily shredded him.
   Maybe the dark side is more powerful after all.
-- Too many scenes lifted directly from the first trilogy. "I've got
   a bad feeling about this", the medal scene at the end, the
   light sabre fight around the huge shaft, Obi-Wan's last moments
   with a dying Qui-Gon, the canyon in the pod race.  And did we 
   really need to go back to Tatooine again?
-- Samuel L. Jackson had little more than a cameo appearance.  This
   was very disappointing.  I hope he is more prominent in the next
   films.  I seem to think he should be a bad guy somehow.  Maybe
   he's turn out to be evil in the next film.  He'd be a lot more
   fun that way.  I miss his pony tail from Jackie Brown too.
-- Why did they have to kill off Darth Maul?  We learn nothing about
   him except that he goes around searching for and attempting to kill
   Sidious' enemies.  Though he looked more clown like than menacing,
   I still thought he had great potential as a bad guy.  I also
   wonder how they Jedi Council was able to determine that this person
   was one of the mysterious Sith.
-- Speaking of the Sith, it was interesting to see this taken back
   from the spinoff novels, but we learn little about them in this
   film.  This is intimately bound up with the origins of Darth
   Sidious, which is one of the things we learned nothing about.
-- Darth emerges as a type of title or honorific.  One presumes it
   means something like "Lord" as that is frequently used as an
   alternate.  But IIRC in Star Wars Obi-Wan addresses Vader as
   "Darth".  It seems unlikely to me that Obi-Wan would address
   Vader with the equivalent of "my Lord".
-- Jar Jar Binks has been rightly criticized as hyper-annoying.
   He speaks with a thick Carribean accent such that you can't
   understand half of what he's saying (assuming he's even saying
   English words in the first place).  He's supposedly there for
   comic relief, but I think he's really there to keep the seven
   year olds entertained.  Since I'm not seven old Jar Jar made
   me want to punch George Lucas in the mouth.
-- In Empire Obi-Wan says that Yoda trained him. However, it appears
   in this movie that he was trained by Qui-Gon.  Obi-Wan also 
   laments in Jedi that he took it upon himself to train Anakin
   in place of Yoda.  However, in this film Obi-Wan trains him
   with the (admittedly reluctant) blessing of Yoda.  It does not
   appear that Yoda is in charge of training young Jedis.
-- Anakin is a child and we are told he is too old to be considered
   for Jedi training.  It also appears one is not fully a Jedi
   knight until early adulthood.  This makes about a twenty year
   training regiment.  But Luke was able to get his Jedi training
   in a matter of weeks.
-- To travel to the Naboo from the underwater city they supposedly
   go through the "core" of the planet, but it looks like they do
   little but pass through the oceans to me.
-- The movie was about 10-15 minutes too long.
Lots of nitpicks aside, I had a fun time watching this.  When the
opening weekend madness passes, I will definitely be seeing it
again at least once.  Until Episode II, may the Force be with you.
-- 
Aaron M. Renn (arenn@urbanophile.com) http://www.urbanophile.com/arenn/

Author
Mikel J. Koven
The following was originally published in The St. John's Express
(Newfoundland Canada). The copyright is held by both the author and
Robinson-Blackmore Publishers.
http://www.rb.nf.ca/express/expcol5.htm
Star Wars: impressive, but offensive 
By Mikel J. Koven 
'A long time ago, in a galaxy far, far away.' Those words still echo
through my memory, when 22 years ago, an excited nine-year-old saw Star
Wars for the first time. 
It changed all of our expectations about what could be shown in a science
fiction movie. Over two decades later, and 16 years after the last
installment of the series, Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace may
very well be the most anticipated film in cinema history. Unfortunately,
although noteworthy for the unprecedented hype, special effects, and
anticipated box office, it will not be remembered as the kind of classic
Star Wars was. 
Set a generation before Luke, Leah, and Han battled the dark side of the
Force, Episode I presents us with Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman - a
democratic monarch?) who is placed in the unenviable position of watching
as the evil Trade Federation invade her planet of Naboo. Jedi master
Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his young apprentice, Obi Wan Kenobi (Ewan
McGregor) are sent to negotiate a peace settlement with the Federation. 
While moving the Naboo queen and her court to safety, their ship crashes on
Tatooine (remember, that's where Luke came from), and there they meet a
10-year-old wunderkind named Anakin Skywalker, who just may be the
prophesized one who will bring 'balance to the Force'. 
The press notes identify five separate storylines in Phantom Menace, and
that is probably the first indicator this movie has gone seriously wrong.
George Lucas, the mastermind behind the entire Star Wars legacy, has
returned for the first time to the writer/director's chair since his 1977
epic, and in the interim it looks like he forgot how to tell a story. Ever
notice how little kids tell the plot of their favorite movies? 
"So the Queen goes and does this. And then the Jedi guy goes and does this.
And then they get together. And then the ship crashes. And then ... yadda,
yadda, yadda." 
That is how Lucas wrote Phantom Menace; it does not feel like a script as
much as an outline for a script. There is no character development, or
emotional engagement with any of the characters. Lucas writes like a
five-year-old with Attention Deficit Disorder. Any single plot line in the
movie would have been sufficient to develop a film around. With five
separate storylines, nothing gets beyond the level of a blueprint. 
We identified with Luke Skywalker, because he was 'us', the every man,
trapped on a desolate rock with dreams of something better. His adventure
was our adventure, and why we go and see movies like this is to vicariously
experience that which we never will. There is no one to identify with in
The Phantom Menace. Therefore there is no one to care about. 
Because of this, Phantom Menace feels very cold. For all of its positive
messages about heroism and spirituality, it is profoundly misanthropic; an
anti-human picture. So misanthropic, in fact, that Lucas, disappointed with
Natalie Portman's voice, altered it with a synthesizer. Yes, the special
effects are fabulous, but they should support the human cast, not the other
way around. 
Even more disturbing is the blatant racism of the movie. To dismiss the
characters as just fantasy figures is not a valid argument. Lucas, to his
credit, develops definite cultures for his alien races, but unfortunately,
he chooses Earth stereotypes as his models. And even though these creatures
are computer generated fictions, they still resonate with Earthling
cultural stereotypes. 
The invading Trade Federation are clearly modeled on the Japanese. And at
the beginning of the movie, when we first see Queen Amidala, I was struck
by how Chinese the costumes and sets were. I thought this might be an
interesting exploration of Japan's imperial take-over of Asia in the 1930s.
Nope, just racist stereotypes. 
Then we meet comic relief Jar Jar (computer generated, but voiced by Ahmed
Best), and he takes us to his 'under the sea' colony on Naboo. Since an
African-American actor is the voice of the character, it is reasonable to
expect that the character will take on some of those cultural and ethnic
attributes. But in the 'sub continent' (get it?) of Jar Jar's people, the
African stereotypes flourish, even with an Idi Amin type leader. And making
Jar Jar lazy, shiftless, incompetent, stupid, and a functional 'Uncle Tom'
figure to the rest of the clean, intelligent, white characters really made
me cringe. 
Finally we get to the slave owner who owns Anakin and his mother, and has
them working in his shop. With his clearly hooked nose, stubbly beard, and
his unscrupulous business practices, not to mention his 'Mediterranean'
accent, I couldn't figure out whether he was supposed to be Jewish, Arab,
or even Italian, but then I'm not so sure Lucas makes a distinction between
those groups either. 
Having your invaders modeled on the Japanese, your comic relief based on
African-Americans, and your shifty business men Semitic are too specific
cultural references, and presented too stereotypically. So on the one hand,
I was horrendously offended by the blatant racism of this movie. 
But on the other hand, the special effects are impressive. Unfortunately,
too much of the spectacle has already been given away in TV ads and 'behind
the scenes' footage on Entertainment Tonight. The big adventure moment, the
fight scene between Darth Maul, Qui-Gon and Obi Wan, has been ruined by
advanced promotions: we know that Darth Maul uses a two-ended lightsaber,
so it's no surprise when he lights up the other end, punctuated with a
musical 'ta-da'. It was months after the initial release of Star Wars that
we got the 'making of' specials, which demonstrated how those amazing
effects were done. Now we've been so inundated with information about the
movie before hand, it all feels anti-climatic. 
This is not to say the movie isn't a fun two-hour time waster. It is. And
Ewan McGregor does a great impersonation of Alec Guinness. Science fiction
fans in general, and Star Wars fans in particular, are an undiscriminating
lot. They'll see Episode I - The Phantom Menace a dozen times, buy as much
merchandise as their student loans will allow, and sell out movie houses
for months. I know I'll be among them. But when even the fan reviews are
luke warm there is something wrong. 
Rating (out of 4): ** 1/2 

Author
Vince Yim
WARNING: If you actually wish to see the film, stop reading this and see
it.  While I don't blow any plot details, the more you know about a
movie, the more disappointing and built up it becomes (waiting a month
to see Titanic did the same thing).  But, in a nutshell, it's a good
film. 
Never having been the biggest Star Wars fanatic in the world (I was more
into Star Trek: The Next Generation), it is difficult to relate to the
mass fandom surrounding the latest installment, The Phantom Menace. 
However, it can't be ignored. Endless toys lining the shelves, endless
news reports, and a multi-billion dollar advertising campaign makes it
all the more difficult.  With the level of this hype, one would recall
an overhyped disaster from 1998, Godzilla, which definitely failed to
live up to expectations.
Thankfully, The Phantom Menace does much, much better.  
While the "first" Star Wars trilogy told the story of Jedi Knight Luke
Skywalker, the prequels backpedal to tell the back-story of Obi Wan
Kenobi and a young Jedi named Anakin Skywalker (who would become the
father of Luke and eventually become Darth Vader).  Without blowing too
much of the story, The Phantom Menace evolves around a peaceful planet
Naboo, which is being held hostage by a greedy Trade Federation, and
it's up to two Jedi Knights (Qui-Gon Ji, played by Liam Neeson and
Obi-Wan Kenobi, played by Ewan McGreggor) to free it.  
The Phantom Menace has taken a literal beating from various film
critics, leaving me to lower my expectations somewhat.  Common
complaints range from lack of characterization, weak narrative, poor
direction of actors, the dated style, and too much focus over special
effects.  Still, film critics often apply much historical theory in
regards to film criticism, much of which the average film buff does not
care for.
Hence, this film is a lot of fun and definitely an improvement over the
previous films (even with the "improvements" in the Special Editions). 
There are many memorable sequences throughout the film, ranging from the
fast and furious "pod race" sequence (which is a take on the chariot
races in "Ben Hur") and the many fight scenes involving legions of
battle droids.  Utilizing technology that is light years beyond anything
made before, special effects and computers are used to create everything
from monsters to robots to amazing cityscapes with incredible detail. 
No matter how many times you watch this film, you will catch something
new.  
The level of humour is a bit higher than the previous films as well,
mostly conveyed through the reluctant hero Jar Jar Binks, who belongs to
a race known as the Gungans.  Best described as an Mr. Bean from the
planet Naboo, he steals the show.  Unfortunately, being that he is a
computer-generated character, tells a bit about the direction of the
actors (although Natalie Portman as the Queen is pretty effective, as is
Jake Lloyd as the young Anakin Skywalker).  
With Star Wars mania at an all time high, there is the risk that the
film will disappoint (I myself had my doubts), which this film does have
a tendency to do at times.  There are a few logic problems with the
plot, several things are left unchecked, and at times seems to be made
only for diehard Star Wars fans (although the appearance of the Tusken
Raiders makes for more than a few laughs).  That, and young Anakin
Skywalker is a really annoying character, coming off as a smarmy,
arrogant brat (with such an attitude, it's no wonder why he turns to the
Dark Side).
Still, it seems that many people, especially critics, are missing the
point.  The film is some of the most fun 2 and a half hours that you'll
blow in your life, which is something I wouldn't mind doing again. 
While it may not have the psychological impact of an Academy Award
contender, who really cares?  The film is pure fun from beginning to
end.  And isn't that what really matters?

Author
Harvey S. Karten
STAR WARS: EPISODE ONE--THE PHANTOM MENACE
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 20th Century Fox
 Director: George Lucas 
 Writer:  George Lucas
 Cast: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake
Lloyd, Ian McDiarmid, Samuel L. Jackson, Oliver Ford
Davies, Terence Stamp, Pernilla August, Frank Oz, Ahmed
Best, Adrian Dunbar, Hugh Quarshie, Kenny Baker
   The plot hasn't the twists and turns of "Goodbye, Lover,"
the language hasn't the elegance of "A Midsummer Night's
Dream," the pathos of "Cyrano de Bergerac" is lacking and
the bon mots wouldn't challenge those of "The
Importance of Being Earnest."  Yet whether you're an
eight-year-old addict of Nintendo or an eighty-year-old
peruser of the films of Akira Kurosawa, be prepared to be
caught up in the lavish video game that is "Star
Wars--Episode 1: The Phantom Menace."  While George
Lucas's current offering lacks the eye-opening novelty of the
first "Star Wars" shown in 1977 and the polished
sentimentality of Richard Marquand's "Return of the Jedi"
released six years later, this "Star Wars" engages by its
sheer variety of characters, many of whom perform in a
wonderfully stiff and mechanical style.  While there may not
be much to the theory that the entire "Star Wars" series
possesses mythic resonance, this version, like all others, has
its share of warfare, scientific gobbdygook, spirituality and a
grandly epic style.  One of the scenes--that of a pod race
which recalls the writer-director's youth as a racer and fan of
hot rods--is as stunning as any car chase you've seen in
"Ronin," and one of the characters, Jar Jar Binks, will delight
the young 'uns demonstrating more pratfalls than Chevy
Chase and a stranger language than Mrs. Malaprop's.
   Perhaps there's no need to compare 1999 Lucas with the
guy that broke new ground twenty-two years ago with the first
of the "Star War" series.  We've heard that the current
offering does not match up to the prototype in terms of plot
development and witty interludes, but oh, those special
effects! Ninety-five percent of scenes utilize digital creations
which in the not-too-distant future could threaten the small
percentage of actors that actually can find work in Hollywood. 
Automation has hit the cinema so hard that theatrical director
Gordon Craig's theories could eventually be realized.  In the
early part of this century, Craig, frustrated that actors
constantly thought to exalt themselves by ignoring the
director and casting their own impressions on their parts,
favored the use of superpuppets, or ubermarionettes. These
plastic figures would be capable of carrying out all demands
of the director.  While Lucas still depends on the voices of
real human beings, most of his characters--indeed, the more
interesting ones--are played by digital marvels.  Still, the
132-minute movie is dominated by four human beings--Liam
Neeson as Jedi knight Qui-Gon Jinn; Ewan McGregor as his
apprentice, Obi-Warn Kenobi; Natalie Portman as Queen
Amidala; and young Jake Lloyd as Anakin Skywalker.  But
their dialogue is often so wooden, their personalities so
bland, that our attention shifts easily to such inventions as the
aforemenetioned Jar Jar for comic relief, the adorable R2-D2
as a metallic robot with compassionate responses, the
eponymous phantom menace, Darth Sidious as a mysterious,
hooded figure who appears as a hologram, and arch-villain
Darth Maul, who engages the two heroes in the culminating
battle to the death.
   While a familiarity with the rest of the series is helpful, no
prerequisites are essential.  You can understand the plot,
such as one exists, by recalling your high-school history
lesson on the causes of all wars: nationalism, imperialism,
alliances, the arms race, and international anarchy.  For
nationalism, you have the brave citizens of the planet Naboo,
ruled by the courageous Queen Amidala (Natalie
Portman)--determined to ignore the advisers that suggest she
sign a treaty of virtual surrender to an invading force.  For
imperialism, count on The Trade Federation, a sinister energy
determined to humiliate that otherwise obscure planet in a
galaxy far distant from Earth. For alliances, look to the linkup
of the Jedi knights with the nine-year-old Anakin Skywalker
(Jake Lloyd).  The principal armaments are the laser pens
used with mastery by the Jedi knights and their nemesis and
an array of weaponry that appears low-tech by contrast.
While a galaxy-wide body exists to oversee territorial
violations, its leader is a weak chancellor who--like those in
our world today who take a pusillanimous stand of neutrality
in the face of ethnic cleansing--is fearful of upsetting the
status quo.
   What is called "Episode I" actually takes place three
decades before "Episode IV--a New Hope." The Naboo queen
is held captive by the Trade Federation, which has sent a
squadron of ships to the planet, and its honchos are
determined to have her sign a treaty of surrender.  Like
medieval knights who have pledged their lives to the defense
of womanhood, Jedis Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and Obi-
Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) take off to rescue her.  The
Federation may have the uniformly obedient droids as its foot
soldiers--all under the precise management of a control ship--
but they will prove no match for the combination of the Jedis
and the youthful Anakin Skywalker.  (Those who follow the
series will recall that this young man, who is being used as a
slave, will later marry Amidala, later to become the parents of
Luke and Leia Skywalker.)
   The cognoscenti in the preview audience who have
followed the epic series with more rapt attention than they
have given to "The Iliad" and "The Odyssey" cheered most
when familiar character re-appeared, individuals such as the
adorable R2-D2 and the most Martian of all personalities,
Yoda.  Who can blame them?  The only human being who
inspires true empathy is Pernilla August who, as the mother
of Anakin Skywalker is torn by her desire to keep her boy by
her side until he is of age and her wish that he be freed from
bondage by the brave and noble Jedis.  Ewan McGregor is a
fine actor who had turned in a poignant performance in the
British comedy "Brassed Off" but despite his educated and
resonant voice cannot mine the depths of Obi-Wan Kenobi's
character as did his predecessor, Alec Guinness.  Liam
Neeson, who gave life to Oskar Schindler in Steven
Spielberg's "Schindler's List," is pale and wan this time
around.  Natalie Portman will be remembered primarily for
her succession of royal costumes, though she does exhibit
reasonably solid chemistry with Jake Lloyd, who is himself
the predictably darling movie kid.
   The vast array of digital images is at once a tribute to the
level of technology that Hollywood has brought to the world's
cinema and an unfortunate symbol of the glut that must be
projected to a young audience to keep the targeted market
involved.  Adults will more likely appreciate the less cluttered
beauty of the desert scenes, while game fans will happily go
frenzied gazing at the astounding multiplicity and variety of
creatures.  
   As Roger Ebert said in his review of the original "Star
Wars," the film was a technical watershed like "Birth of a
Nation" and "Citizen Kane" that influenced many movies that
came thereafter.  For better of worse, George Lucas ushered
in a barrage of megabudget movies that all but clobbered to
death the more personal films of the 1970s.  Happily there is
yet an abundance of such intimate works, both comic and
dramatic, silly and deep, on the indie circuit.  If movies are to
continue to survive and prosper against the fierce competition
of the VCR, the Internet, and video games, material of the
nature of "Star Wars" must reach out to those who would
otherwise substitute the privacy of the home for the
community of the movie theater.  For his contribution to the
continued prosperity of the cinema, we owe George Lucas a
debt of gratitude.

Author
David Dalgleish
It's not easy being a legend.  The STAR WARS movies are, of course,
legendary, and bringing out a new film, a continuation of that legend,
poses a problem: knowing that you are building on a legend, how do you
ensure that you live up to the attendant expectations?  George Lucas's
answer is to deliver more or less the same goods as he has delivered in the
past, but bringing them to a new level of sophistication.  He succeeds;
unfortunately, his answer is the wrong one.
        THE PHANTOM MENACE is certainly a more sophisticated film than the
previous three STAR WARS films.  The headline performers (Liam Neeson, Ewan
McGregor, Natalie Portman) are, as a whole, substantially finer actors than
their counterparts in the first trilogy (Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie
Fisher).  The special effects resources available to filmmakers today are
significantly more refined than they were fifteen or twenty years ago.  The
sets and costumes and art design are, as always, impeccable.  The dialogue
induces fewer cringes.  The hokey mystic trappings of the Force are
presented in a less adolescent manner.  All of which would make you think
that THE PHANTOM MENACE would be a better film.  It is not.
        Something is missing.  The earlier movies were, in all respects,
more primitive than the latest entry in the series, but it is that
primitive aspect that was perhaps crucial to their success.  There was a
naďveté to the earlier movies--they were innocent.  Darth Vader was a
comic-book villain, and his Oedipal conflict with Luke Skywalker lacked
even the semblance of subtlety, but the crude mythic underpinnings provided
a cumulative effect that was remarkably potent--potent not despite its
simplicity, but because of it.  THE PHANTOM MENACE, by contrast, is not
innocent, not simple--it is knowing and slick, painstakingly crafted to
live up to its legendary status.
        It is, it should be said, very good, in the way that STAR WARS
movies are inevitably good: it possesses a visual sweep and an imaginative
abundance that shames other science fiction movies.  There are multitudes
of alien beings and scientifically improbable spacecraft and even more
improbable planets and wondrously improbable shoot-em-up set-pieces.  All
are splendidly conceived: STAR WARS embodies our adolescent dreams, the
pulp dreams of the future conceived by writers like Doc Smith and Edgar
Rice Burroughs, in a way that other movies have never approached.  Still,
we expect as much from STAR WARS movies.  We also expect more, and it is
the "more" that is lacking, and which I think is responsible for the vague
sense of disappointment that has been audiences' most common response to
the movie thus far.
        The tightly knit plot begins when Jedi Master Qui-Gon Jinn (Neeson)
and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor, who subtly and
effectively imitates Alec Guinness's manner of speaking) arrive on the
planet Naboo, which the ominous-sounding alien-run Trade Federation has
sealed off with a military blockade, planning what amounts to the
interplanetary equivalent of a hostile takeover.  Young Queen Amidala
(Portman), however, has no intention of signing the treaty the Trade
Federation wishes to impose, and it is her resistance to the Trade
Federation (who are acting at the behest of someone called Darth Sidious,
who is the Emperor from the previous films, and whose true identity is not
difficult to figure out) that drives the movie, as the fast-moving
narrative takes us from Naboo to Tatooine to the seat of the Council of the
Galactic Republic and back to Naboo, gathering along the way a Naboo native
called Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best) and a young boy called Anakin Skywalker
(Jake Lloyd), whom you might have heard of.
        Much of what happens is simply a reworking of the earlier movies,
with different characters and venues, but with the same underlying
patterns.  The conflict between Naboo and the Trade Federation repeats the
conflict between the Rebels and the Empire.  The climactic sequence
features a suicidal space assault on a heavily defended enemy craft,
recalling the attempts to penetrate the Death Star's defences in STAR WARS
and RETURN OF THE JEDI.  Tatooine is revisited, and characters and alien
species familiar from the earlier movies return.
        Dazzling as it is at times, there is a sense of redundance,
although this is mitigated by the rousing pace and the weath of visual
detail; the film kicks off with a great action sequence as Qui-Gon and
Obi-Wan battle a horde of identikit battle droids, and never relents.  But
although it keeps moving, it lacks the inexorable momentum of the original
STAR WARS, which was a slow burn, beginning with.a Tatooine farmboy and a
mysterious message from a beautiful princess, ending with the pyrotechnics
of a Death Star destroyed.  In THE PHANTOM MENACE, there is no slow burn;
things are always exploding, with pauses for us to catch our breath.
        While the central characters are strong and promise to hold our
interest through the sequels, the supporting cast is rather weak.  Darth
Maul (Ray Park), billed as a villain comparable to the incomparable Darth
Vader, proves to be utterly dispensable, in more ways than one (although he
does manage to get in one very nifty fight sequence).  Jar Jar Binks is a
constant distraction, both because of his ill-conceived dialogue (much of
it employing inappropriate--and sometimes incomprehensible--variations of
contemporary vernacular) and because the digital effects used to animate
him are so slick that he seems more of a state-of-the-art videogame
character than a film character capable of standing alongside
flesh-and-blood actors.  R2-D2 and C-3PO make obligatory appearances (with
C-3PO in particular being superfluous).
        THE PHANTOM MENACE is effective as a self-contained movie on the
level of good old-fashioned escapist adventure, but it is clear that Lucas
is also laying the groundwork for the sequels, and as the story builds, its
power may grow. The fate that shapes the proceedings--the knowledge that
the Empire will emerge and conquer, the knowledge that innocent Anakin is
doomed to become Darth Vader--could be foregrounded to much greater effect,
and if the tone darkens in the next movie, as it seems it will, then new
legends may be spawned.  Fundamentally, though, what is lacking is what
science fiction fans and critics call the "sense of wonder."  The original
STAR WARS and its sequels left us agape in contemplation of new and
unexpected vistas of the imagination.  THE PHANTOM MENACE does what we
expect it to do.  It revisits the same vistas.  Yes, they're impressive,
but after sixteen years, isn't it time for some new ones?

Author
Edward W. Morris, Jr
I saw this film at 6:30am before work, so there were only 12 people in
the theater. I felt silly entering, but upon exiting realized I saw the film
the way it should be seen:  with no distractions.  In summary, I felt the
film was nothing short of spectacular.  Does the film have flaws? Of course
it does, as does most films.  But remember what you're going to see when you
enter the theater:  you want to be swept away and entertained.  You're NOT
looking for character development and first rate acting. This is the biggest
flaw with movie critism today:  reviewing a movie based on a generalized
perception of all movies rather than reviewing it based on it's intentions.
The goal of this movie is to etertain you not by challenging your
intellect, but to thrill you with action, plot, and special EFX.  It
certainly delivers on all three.  While the movie does have some elements
specifically for children, being an adult, I never felt insulted or
uncomfortable.  I believe George Lucas tried to please as many people as he
could, but I take my hat off to the man:  you could tell he did it the way
he wanted to.
Basically, the plot involves the military blockade of a planet in a
Republic in a time of political turmoil.  The Queen of the planet Naboo is
being forced by the Trade Federation to sign a treaty with them over the
taxation of trade routes to the planet.  But she will not sign.  Little does
everyone know that the Trade Federation is being commanded by the mysterious
Lord Sidious, who appears throughout the film (only to them) as a
holographic image.  His identity is secret, but one thing I noticed in the
film is that it isn't really to hard to figure out whom he is.  Listen
closely to what he says during his scenes, and what plays out before and
after his scenes.  Two Jedi knights, who are protectors of peace in the
galaxy, are dispatched by the Chancellor of the Republic to mediate the
dispute.  When Sidious finds out they're coming, he orders an excellerated
invasion of Naboo, and sentences the Jedi to death. He then dispatches his
disciple, Darth Maul, as muscle to kill them.  Maul is incredibly underused
in the film, considering the marketing of him in all forms of media.  He has
3 lines and about 10 minutes of screen time. I found this puzzling, but my
conjecture is that he might be frightening to very small children.
The Jedi rescue the queen on the planet below and go to the planet
Tatooine for parts, where they meet enslaved Anakin Skywalker (who will
become Darth Vader in later films).  One of the elder Jedi (Liam Neeson)
feels he's The Chosen One, a powerful being who will balance the force
between good and evil.
Then the action shifts to the Republic planet of Coruscant, where the
Chancellor bickers will all forms of alien life (including the Federation
beings) over the taxation and blockade of Naboo. There, we meet a Senator
Palpatine (played very well by Ian McDiarmid), who is trying all he can to
help the Queen present her case to the Republic Senate.   He advises her to
vote "no confidence" to the chancellor, and in effect getting himself the
Chancellorship.
Finally, we travel back to Naboo where the invasion is in full swing and
the occupants of Naboo team up to stop it.  This ending involves 4 different
storylines edited within one and other quickly cut to give the impression of
it happening all at once, which is very effective. In one line, the Queen is
trying to capture the Viceroy of the Federation, who is holled-up in her
palace.  In another, there is a space assault to small the contol of the
battle droids that invade on the planet below, which is the third storyline.
Finally, Darth Maul comes to Naboo to kill the two Jedi masters in a
fantastic two-on-one fight scene.
The action scenes are impressive, especially the computer generated
armies of battle androids.  There are litterally thousands of them on screen
at one time, facing an army of computer generated Gungans, who are natives
on Naboo.  The CGI graphics are absolutely seamless.  I think what we are
seeing here is the future of film:  being able to duplicate or create
absolutely anything.
The plot will please adults, but confuse children. The politics of the
blockade, the Republic Senate scene, and all scenes with Lord Sidious and
the Viceroy are very complex and must be paid attention to, lest you should
become lost.
Finally I'll touch on the performances. The always reliable Liam Neeson
brings stateliness to his role as Senior Jedi.  His character gives the
impression that he's in total control of everything, even when we know he's
not.  Ewan McGregor, also suprisingly underused until the end, does very
well as Obi-wan Kenobi, who's played later by Alec Guiness the Star Wars
movies from years ago.  He impersonates Guiness intonation and delivery,
which I didn't feel was necessary.  Natalie Portman's gotten mixed reviews
as the Queen, but I felt she did very well in her scenes bringing regalness
and compassion, where necessary.  The boy, played by Jake Lloyd, doesn't
fare quite as well, only hitting the mark about 50% of the time.  Sometimes
he's good, sometime's he's bad.  I feel that when he's bad it's not all his
fault: some of his lines must've been written by a boy his age, it seems.
I'd say the  film's greatest fault (not that you'd notice it) is the
dialogue.  Great actors Samuel Jackson and Terence Stamp have cameos as a
senior member of the Jedi council and the Republic Chancellor, respectively.
They bring a bit of class to the movie, albeit a small dose.  There is a
computer generated character called Jar-Jar Binks, who is a Gungan. He looks
like a rabbit and serves as comic relief. MUCH has been written about his
being geared towards children and how annoying that can be.  I didn't feel
he was all that bad, one of the reasons being you cannot understand his
accent of English (yes, most of the aliens speak English, another eyebrow
raiser) most of the time. Speaking of accents, I'll close by saying that the
aliens are all based on racial stereotypes, when they certainly didn't have
to be, given the imagination of Lucas.  The Federation Viceroy is obviously
Oriental, down to his eyes and robes. Yet the other Federation aliens don't
have the accent.  Watto, the Tatooine junk-deal who's enslaved Anakin, is
somewhat Jewish.  The Gungans are based on Jamacians, given their pidgin
English.  Picture an alien with long ears and bell-bottom pants saying
"Weesa no like the Naboo. Theysa think deysa better dan us."  Enough said.
This doesn't detract from the movie, but still I noticed it.
A fantastic way to spend a Saturday afternoon with your kids, or your
friends.  You won't be disappointed.

Author
George Wu
STAR WARS: EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE  (1999)
Like it affected others of my 20-something generation, Star Wars left its
indelible impression upon me.  It defined the ultimate goal of escapist
cinema for the worse, though that was not George Lucas' intention.  Star
Wars came amidst attempts by other directors to make the Great American
Film -- from Nashville to The Deer Hunter, One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest
to Network.  But it was Lucas who succeeded, at least in the minds of the
American public.  And he did it with an (apparently) apolitical fantasy. 
Today, (attempted) apolitical fantasies are practically all Hollywood
produces.  Because this is the context that Star Wars: Episode I - The
Phantom Menace arrives in, it is only special because it has been 16 years
since the last Star Wars film.
Whatever one thinks of the original Star Wars, it did not lack what The
Phantom Menace suffers from -- a strong sense of vision.  Despite Star
Wars' comic book-like origins, Lucas refused to play it for camp and for
the most part, that worked.  The lack of self-consciousness about the
material helped make Star Wars feel new even though its story was not. 
Lucas loses that focus in Menace, which is entirely too cute and
self-aware.  R2-D2, C-3P0, even Jabba the Hutt are not here because of the
demands of the story, but because they serve a sentimental purpose.  The
result is to make the Star Wars universe entirely too incestuous.  It was
bad enough that Lucas made Luke and Leia siblings in Return of the Jedi. 
Now we learn that Luke's father, Anakin, created Luke's later happenstance
companion C-3P0 and that Anakin was also assisted by R2-D2 in his own
fateful space battle.  This is just too capricious.  Seemingly taking part
in every major event in galactic history, R2-D2 must be the Forrest Gump of
the Star Wars universe.
Lucas' lack of focus leads to a very uneven motion picture.  The story
begins with two Jedi, Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan
Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), attempting to reconcile a (unspecified) conflict
between the Trade Federation and the planet Naboo.  After a failed
assassination attempt against them by the Federation, the Jedi stowaway on
ships bent on invading the planet.  There they encounter the Gungans,
amphibious creatures who inhabit an underwater city.  The sole purpose of
this meeting is to set up the Gungans for later in the plot, and as such
this otherwise seemingly pointless encounter feels incredibly awkward. 
However, the worst thing to come out of this is that the Jedi get a Gungan
companion named Jar Jar Binks.  Jar Jar's sole purpose is to act as comic
relief, but not only is he not funny, his perpetual jabbering is endlessly
annoying.  Jar Jar's reputation as the first fully-digitized character in a
live-action film falls into the same category as The Jazz Singer's being
the first talkie -- unmeritorious.
Too much of the time, Menace feels like its only going through the motions.
 Qui-Gon seems to take for granted that he can take Anakin (Jake Lloyd)
from his mother (Pernilla August) and neither will object.  When the time
comes to do so, Anakin and his mother display only mild hesitation.  This
would have worked perhaps if the film had stressed their lives as slaves so
that Anakin's mother would obviously want him to escape to a better life. 
As it is, the mother has some vague notion that Anakin is special, so why
not put him in the hands of this Jedi she hardly knows?  The whole scenario
in which Qui-Gon gets Anakin under his wing is convoluted and could have
been greatly simplified.  The Menace script needed two more drafts.
Despite the obfuscated plot, the film feels very rushed.  Establishing
shots go by quickly, often wasting the effort that went into creating some
stunning digital landscapes.  The climax mirrors that of Return of the
Jedi, intercutting among a lightsaber duel, a ground war, and a space
battle, but the pacing is too frenetic.  Although sporting supposedly
superior special effects, these sequences are less involving than those in
Jedi.  This is particularly surprising with the space fight.  This sequence
suffers from the film not establishing how to accomplish the goal.  When it
is finally achieved (and who doubts that it would be), it happens
completely by accident.
In terms of action, the highlight of Menace is the lightsaber duel in which
Darth Maul takes on Qin-Gon and Obi-Wan.  The choreography, taking note of
Hong Kong cinema's recent influence in Hollywood, far surpasses that in the
three previous Star Wars films.  On the other hand, there seems to be far
less at stake.  Taking the conflict for granted, Lucas does not even have
the antagonists speak to one another, thus lessening the emotional
involvement over why they are fighting.  In only a couple of instances
during the duel do we even get a sense of momentum shifts.  The beauty of
the choreography takes precedence over who wins or loses.
None of the actors ever really get to let loose.  They all feel too
uptight.  One of the problems is that they do not have an internal
conflict, only an outside goal.  In the original Star Wars, Luke yearned
for more in his life but was also plagued by the self-doubt festered upon
him by his uncle.  Han Solo had to decide what was more important to him,
money or risking his life to help others.  The only internal conflict in
Menace is Qui-Gon deciding whether to break the Jedi council's prohibition
to train Anakin and this situation only arises halfway through the movie. 
Everyone else's main goal is to save Naboo.  Characters who have no inner
life are not very interesting.
Instead the focus should have been put on Anakin.  Menace hints at his
desire to free the slaves on Tatooine, but this is only spoken, not shown. 
Yoda cites Anakin's fear, but this too is enormously abstract. 
Unfortunately, Jake Lloyd would not have been up to the task to carry the
film anyway.  Like most American child actors, he overacts or is too
self-conscious (which I blame on the watching of too much television
acting).  Compare Lloyd's performance to that of the children in the
British Hope and Glory or the Swedish My Life as a Dog, and we see how much
is wanting.  Lucas does not help him by putting all sorts of 1990s
colloquial expressions in his mouth, which will date the film quickly.  (In
general, the film is filled with bad dialogue.)
Anakin's relationship with the Naboo Queen, Amidala (Natalie Portman), also
feels forced (no pun intended).  While we know the two will eventually
become Luke and Leia's father and mother, the strains of their caring for
each other rings false when these two barely know each other.  No chord is
struck between them.  Perhaps had Lucas given them the playful antagonism
between Han Solo and Leia, this could have worked.  As it is, their
relationship is sterile.
All this said, the appeal in The Phantom Menace is simply that it gives us
the first chance in 16 years to return to the Star Wars universe.  In terms
of fulfilling this nostalgia, from the opening fanfare to the lightsaber
duel, Menace succeeds.  Menace is also more of a stand alone story, a
prelude to the "epic" events to come, like J.R.R. Tolkien's The Hobbit. 
Luckily, Lucas can use Menace as a testing ground and learn from his
mistakes for the next two installments, which will be desired all the more
for the lackings in this one.
http://pages.prodigy.net/zvelf/index.htm

Author
David Wilcock
Lucas was wise to start his Star Wars trilogy with Episode 4: Episode 1 is a
boring, empty spectacle that features some nice special effects. After the
familiar 'A long time ago....' opening, the film starts with the opening
yellow crawl that features in every Star Wars movie and computer game. The
plot is that the trade confederation are blocking off supplies to the
peaceful planet of Naboo, ruled by Queen Amidala (Portman) Jedi Knights
Qui-Gon (Neeson) and Obi Wan (McGregor) are sent to negotiate a deal with
the confederation to stop the blockade. However, this simple blockade is not
all it seems, and the Jedi Knights soon have to deal with many more dangers,
including facing the evil Darth Maul (Ray Park.) They also meet the future
Darth Vadar, Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd)
Star Wars is largely a failure in all the major areas of filmmaking: script,
direction and characters. The script desperately tries to make an thin and
boring story into a two hour epic. The trade confederation plot is just not
as exciting as the death star, and as the film goes on the drama becomes
more and more non-existent. There's no underlying tension, and no urgent
need to see what the outcome is. The film also takes a leisurely pace in
telling the boring story, which doesn't help. There's no snap to make the
film work, it moves at a plod.
The script is boring: all the characters speak in morals, especially Anakins
mother. There's no group spirit evident here, and when all characters can
speak only in profound statements or bark orders, it's evident that not much
is going to happen. The two leads are hideously boring, static characters
given little to do and too much time to do it. Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan hold no
presence on film, and give little for the audience to root for. The audience
will probably warm more to bad guy Darth Maul, if he had been given more
screen time. Maul is one of the most underused bad guys in  film history,
even if he does provide the only 'straight' plot line in the film (all the
other plots in this film are to be concluded throughout the trilogy.) Anakin
is annoying and unlikeable., instead of cute and huggable as Lucas no doubt
intended. It's probably not surprising that his hateful little boy,
unfortunately blessed 'Ani' by everyone he knows, joins the dark side and
kills everyone as quickly as possible. The comedy relief is supposedly
provided by the gangly Jar Jar Brinks, although in the end none is provided
in the film by him. Although his floppy features will no doubt be great for
stuffed toys, the lines and actions he is given are painfully unfunny. The
only good laugh is when his tongue is burned by a 'pod' racer, because I
knew he wouldn't be able to talk for a while. Queen Amidala is a nothing in
the film, she serves no real purpose apart from the fact that she must
'serve her people,' and go goo-goo over Anakin. Again, her role will become
more important in the later episodes, and is given little to do here.
The actors don't help the movie much either. Liam Neeson seems bored and
embarrassed, and seems desperate to leave the movie as quickly as possible.
McGregor comes across as a posh mothers boy, with little charm. The casting
director must have chose him because he's Scottish like Alec Guinness:
there's little other explanation for it. Natalie Portman is plagued by
hideous costumes and a poor script, but she delivers a spunky performance.
And Jake Lloyd looks at everyone with hateful eyes and delivers his lines in
a bored voice. There's very little talent evident with him, it's hard to see
why Lucas chose him when there are better child actors out there. He's not
even very 'cute.'
The main claim of the film, the special effects, are okay. There's nothing
impressive about them, yet they complement the story well. The CGI takes
away much of the human element, however. The battle droids for example, the
replacement for the stormtroopers, are characterless little computer
graphics, lacking the humour and humanness that came from the stormtroopers.
Episode 1 is just disappointing. It's got high production values, but little
else. The music is meandering, except near the end. The plot gives us no-one
to root for, or even care for. The effects are nice, but dull. The plot goes
on for half an hour longer than it should. There's an air of manufacturing
among the whole sorry affair, and many clichés are catered for throughout
the film. Apart from a remotely exciting pod race sequence, Episode 1 is a
dry affair that serves little purpose, except to make money and to get us to
watch Episode 2 to see what happens to the many unfinished plot lines in the
film. Disappointing is barely the word.
RATING=** OUT OF *****

Author
Matt Pusateri
STAR WARS: EPISODE 1 - THE PHANTOM MENACE (1999)
Few movies evoke nostalgia, enthusiasm, and affection like George Lucas'
1977 classic, Star Wars.   The original blockbuster film and its two sequels
not only evoked wonder and passion in a generation of filmgoers, but has
deeply entrenched itself in American pop culture. Arguably, more Americans
today can explain what "The Force" or a "Jedi" is than a budget deficit or a
Serb.
So 22 years after the release of the original, and 16 years since the third
film, The Return of the Jedi, how can any new Star Wars film withstand the
weight of incomparable expectations and anticipation?  Can a new storyline
and a new cast of characters possibly compete with the legends of the first
trilogy - Luke, Han Solo, and Darth Vader -all cultural icons?  Against this
challenge, the fourth Star Wars film, Episode One: The Phantom Menace hit
the screens last week. And despite some early critical reviews in the major
media, the film is neither a flop nor a disappointment.  While The Phantom
Menace is certainly not the finest film in the series, it is nonetheless
engaging, exciting, and visually breathtaking.  It is a worthy sequel  - er,
prequel - to the original Star Wars films.
The Phantom Menace takes place decades before the setting of original films.
As the film opens, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), the wise old master who
introduced Luke to the Force in the original Star Wars, is only a young Jedi
apprentice, still learning from his fellow Jedi and instructor, Qui-Gon Jinn
(Liam Neeson).  The Republic government has sent the two Jedi to settle a
trade dispute that has developed into a blockade of the planet Naboo by a
shifty Trade Federation.  The Jedi quickly find themselves not in
negotiations, but in the middle of a planetary invasion, rushing to protect
Naboo's young Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman).  Later, after eventually
rescuing Amidala and helping her escape Naboo, they are forced to stop at
Tatooine to repair their battle-damaged ship before bringing her to the
Galactic Senate to make an appeal for justice.  On Tatooine, Qui-Gon
discovers a young slave boy, Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), who not only can
help them get the parts they need, but displays uncanny intelligence,
insight, and instincts.  Qui-Gon senses the child is "unusually strong" with
the Force and begins to suspect that he may be "the One" prophesized to
"bring balance to the Force."  As anyone who has watched the original Star
Wars trilogy knows, far from being a galactic savior, the innocent-looking
9-year-old will in time become the ruthless Darth Vader. Complicating
matters further is a mysterious hooded figure, Darth Sidious, is behind the
trade blockade and invasion of Naboo, and sends out a lethal apprentice,
Darth Maul, to find and capture Queen Amidala.  While Amidala and the Jedi
fight to save her planet, they soon also have to deal with the deadly and
relentless Darth Maul.
If the plot sounds a bit complicated, it is. The Phantom Menace not only
introduces an earlier generation of characters and an immediate crisis, but
sets up the foundation for the events that will eventually lead to the fall
of the Republic, the demise of the Jedi knights, Anakin's turn to evil, and
the rise of the dark Empire of original trilogy.  But the complexity is not
overwhelming.  The story moves quickly, with the only drawback being that
many questions, predictably, remain unanswered at the end of the film,
setting the stage for the next episode.  One of the reasons the film's story
seems hazy is not that it is too confusing, but too unfocused.  It's unclear
whose story Phantom Menace is.  In the original trilogy, the movies were
clearly Luke's story, with the stories centering around his growth from
farmboy to rebel hero to Jedi knight.  But it's unclear whether this new
film is Anakin's story or Obi-Wan's.
If this trilogy is centered on Anakin, it's a shaky foundation.  Lloyd, like
many child actors, lacks the subtle acting skills of adult performers, and
as a result, his character seems shallow and unimpressive.  On screen, we
see nothing that suggests a dark side lurking underneath his little-boy
face, or for that matter, any presence that would make him seem so special
that Qui-Gon is willing to believe he is "the One."  The rest of the cast
does fine, though they often work with some iffy dialogue by Lucas. Neeson
is perfect as an aging Jedi knight. McGregor is well-cast as Obi-Wan and
conveys a balance of youthful energy and calm sensibility.  Portman fits the
role of a young queen well, but her lines were often very formal, giving her
little room to give her character much personality.
The biggest problem with The Phantom Menace is not the plot or the
characters, but the interaction between them.  Individually, the characters
in this new film are no less developed than those in the original Star Wars,
and the storyline is not more confusing than previous films in the series.
But unlike the previous trilogy, Lucas doesn't do as good of a job playing
the characters off one another.  In Star Wars, there were immediate
contrasts and memorable exchanges between Luke and Han, Han and Obi-Wan, and
Leia and Luke.  The ensemble played off each other and immediately showed
their distinct attitudes and personalities.  In the sequence in where Luke,
Han, and Chewbacca attempt to rescue Leia from her cell on the Death Star,
the audience learns a lot about all four characters in the ways they react
to the immediate problems and each other.  There is no comparable sequence
in The Phantom Menace to flesh out the characters and their relationships
with each other.  Individually, they are interesting characters with clear
motivations and interests, but Lucas develops little chemistry or tension
between the them.  This is perhaps the most glaring weakness of this film,
and is probably the reason it has disappointed many reviewers.
But despite the need for a richer dialogue and stronger character
interaction, the film is still very engaging.  Many of the wonderful
elements of Lucas' previous films make The Phantom Menace both memorable and
entertaining.
First, of course, is the remarkably rich and imaginative universe Lucas
creates.  The characters visit magical underwater cities, evade
dinosaur-sized sea monsters, fight battle droids and menacing "destroyers"
on Venetian-looking planet of Naboo, watch a spectacular event, part
Roman-chariot race, part Nascar circuit, on the arid desert planet of
Tatooine, then head to Corsucant, the gothic urban capital of the Republic
and home to the Galactic Senate and the Jedi Council.  Each location is
elaborate and complex.  Lucas never settles for vague ideas about the look
of his settings, he creates rich, spectacular landscapes, palaces, and
skylines. Most of the new special effects in his re-released Special Edition
trilogy in 1997 were changes that allowed him to give the earlier movies the
look and feel that just weren't possible when the films were made.
More than ever, in this new film, Lucas' universe is filled with a menagerie
of creatures, robots with personalities, and a supporting cast of aliens who
interact with the main characters.  The best such character is Watto, a
greedy Tatooine junk dealer who owns Anakin and his mother as slaves.  Watto
has a scratchy Italian voice and a short, paunchy body with oddly mismatched
wings that flutter like a hummingbird as he floats around the room.  Of all
the computer-generated characters in the film, Watto is the best done and
most enjoyable.
Speaking of computer-generated characters, no review of The Phantom Menace
is complete without mentioning the most controversial figure in the film:
Jar Jar Binks.  With more than 80 minutes of screen time, Jar Jar is the
realization of George Lucas' dream to include a fully computer-generated
character into the cast of the new trilogy.  Jar Jar, a clumsy amphibian and
member of the Gungan race, literally stumbles his way into the path of the
Jedi knights early in the film and becomes Qui Jon's accidental sidekick.
Jar Jar usually performs a comic-relief role in the film, lightening scenes
with his mishaps and inability to stay out of trouble.  The animation of Jar
Jar is nearly seamless, and he interacts with the characters throughout the
film as if he were really on the set with the actors.  However, despite the
technological magic that makes his character possible, Jar Jar isn't
completely convincing.  He still moves and sounds too much like a cartoon to
blend into a scene.  Throughout the movie, Jar Jar never transcends a "Roger
Rabbit"-like presence.  You accept that he's there, but you never lose sight
of the fact that he is an animated character.  Initially, I found Jar Jar
annoying, but grew to enjoy the humor he added to the film. On my second
viewing of the film, Jar Jar was a lot of fun and I didn't mind him at all.
A second reason this film continues the fine tradition of Star Wars movies
is that the film is replete with humor and small details that flesh out the
world Lucas creates.  Despite all the film's struggles between good and
evil, and the sober musings about one's destiny and "the Force," like all
Star Wars films, The Phantom Menace never takes itself too seriously.
Fortunately, Lucas hasn't lost sight of the fact that his films are
entertainment, not high art.   From the bumbling Jar Jar, to a one-man,
two-headed announcer team calling the action at the film's thrilling
pod-race sequence, to a cameo appearance by E.T. in the film, The Phantom
Menace is simply a lot of fun, with lots of half-hidden jokes and humor that
can easily be missed.
And finally, The Phantom Menace works because, as in all his films, there is
no shortage of speed and action.  From beginning to end, there are
light-saber battles, hair-raising chases, and thrilling duels between good
and evil.  The pod-race sequence on Tatooine is one of the most entertaining
and exciting scenes in any Star Wars film, and the final showdown between
Obi-Wan, Qui-Gon, and Darth Maul is arguably the best choreographed, most
thrilling fight sequence Lucas has filmed.
The Phantom Menace won't win any major Oscars.  It probably won't beat
Titanic's box office record.  And it's not even the best Star Wars film (I'd
put it third, after the original and The Empire Strikes Back).  But it's an
exciting and entertaining film, far better than your typical summer
blockbuster.  The film can't live up to it's hype - no film, not even the
original Star Wars, could have done that.  But it's still worth seeing...
probably more than once.
Copyright 1999 Matt Pusateri
Check out other film reviews, game reviews, features, and columns at The
Separate Radio Volume Knob (http://www.pusateri.org/knob.htm)

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Liam Neeson; Ewan McGregor; Natalie Portman; Jake Lloyd & Pernilla
August
A long time ago in a galaxy far, far away.... I have to admit that when
those words appeared on the screen, my heart skipped a beat, even if only
ever so slightly. By the time the opening setup credits had finished, I was
all set for a good time. After seeing Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom
Menace, I was left wondering if I had seen the same movie that many film
critics had seemingly taken great delight in eviscerating in the weeks
leading up to its release. I certainly didn't experience the colossal
disappointment that many a critic were predicting that fans would suffer.
Nor did it appear as though anyone else in the sold-out theater where I saw
The Phantom Menace was overly underwhelmed. At least, not judging by the
applause that erupted when the film's end credits started to roll. Although,
I suppose that could have been from just being relieved that the worst 2
hours of their lives was now over. Call me crazy, but I don't think so. Let
me set the record straight on some of the more prominent criticisms of this
film. 1) That director George Lucas went a little crazy on the computer
generated aspects of the film. To be honest, the CGI was so subtle that I
hardly noticed most of it. Since 95% of the scenes were in some way
digitally enhanced, you would expect that it might get a little
overwhelming. Much of it involved scenes where some element of the
background had been enhanced in some small way. As for the big scenes such
as the dramatic battle between the Gungans and legions of battle droids, the
digital effects were so well done that I didn't even notice that everything
on screen was CGI. Criticism number 2 -- that the story was seriously
lacking. Admittedly The Phantom Menace is a setup for the next two films.
But the way in which Lucas sets up these cliffhangers that will be resolved
in the next films is brilliant. There are also more than a few winks and
nudges directed to those who are diehard fans of the movie. 3) The computer
generated character of Jar Jar Binks is really annoying. At first he kind of
is a bit, but I found that he grew on me as the movie progressed. He also
had some of the funniest lines in the film, provided you could understand
them. Of my complaints that is the biggest. Jar Jar's whole race spoke in a
backwards dialect that had its funny moments, but in most cases you really
had to work to make out what they were saying. 4) Jake Lloyd, who plays
young Anakin Skywalker, can't act. There are a few brief moments in the film
where it is painfully obvious why Lloyd has gained the nickname of Mannequin
Skywalker among some. To be perfectly honest, he wasn't half bad in most of
the movie. Which is a credit to Lucas for keeping Lloyd's dramatic scenes to
a bare minimum. Although, I certainly won't miss Lloyd in the next film. To
be quite frank, I found most criticism directed toward this film was blown
way out of proportion. I guess that is in keeping with everything
surrounding The Phantom Menace.
Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace, for those of you who are just
emerging from your caves, is the first in a trilogy of prequels to the
original Star Wars saga. This trilogy concerns how young Anakin Skywalker
eventually grew up to be the evil Darth Vader (the father of Star Wars' Luke
and Leia). The Phantom Menace begins with a trade dispute between the Trade
Federation and the planet of Naboo. The Trade Federation sets up a blockade
of Naboo to force them into submission. The Galactic Republic dispatches two
Jedi knights, Qui-Gon Jin (Liam Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi
(Ewan McGregor), to try to settle the dispute. Once there, the two Jedis
realize that there is something more sinister going on that just a trade
dispute. The mysterious Darth Sidious (even more mysteriously uncredited) is
secretly pulling the strings of the Trade Federation armies encircling
Naboo. He orders his men to commence the capture of the peaceful planet.
Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan manage to rescue the ruler of Naboo, Queen Amidala
(Natalie Portman), from the clutches of the Trade Federation's army, and
whisk her off to the planet of Coruscant where she can plead her planet's
case before the ruling Republic's Senate. On their way, their ship
experiences engine trouble and they have to land on the desert world on
Tatooine for repairs. There, Qui-Gon and Amidala meet a young boy named
Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) who seems to have a great connection with the
Force. The rest of the film is more of less the Jedi's and Amidala's
attempts to free her planet.
Much of The Phantom Menace is a setup for Episodes II and III. A good
portion of the movie is spent introducing the characters and their
forthcoming intertwining relationships which we all know will eventually
happen. At least those of us who have seen the first three films know what
is going to eventually happen. Episode I gives us a sneak peak of sorts into
what we know these characters are to become. For instance, we get the first
hints of the romance that is to blossom between the Anakin and Amidala (Luke
and Leia's parents). We also start to see the rise to power of the Senator
from Naboo named Palpatine (Ian McDiarmid) who would later become Darth
Vader's master, Emperor Palpatine. We also have the first indications from
the Jedi council, headed by Yoda (Frank Oz) and Mace Windu (Samuel L.
Jackson) that while Anakin may be strong with the Force, his future might be
less than rosy. All of this, and other subtle hints, will be to the great
delight of Star Wars fans. Those that have never seen the original trilogy
or haven't seen it in a while, may miss out on some of the more subtle
comments and hints. Lucas seems to have made The Phantom Menace as a teaser
of sorts for what is to come, and in that respect he has done it
brilliantly. The hints and anticipation about what is to come has left me
wishing that I didn't have to wait three more years to see the next chapter.
Aside from the setup for Episodes II and III, The Phantom Menace does stand
up on its own. The plot may be a bit light in places, but I certainly never
noticed. I was so caught up in the spectacle of it all. Visually, The
Phantom Menace is one breathtaking movie. The computer technology available
today has allowed Lucas' technical wizards to create whatever magical worlds
that Lucas can dream up. Particularly staggering were the capital city on
Naboo which featured grand waterfalls and ornate architecture. The
underwater sequences involving Jar Jar Binks' totally submersed home are as
stunning as anything you are ever likely to see on film. And of course, the
final battle involving the thousands of battle droids is something that
never could have been created without the use of computers.
"How about the actors?", you are no doubt asking yourself. Liam Neeson
displays the same abundant talent in this film as he did in Schindler's
List. He, along with Natalie Portman, is the heart of the movie. Portman is
incredible as the young Queen with the weight of an entire planet on her
shoulders. I feel obligated to note that when you take away the Queen's
strange outfits and even stranger makeup, Natalie Portman is absolutely
stunning. I realize that she was cast for her enormous talent as much as
anything else, but her classic beauty made me think that she was born to
play a queen. I was a bit disappointed that Ewan McGregor and Samuel J.
Jackson didn't have bigger roles in this film. I was especially shocked at
how little screen time McGregor got. But both be and Jackson gave great
performances in their roles. I also would have liked to see a bit more of
Darth Maul (Ray Park) who was other character that fit into the under used
category. The cast as a whole was an amazing one especially considering most
of them were acting with blue screens and not real actors at any given time.
And even those that weren't quite what they should have been (anyone who
sees the film will know who they are) didn't detract from the movie. In
fact, very little detracted from the movie. And if something did, you could
be sure that some other nifty thing would come along to take your mind off
any little bumps in the road. George Lucas threw enough small touches and
tiny details in to make up for any deficiencies that may have arisen.
Sure there were things that probably could have been done differently. I've
never seen a perfect movie yet, so I didn't expect this one to be flawless
either. Lucas has made a fun little movie that all ages will be able to
enjoy. It may not be quite as good as Star Wars, but it certainly stands up
well to The Empire Strikes Back and Return Of The Jedi. I only had one major
complaint as I walked out of this film -- that I have to wait 3 more years
to see the next one. That's the sort of complaint I wish I had with every
film.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Let's cut to the chase and answer the second most important question in
every moviegoer's mind.  Is the new STAR WARS, more formally known as STAR
WARS EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE, as good as the last 3?
But, THE PHANTOM MENACE is a visually audacious triumph whose look far
surpasses the first three.  A thoroughly entertaining motion picture, it is
a PG-rated treat for the entire family.  This brings me to the most asked
question, how do you snag some early tickets to the most widely anticipated
film since GONE WITH THE WIND?  To this cinematic conundrum, this review
will offer no guidance.
Written and directed by George Lucas, the movie works best when it's at its
busiest.  As armies of computer-generated figures war with each other, the
movie infuses the audience with a visceral excitement that's palpable.  Your
adrenaline will pump as if you personally are taking on those cleverly
designed robotic soldiers of the future.
If the look and the impressive sound are the picture's high points, the
charisma-challenged characters are its low points.  The uninspired casting
features some well-known actors who seem oddly out of place and some new
actors who don't.
There isn't a Han Solo class character to be found anywhere on this mission.
Harrison Ford, with his macho swagger and his humorous energy and charm, is
sadly missed.  No one with his abilities is found anywhere in this cast.  If
some are to the manor born, Ford's natural home is in a space opera series
like STAR WARS or an old-fashioned adventure anthology like INDIANA JONES.
In this STAR WARS prequel, Liam Neeson plays the Jedi master Qui-Gon Jinn,
and Ewan McGregor plays his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi.  Giving restrained
and wooden performances, these fine actors look like they feel awkward and
somehow slightly embarrassed in their roles.  I expected them to warm up to
their characters, but they never did.  Both act way below their potential.
The biggest disappointment comes from the story's villain, Darth Maul (Ray
Park), who looks like a lumpy-headed soccer hooligan.  With all looks and no
menace, Darth Maul's no Darth Vader, not even close.  He's more like a video
game opponent who's waiting to be sliced and diced.  To emphasize how mean
he's supposed to be, they give him a double-ended lightsaber.  This reminded
me of the scene from SPINAL TAP, in which they claim that their band is the
best because the volume on their amplifier goes to 11 rather 10 like the
other bands' amplifiers do.
The pleasures in the casting come from relative newcomers Natalie Portman as
Queen Amidala and Jake Lloyd as Anakin Skywalker.  Much has already been
written about the latter, with people divided between those who find Jake
Lloyd's performance endearing and those who think it's lifeless.  I'm in the
former camp.  With his confident charm he is the one of the best reasons to
get excited about the future episodes.
The movie's most exhilarating scene comes in a big pod racing extravaganza
that's lifted straight out of BEN HUR.  The technological tour de force
crowd scenes alone are worth the price of admission.  A two-headed race
announcer supplies the humor in a picture that is sadly bereft of much
comedy.
The lovable R2-D2 (Kenny Baker) and C-3PO (Anthony Daniels) are back, but
they aren't allocated anywhere near the screen time that they deserve -- a
waste of one of moviedom's best comedy duos.
The dialog has classic STAR WARS lingo.  ("Be wary, I feel a disturbance in
the force," is one of the many canonical lines.)  Yoda, with his famous
fractured syntax, is back for a cameo part.  "Ah, hard to see, the dark side
is," he lectures Anakin.  The retreads are fun, but what is missing are many
memorable new lines.
John Williams's wonderfully dramatic music draws heavily on his previous
work for the series yet still manages to be fresh.  Gavin Bocquet's lavish
sets are visually enthralling with the Queen's large Italian Renaissance
palace with its massive marble columns being among the handsomest.
The typical STAR WARS plot involves the federation trying to kidnap the
queen and enslave her people.  But the thin and sometimes confusing plot is
all just a backdrop for the action.  The middle section of the movie gets
bogged down with the machinations of Senate bureaucrats squabbling over
issues ranging from taxes to trade to leadership.  Sometimes, you may feel
like screaming at the screen, "all right already, let's get back to the
action."  If we want to hear about bickering politicians, we can read the
newspaper.
So is THE PHANTOM MENACE a disappointment?  A little.  The first three
movies were such a huge success and built such a loyal following of fans;
the hype that ensued was to be expected.  With such enormous hype comes an
inevitable disappointment.  But is the movie one that you wouldn't want to
miss?  Absolutely.  See it on the largest screen you can find and with the
best sound possible.  This is a big event.  Don't miss it.  And don't even
consider waiting until it comes out on video.
STAR WARS EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE runs 2:11.  It is rated PG for some
sci-fi violence and would be fine for all ages.
My son Jeffrey, age 10, thought it was almost better than the first 3 and
gave it ****.  He liked the dialog, especially, "destroy them (pause) all of
them."  He went on and on about the things he liked, including the music,
the relationships, the figures and the action.  He couldn't think of
anything in the movie he didn't like.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
David N. Butterworth
STAR WARS: EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1999 David N. Butterworth
        It was an overcast, muggy Tuesday afternoon, the day before the
eagerly-awaited "Star Wars" prequel was slated to blast into theaters.  I
walked up to the bored-looking ticket seller at my local multiplex
(twenty-four screens to be precise) and asked "So what's the deal with
"Star Wars" tickets?"  Anticipating a long, drawn-out answer about nothing
being available until the 27th and having to wait "over there," the
lethargic teenager simply asked me what show I wanted to see.  "When's the
first one?" I asked.  "10am."  "And you still have tickets?"  "Yes."  "Then
I'll take one for the ten o'clock show please."
        At 9:30am the next morning the parking lot was already pretty full,
and you can bet people weren't there for the new Jet Li movie.  The ticket
taker told me to hang onto my stub at all times, and to sit as close to the
middle as possible, as the show was sold out.  For a sold-out show there
were a lot of empty seats, but by that point all I could think about was my
hankering for some gummi sourpatch nightcrawlers.
        If you go to see "Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace," as
it's correctly called (and I suspect you will), I recommend you get there
early.  Not just in case your particular show happens to be sold out too,
but to listen to "Star Wars" junkies complaining about this, that, and the
other.  My favorite comment came halfway through the film when some
numskull whispered reverentially "Shmi Skywalker's the Virgin Mary!"
        I saw the original "Star Wars" back in 1977 when it first came out.
A lot of hoopla surrounded it at the time and for the most part it was
deserving.  The special effects were light-years ahead of their time and
the story was a classic case of good vs. evil, beautifully realized, and
inspired by Akira Kurosawa's "The Hidden Fortress."
        That blast from the brass section as the "Star Wars" insignia
appears from out of nowhere and slowly pushes its way into the starry
screen still gives me goosebumps.
        A little context for you.  Although I can't tell a bantha from a
Grand Moff Tarkin, I do believe that Harrison Ford can't act his way out of
a brown paper bag.  I believe that Mark Hamill didn't even try.  I believe
that Carrie Fisher is a better novelist than she is an actor, I believe
that Chewbacca was the series' best character and they should have brought
him back for "Episode I," and I believe that the Ewoks were a big mistake
(their TV series spin-off an even bigger one).  I believe in the twin moons
of Tatooine, the golden orbs of Unrath, the curve of Natalie Portman's
back, and I believe in long, slow, deep, soft, wet kisses that last three
days...
        We've been so deluged by special effects-laden movies in the 1990s
that we take a lot of today's technical wizardry for granted.  The new
"Star Wars" film is purported to contain some 2,000 "effects shots"
(compared to the 800 or so in "Titanic"), the most in any one movie, but
all that stuff seems like overkill at times.  We miss what we're supposed
to be looking at because there's just too much of it.  "Star Wars" did
exponential things with technology.  Relatively speaking, "The Phantom
Menace" would have required special footwear, probably, to have had the
same impact.
        Nevertheless there are some glorious paintings, models, and
backdrops in the film.  These cities and civilizations really come alive.
The craftsmanship is top-notch, state-of-the-art, exquisite.  The costumes,
not to mention Natalie Portman's hairdos (she plays Queen Amidala of Naboo)
are breathtaking.  That's right, breathtaking hairdos.  The Jedi commission
is made up of a bunch of funny-looking characters ... and Samuel L.
Jackson!  Terence Stamp is barely in the film.  The baddie, Darth Maul, is
appropriately named because he looks like some WWF spokesperson in a monk's
habit.  He's pretty cool.
        On the other hand, the Federation's computer-animated droids can't
hold a light saber to those imperial storm troopers.  Ewan McGregor (as
Obi-Wan Kenobi) is as stiff as a post and I hate to say it but the film
actually gets a bit boring at times.  The need to explain connections to
the original trilogy results in a lot of talky sequences and deja-vu, some
of it welcome and some of it not.  Jar Jar Binks, a walking, wisecracking
Rasta duck-billed platypus whose catchphrase is "How rude!" provides much
of the comic interest but after a while he tends to blend in with the rest
of the lop-eared platypi.
        One of the film's big set pieces is a "pod race" featuring the
young, fatherless Anakin (Jake Lloyd), an homage to "Ben Hur"'s famous
chariot race.  The point of all this spectacle is so that Jedi master
Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) can win a bet to pay a winged muppet called
Watto for spare parts to fix a crippled spaceship.  I know Jedi knights
must have some code of ethics but couldn't they have found an easier
solution to their problem (like, maybe, steal the hardware, or at least
borrow it?).  Similarly, part of the deal is to have the enslaved future
Chosen One freed but unfortunately our heroes are forced to leave the boy's
mother behind.  "I tried to win her freedom but Watto wasn't having any of
it," says Neeson's character, or words to that effect.  Sounds rather
pathetic from a Jedi, doesn't it?  "I wanted to kill Darth Vader, but when
I got to the Death Star, he wasn't home."  Puleez.
        The dialogue and plot elements aren't the reason to see the film,
of course.  You expect the general good-guys-have-to-stop-the-bad-guys
scenario (here, taxation plays a key role).  It's all those brave new
worlds, intergalactic shoot-'em-ups, strange reptilian and mechanical
creatures, and characters with funny names you can either cheer or hiss,
that matters.
        And "The Phantom Menace" has got 'em by the score.  It's a frenetic
visual feast indeed; there's nothing quite like it in the galaxy.  Let's
just hope that Episodes II and III spend a little more time on character
development, that's all.

Author
J. Marty
     To paraphrase the Book of Psalms: "Lucas, Lucas, why have you forsaken
us?"
     That could well be said of George Lucas' latest attempt at cinema, THE
PHANTOM MENACE. After a 22-year break, ol' Georgie Porgie returns once again to
direct a STAR WARS film. Unfortunately, the Force seems to be no longer with
him. The 1977 debut film A NEW HOPE was easily a celluloid masterpiece and has
earned its rightful place in Hollywood immortality. But in 1999, like a pale
shadow of the original, came THE PHANTOM MENACE. If A NEW HOPE was filet
mignon, then THE PHANTOM MENACE is just a little above Hamburger Helper.
     And now, breakdown:
PLOT: One of the greatest things about A NEW HOPE was its devilishly basic
story: an evil Empire, led by the merciless warlord Darth Vader, kidnaps
Princess Leia Organa of Alderaan, and it's up to a farm boy, a smuggler, a
Wookiee, a Jedi Knight, and two droids to rescue her and also defeat a massive
planet-destroying superweapon, the Death Star! THE PHANTOM MENACE, on the other
hand, has a plot that goes something like this: Two Jedi Knights arrive as Old
Republic ambassadors to a blockade by the greedy Trade Federation of the planet
Naboo, ruled by the 14-year-old Queen Amidala who is trying to appeal to the
Republican Senate on Coruscant which is filled with corruption, etc. 
     What?! This is the movie's single greatest flaw - the fact that Lucas,
disregarding the time-honored aphorism that less is more, has crammed every
last inkling of plot he can into what is supposed to be a simple space opera
for kids from 4 to 94. Whatever happened to the gee-whiz, tried-and-true sci-fi
formula that was employed - and worked to maximum effect - in 1977? If it ain't
broke, George, then don't fix it. Unfortunately, he did.
CHARACTERS: Many of the characters in this movie are so bland that you actually
don't care when bad things happen to them. The most likable character by far is
Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), a courageous yet earnest Jedi Knight who leads his
companions into battle and is also responsible for the discovery of young
Jedi-to-be Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd). A classic hero, Qui-Gon radiates
charisma, personality, and good humor - much more than could be said for any of
the other characters.
     Obi-Wan Kenobi, the wise old Jedi in the original films, is here portrayed
by Ewan McGregor as a whiny Gen-Xer who questions everything. Though he is more
level-headed in some ways than his master Qui-Gon, I couldn't help thinking
that Ewan really needed to loosen up in his performance as the young Jedi. His
brooding demeanor really brought the role down. 
     Could somebody please tell me why Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman) the
mother of the dynamic duo of Luke Skywalker and Princess Leia, seems more like
a department store mannequin than a monarch? She's actually kind of creepy,
with a makeup job like Marcel Marceau and an accent like Nikita Krushchev. That
flat, emotionless voice got so boring after a while that I kept hoping she'd
burp or get the hiccups or something - anything to break up the monotony. Her
costumes were ridiculous and she could have gotten rich donating the whole lot
to museums. And to top it all off, she is even more grim than the somber
Obi-Wan and waits until the film is 75 percent over before finally cracking a
real smile.
     And then there's the boy. Granted, Anakin Skywalker is a tough role to do
and you can't usually expect an Oscar-caliber performance out of a 10-year-old.
But Jake Lloyd's take on the child hero was a little too cute. At some points,
it was so syrupy that you could have drowned a thousand flapjacks in it. Are we
to believe that a child shrewd enough to speak alien languages and build
machines all by his lonesome would respond to a joyful situation with an
insipid "Yippee!"? And I know this movie was pure fantasy, but Lucas threatened
to stretch our credulity to the breaking point by having Anakin win (let alone
survive) a treacherous pod race and by also having him blow up a gigantic space
station without ever having been in such a battle before (if I could have done
that at his age, my fame would have been celebrated by the carving of my face
on Mount Rushmore). Overall, I find the idea of the little rugrat one day
becoming the notorious supervillain Darth Vader a little hard to swallow. Maybe
he just has a little more growing up to do.
     Mesa no liked Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best). A member of the amphibious
Gungan species native to Naboo's swamps and lakes, Jar Jar spends the entire
movie clowning around and speaking even worse English than Yoda (Frank Oz). His
antics, while gut-bustingly hilarious, become so prevalent that they distract
the audience from everything else that is going on in the movie (and there's a
lot going on, believe me). I realize that Jar Jar was supposed to be a
substitute for Chewbacca the Wookiee in the earlier films, but the correlation
isn't quite as accurate as Lucas intended. Chewie may have been comical at
times, but at least he had authentic human qualities (such as loyalty to Han
Solo or anger at Lando Calrissian's apparent betrayal of Han). Jar Jar, on the
other hand, is just a clueless buffoon. Other than bringing the Gungans and the
humans of Naboo together in a grand alliance against the Trade Federation (a
feat which must really be attributed to Queen Amidala), Jar Jar does nothing
except do his best Bob Marley imitation, hoping that that alone will suffice as
comic relief.
OTHER STUFF: The inconsistencies between THE PHANTOM MENACE and the original
films are legion. Why is it that practically every alien species in TPM speaks
English while Yoda and Admiral Ackbar were the only Anglophone characters in
the originals? How come the Jedi Knighs in TPM all know tae kwon do when
martial arts were never used by Luke and the gang? And what on God's green
earth was Lucas thinking when he decided that the Force should be the
by-product of Jedi cooties rather than a mysterious energy field?
     The special effects also bugged me. Sure, they were spectacular. But that
was precisely the problem. The STAR WARS movies have always been remembered for
their uncompromising realism in creating the look and feel of science fiction,
so making the effects too fanciful somehow takes the edge off Lucas'
distinctive atmosphere. Besides, too much striving to keep up with technology
only tends to date the films. Young people who saw THE PHANTOM MENACE and who
grew up after the 1970s and '80s will eventually see the original films and
dismiss them as outdated, pre-CGI schlock. Not only that, but later generations
will likewise look at this film and find the effects to be a product of their
time.
FINAL THOUGHTS: As a self-confessed STAR WARS geek, I am overjoyed to see the
greatest fantasy phenomenon in movie history return to the big screen. But as a
film historian and movie purist, I can only evaluate THE PHANTOM MENACE
according to its superior predecessors. No matter how good a STAR WARS film is
nowadays, it's invariably going to be compared to the 1977-1983 trilogy, which
will always be the first and foremost in moviegoers' hearts. Alas, THE PHANTOM
MENACE, which is supposed to be a prequel and a mere prelude to the grandeur to
come, has the crippling aura of "remake" about it. When something has been done
right the first time, sometimes it is best to just leave it alone.      

Author
Jamie Peck
STAR WARS: EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
That exclamation will likely be the general reaction of those massive 
throngs slowly shuffling from "Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom
Menace," regardless of whether or not they actually like the movie. This 
long-awaited premiere prequel in George Lucas' indomitable space saga 
has sumptuous sights up the wazoo: beautiful costumes, dazzling 
architecture, imaginative creature design and lush panoramas of worlds 
familiar and unfamiliar. But ogle-worthy opulence is the lone thing that 
audiences will undoubtedly herald post-"Phantom," as the early buzz from 
both critics and preview screenings has been quite mixed. 
Well, fear not, "Wars" watchers - all the iffiness merely comes as a 
side-effect of "Episode I"'s own gargantuan hype. Label any movie "the 
most anticipated event in cinema history" and the build-up is bound to 
let down some, especially those who've been waiting patiently for 
another fix of the Force ever since 1983's "Return of the Jedi." And 
since just about everybody fits into that category, a necessary bit of 
advice would be to approach "The Phantom Menace" aware of these 
king-sized expectations. Do so and you might be tickled pink to discover 
that, while not the pinnacle entry in Lucas' unfolding universe, it 
packs in wall-to-wall intrigue, spectacle and the finest special effects 
money - $115 million, reportedly - can buy.
The story still takes place in a galaxy far, far away, but even more of 
a long time ago - as in several scores before Lucas' other trilogy. The 
nifty opening introduces a younger, brasher version of Obi-Wan Kenobi 
("Trainspotting"'s Ewan McGregor), newly a Jedi Knight and apprentice to 
noble, level-headed Master Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson). The pair arrive 
on a Trade Federation spaceship to hopefully negotiate the end of a 
blockade that's been royally screwing over the nearby utopian planet of 
Naboo. "I have a bad feeling about this," grouses Obi-Wan, his line sure 
to draw chuckles from those keen on their "Star" lore. Turns out his 
reservations are justified.
Before you can mutter "Dagobah," lightsabers are drawn and enemy robots 
are exchanging fire with our Jedi heroes. They, wise to what's going on, 
hightail it to Naboo to rescue its pacifist teen queen (Natalie Portman) 
from certain death, but their escape envoy gets downed and they find 
themselves in a layover on the desert world of Tatooine. There, Qui-Gon 
meets and is quite taken by young slave boy Anakin Skywalker (Jake 
Lloyd) and his mother Shmi (Pernilla August, injecting emotion amid the 
grandeur), and fates are thusly sealed. This little innocent, we know 
from 1980's "The Empire Strikes Back," grows into the evil asthmatic 
known as Darth Vader.
To tip many more of the plot specifics would be oh so wrong, because 
"The Phantom Menace" provides a sense of wonder and astonishment almost 
as never-ceasing as the 1977 epic that started it all. A few old 
favorites are given tidy origin vignettes, while fascinating new beings 
- enough to fill the original's Cantina five times over - are welcomely 
trotted in front of the camera in their mostly computer-generated glory. 
All this and Lucas can still script and stage a riveting action 
sequence, as evidenced by the exhilarating pod race in which Anakin wins 
his freedom. For those who still thrill to "Ben-Hur"'s chariot chase, 
meet its overdue '90s sci-fi equivalent.
"Episode I" strays into childish territory at times (think Ewoks), 
particularly in its dealings with Jar Jar Binks, a beaked, donkey-eared 
amphibious alien whose clumsy antics and occasionally unintelligible 
island dialect might make you laugh or dig your fingernails into your 
armrest. A completely digital creation choreographed and voiced by 
Broadway performer Ahmed Best, he's this movie's comic relief - but not 
as accessible or successful as, say, bickering droids C-3PO and R2-D2 
(seen here) or growling Wookie Chewbacca (not). The wee ones, however, 
should cackle with delight every time Jar Jar flails, fumbles or fumes.
But that's not to suggest that this is strictly a kiddie flick. There's 
menace in "Menace," and a great deal of it emanates from enigmatic
villain Darth Maul. Maul, a cooler baddie than Boba Fett, is also the 
Character Most Likely to Inspire After-Viewing Discussion; as brought to 
life by famed martial artist Ray Park, he's a mass of oozing evil 
accentuated by demonic red-and-black Kabuki make-up and a dark hood that 
hides threatening horns. Many will ponder why he's given such little 
screen time, where they can learn his quick-as-lightening moves and how 
to become a member of his fan club. Maul's climactic lightsaber 
three-way with Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan is truly a brawl to behold.
Neeson and McGregor play off each other nicely, with the former lending 
all the showy showmanship gravity and the latter doing a grin-inducing 
Alec Guinness impersonation. Portman, looking lovely and Geisha-like 
under a series of bold gowns and bolder headdresses, makes a regal if 
delicate ruler - and a fine role model if any little girls wander into 
this ultimate boy fantasy. Lloyd, neither as splendid nor stinky as his 
respective supporters and detractors claim, is the sole acting weak 
link, but whether his relative inexperience or the occasionally 
tin-eared dialogue he's required to enliven are to blame is in the air 
(though he's typically strong when it counts).
Rest assured, the flaws here are minor distractions rather than gaping 
mistakes. The questionable gossip seems to stem from the unavoidable 
disappointment following a nearly decade-and-a-half wait and the 
rumblings that "The Phantom Menace" has a ton of setting-up to do. No 
matter. Once the going gets good, Lucas puts "Episode I" on hyperdrive, 
complete with four simultaneous big-risk battles, a passionate plea in a 
stunningly-realized senate chamber and a concluding montage that readies 
for "Episode II" with lip-smacking, spine-tingling foreshadowing.
It's only what ... another three years?

Author
Christopher Null
     Break out the R2-D2 costume, the Yoda puppet, and Jabba the Hutt:
STAR WARS is back, with EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE.
     If this were any other movie, it would have had the most horrible,
over-long, dumb-sounding title in history.  If this were any other
movie, I'd have been laughing at all the wrong places.  If this were any
other movie... well, this *isn't* any other movie, is it?  Far from it. 
The most anticipated movie, some say, since GONE WITH THE WIND, and when
a screen of blue text reading "A long time ago, in a galaxy far, far
away..." gets enormous applause, that's hard not to believe.
     Let's cut to the chase.  EPISODE I is a worthy entry into the Lucas
oeuvre, but die-hard fans of the series are bound to be disappointed,
mainly because, plot-wise, the episode is largely recycled from the
original STAR WARS and RETURN OF THE JEDI.
     EPISODE I is at its most thrilling when it's doing something
completely new (and nobody's talking).  In this case, it's the
much-vaunted "pod race," where a young Anakin Skywalker (Lloyd, destined
to become Darth Vader in an episode or two) shows off his uncanny
agility, cunning, and precognition.  The pod race lasts maybe seven
minutes, and it had me on the edge of my seat the entire time.
     Lucas has really outdone himself when it comes to integrating
computer imagery with reality.  Screw JURASSIC PARK: This stuff looks
real.  I had originally thought the skinny droids from the commercials
looked a bit fake.  Not so on the big screen.  Finally someone has
crossed the line where reality and fantasy are indistinguishable.
     Sadly, there's not as much luck with the Gungan, the race of
amphibioid creatures which our heroes (Qui-Gon Jinn and Obi-Wan Kenobi
(Neeson and McGregor, respectively)) band with to save the planet of
Queen Amidala (Portman).  The Gungan, personified in the Chewy-esque,
floppy-eared Jar Jar Binks is not the best-animated digital persona I've
ever seen.  And he speaks a pidgin English that becomes bothersome after
five minutes, incomprehensible after ten.
     And let's not forget that Lucas's last film was JEDI, a good movie
when it came out in 1983, but hardly the best of the series. 
Apparently, 16 years haven't resulted in many new ideas:  The climactic
end of EPISODE I features (no surprise this one) intercutting among a
space battle, an all-out land war, and a light-saber duel.  Sound
familiar?  Well, that's the way all these movies have ended, more or
less.  And frankly, it's getting a bit predictable and tiresome.  I
won't tell you whether good or evil wins this time out.
     My disappointment with the ending notwithstanding, EPISODE I is a
heart-thumper of a film.  It really gets the blood going, and, for all
its cliches, my soul was with the good guys here.  Yes, I'm ready for
EPISODE II, as watching young Skywalker become corrupted by the dark
side has got to be one hell of a story.  Again, it's a cliché, but that
Good vs. Evil thing gets me every time.
     No, it's already been said that THE PHANTOM MENACE is not a "Great
Film."  It's an event movie.  One made to be enjoyed on a visceral
level, not something that you watch for its witty dialogue (think Mark
Hamill).
     In the end, you'll have to decide how you're going to watch the
movie.  A piece of advice:  Use the Force.
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Star Wars:  Episode I -- The Phantom Menace (1999)
Director: George Lucas
Cast: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Samuel L. Jackson, Oliver Ford Davies, Terence Stamp,
Pernilla August, Frank Oz, Ahmed Best, Kenny Baker, Anthony Daniels
Screenplay: George Lucas
Producers: Rick McCallum
Runtime: 131 min.
US Distribution: 20th Century Fox
Rated PG: mild violence, thematic elements
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
A fellow critic once stated his belief that a reviewer should not speak
of himself in his own review.  I've attempted to obey this rule in
recent months, but to do so would be impossible in this case.  The fact
is, nearly every person who goes to see The Phantom Menace brings
baggage in with them.  The original Star Wars trilogy means so much to
so many people.  For me, they calibrated my creativity as a child; they
are masterful, original works of art that mix moving stories with what
were astonishing special effects at the time (and they still hold up
pretty darn well).  I am too young to have seen Star Wars in the theater
during its original release, but that doesn't make me any less dedicated
to it.  On the contrary, the Star Wars trilogy -- and The Empire Strikes
Back in particular -- are three items on a very short list of why I love
movies.
When I heard that George Lucas would be making the first trilogy in the
nine-film series, I got exited.  When I first saw screenshots from the
film, well over a year ago, I embarked on a year-long drool of
anticipation.  And when the first previews were released last
Thanksgiving, I was ready to see the film.  But then there was the Hype,
the insane marketing campaign, and Lucasfilm's secretive snobbery over
the picture.  In the last weeks before the picture opened, while
multitudes of fans waited outside of theaters and stood in the boiling
sun days in advance just to be the first ones in the theater, I was
tired of hearing about it.  I was tired of seeing cardboard cut-outs of
the characters whenever I went to KFC or Taco Bell.  I just wanted to
see the movie.  Reader, do not misunderstand.  I did not have an
anti-Hype reaction.  The Hype was unavoidable.  I understand and accept
the Hype -- it's just what happens when the prequel to the most widely
beloved films of all time get released.  
Five minutes into The Phantom Menace, I knew there was a problem.  "Who
are these Jedi knights?" I asked.  "Why are they churning out stale
dialogue with machine-gun rapidity?"  "Why aren't these characters being
developed before their adventures?"  "Why is there a special effects
shot in nearly every frame of the entire film?"  These were just some of
my questions early on.  Later, I asked, "Where's the magic of the first
three films?" and "Why am I looking at my watch every fifteen minutes?' 
By the end of the film, I was tired, maddened, and depressed.
George Lucas has funneled his own wonderful movies into a pointless,
mindless, summer blockbuster.  The Phantom Menace is no Star Wars film. 
Take away the title and the Jedi talk and the Force, and you're left
with what is easily one of the most vacuous special effects movies of
all time.  It's an embarrassment.  I looked desperately for a scene in
which a character is explored, or a new theme is examined, or a special
effects shot isn't used.  There are a few of each, but they're all token
attempts.  The fact is, George Lucas has created what is simultaneously
an abysmally bad excuse for a movie and a pretty good showcase for
digital effects.  This is not what I wanted to see.  I didn't want to
leave The Phantom Menace with a headache and a bitter taste in my mouth,
but I did.
The story centers mostly around Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson, looking lost
and confused) and his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor, who
scarcely has a line in the film) and their attempts to liberate the
people of the planet Naboo.  Naboo is the victim of a bureaucratic war
with the Trade Federation; their contact on Naboo is Queen Amidala
(Natalie Portman), the teenage ruler who truly cares for her people. 
After picking up Jar Jar Binks (a completely CGI character, voiced by
Ahmed Best), they head to Tatooine, where they meet young Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) and his mother (Pernilla August).  Qui-Gon knows
that the Force is strong with young Anakin, and so the Jedi Knights take
the boy with them on their journeys.  The bad guys are Darth Maul and
Darth Sidious, neither of whom have enough lines to register as
characters.
There isn't anything particularly wrong with this story when looking at
it in synopsis form.  The way Lucas has handled it, however, it
unsatisfactory.  First of all, we don't learn one single thing about
Qui-Gon Jinn.  Not one thing.  What was his life like before this film? 
Well, I imagine he didn't have one.  That's why he feels like a plot
device.  This probably explains why Neeson looks so hopeless in the
role, and why he's recently retired from film (I don't blame him,
honestly).  Obi-Wan, a character I was really looking forward to
learning more about, is even less interesting.  McGregor has just a few
lines, so anyone hoping to see the engaging young actor in a great
performance is urged to look elsewhere.  Since these two men are the
focus of The Phantom Menace, Lucas has served us a big emotional void as
the centerpiece of his movie.  
Things start to pick up when our characters reach Tatooine; young
Anakin is perhaps the only truly fleshed-out character in the film, and
Lloyd does a thoughtful job with the role.  I was also hugely impressed
with the sand speeder scene; rarely is an action sequence so fast and so
exciting.  And when Anakin says goodbye to his mother, I found it
moving.  Also fairly good is Portman, and she manages to give a little
depth to a character where no depth has been written.  Jar Jar Binks is
one of the most annoying characters I've ever had to endure, but he's
more interesting than most of the humans.
As soon as the relatively-brief segment on Tatooine is over, it's back
to the mind-numbing special effects and depthless action scenes.  I've
seen many movies that qualify as "special effects extravaganzas," but
The Phantom Menace is the first one I've seen that had me sick of the
special effects fifteen minutes into the movie.  The reason is obvious: 
George Lucas has no restraint.  I can't say that I didn't find the
effects original, because I did -- the final battle between Darth Maul,
Obi-Wan, and Qui-Gon is visually exceptional, as is most of the film. 
But I also found the effects deadening and tiresome. 
My breaking point was near the end of the picture, as Anakin is getting
questioned by Yoda and the other Jedi masters; in the background, we see
hundreds of digital spaceships flying around through a digital sky, and
I wanted that to go away.  Can't we have one stinking scene that isn't
bursting at the seems with a special effects shot?  I got so sick of
looking at the CGI characters and spaceships and planets and backgrounds
that I really just wanted to go outside and look at a physical landscape
for a few hours.  
And then there's the question of magic.  What was lost in the sixteen
years between The Phantom Menace and Return of the Jedi?  I have a
feeling that Lucas was so focused on how his movie looked that he forgot
entirely the way it should feel.  John Williams' familiar score is no
help, nor is Lucas' direction.  I think it comes right down to
characters:  there are none here.  I longed for the magnetic presence of
Han, Luke, and Leia, but I got no such thing.  And what about the
ridiculous expectations?  Mine weren't that high; I simply wanted a film
that showed me the roots of the films that I grew up loving, a story
that had a few characters and a few great special effects.  Instead, I
got two hours and fifteen minutes of a lifeless and imaginative computer
graphics show.  I don't hate The Phantom Menace as much as I resent it: 
I'd like to forget that it exists, and yet I can't.  It's here to stay. 
I can only hope that Episodes II and III have something of substance in
them, because if they don't, then Lucas will have pulled off the
impossible task of destroying his own indestructible series.

Author
R.L. Strong

STAR WARS: EPISODE I    THE PHANTOM MENACE
Liam Neeson    Ewan McGregor   Natalie Portman   Jake Lloyd
Ian McDiarmid   Anthony Daniels  Kenny Baker  Ray Park   Samuel L. Jackson
Original music by John Williams   
Cinematography by David Tattersall
Executive Producer  Rick McCallum  
Film Editing by Ben Burtt & Paul Martin Smith
Produced by George Lucas      
Written and Directed by George Lucas
A LUCASFILM PRODUCTION     
RELEASED BY 20TH CENTURY FOX
"A long time ago.. in a galaxy far far away". No other phrase can
conjure such images of bravery and adventure. George Lucas, the
creator of the epic 'Star Wars' series has crafted an effortlessly
complex and remarkably simple tale of heroes and villains. A series of
films that deserve their classic status, if for no other reason than
their value as pure escapism. 22 years after the release of the
original 'Star Wars (Episode III: A New Hope), George Lucas has
returned to the saga that has remained vivid in the imaginations of
all who have seen it.  "STAR WARS EPISODE I: THE PHANTOM MENACE"
brings us to the beginnings of the tale, giving us the history before
Luke Skywalker.
The opening title crawl of the film continues the serial approach
established by the earlier Star Wars films. "Turmoil has engulfed the
Galactic Republic. The taxation of trade routes to outlying star
systems is in dispute. Hoping to resolve the matter with a blockade of
deadly battleships, the greedy Trade Federation has stopped all
shipping to the small planet of Naboo.  While the Congress of the
Republic endlessly debates this alarming chain of events, the Supreme
Chancellor has secretly dispatched two Jedi Knights, the guardians of
peace, to settle the conflict...."
It is here that we are immersed into the political world of 'Star
Wars', for the first time. As Jedi Knight Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson)
and his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) board a Trade
Federation ship in an effort to negotiate a treaty. Unbeknownst to the
Jedi, is that the negotiations are not to take place. On the command
of Darth Sidious, the Jedi are attacked. In an epic battle, the two
men escape on board an armored transport. A full-scale invasion of
Naboo is emanating. Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan must reach the city to warn
the Queen Amidala of the subterfuge that is taking place.
Reaching the palace with the assistance of an exiled Gungan, Jar-Jar
Binks. The two Jedi succeed in contacting the Queen who requests that
they return to the Congress of the Galactic Republic and report to the
senators of the events.  Along for the trip is the Queen's envoy
Padmé Naberrie (Natalie Portman) and Jar-Jar Binks. It is during
the escape that from Naboo that the ship is damaged and forced to land
on the planet Tatooine. While attempting to repair their ship, Qui-Gon
meets Annakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), a boy / slave working for a junk
dealer.  Impressed with the boy's expertise with machinery and sensing
something unique, Qui-Gon tests the boy believing the young Annakin to
be "The Chosen One" predicted in Jedi mythology, "the one who will
bring balance to the Force".
What must be said first and foremost about "The Phantom Menace" is
that its visual effects are absolutely mind-boggling. There has never
been a film that has created such vistas so continually as this film
has. The cities, forests, and swamps of Naboo are wondrously
realized. So much detail to attention has been lavished that one feels
that these worlds are real. The cityscapes of Naboo, Tatooine and
especially the galactic capital of Coruscant with it's Senate Chambers
and Jedi Temple. Every single location of the plot is fully
realized. The only film that could come close to this level of
visualization would be the silent classic "Metropolis" (1925),
"Forbidden Planet" (1958), and "2001: A Space Odyssey" (1968). I can't
mention any film since the original 'Star Wars' (1976) as every film
since then has used that film as a template.  What George Lucas has
done here, is enlarge his template and his mythology to include so
much more depth and resonance.  This is not to say that the film does
not have flaws. The performances in the film are adequate if not fully
drawn out. Liam Neeson plays his part of Qui-Gon Jinn with a stoic
demeanor that could be seen as lethargic. I did not find this
performance as troublesome as others did, simply because of the
characterization of the Jedi. The doctrine that one must not give into
their fear or anger, gives resonance to Neeson's performance. Being a
mentor to Obi-Wan, he must hold himself to a higher level. His
demeanor throughout the film is one of cautious resolution. He knows
that his fate is leading him is a particular direction and he refuses
to move against his fate. This is a classic characterization of the
'Ahab' principle. Qui-Gon has found the 'Chosen One' and must, by any
means bring this savior (?) to his full potential.
Ewan McGregor makes an enigmatic Obi-Wan, a man who is just coming
into his prime. Just mature enough to understand his responsibility
but not enough to realize the consequences of his actions. McGregor
does carry the film, even from the background. His character is the
only one that we readily recognize from the previous Star Wars
films. And that being said, McGregor does a reasonable job in the
performance, one that I am certain will grow (as Mark Hamill's did in
the original trilogy) in depth and nuance.
Natalie Portman as Queen Amidala and her guardian Padmé Naberrie
has the hardest role in the film. Having to portray a character of 14
that must rule over a planet and it's citizenry is some
problematic. Having to establish Queen Amidala as a stern and
compassionate leader, it becomes very surprising when as Padmé, she
must emote some of the inquisitiveness that someone her age would
naturally have, while still holding a level of maturity. Portman does
this fairly well, and in moments actually raises the character to a
more mythic level. A performance similarly to Carrie Fisher's,
Princess Leia in the original Star Wars.
The other performances in the film are either background characters or
Computer generated. Much has been said about the character Jar-Jar
Binks. Most of it negatively so. For my viewing, I found the character
less than delightful, but far from insufferable. I think the most
bothersome characteristic about the creature is its design. The legs
are just far too long for any creature to walk on land, hence his
natural clumsiness. That being said, I found the character's comic
value appropriate to the film, in as much with all of the stern and
troubled characters in the plot, having one that was behaving like
"Jerry Lewis" in a Godzilla suit was appropriate. If only to lighten
the film.
The set and costume design for the film is ravishing. There is so much
to take in, in every scene that it forces the viewer to concentrate on
the main characters and the story (which may have been reason for some
of the more faint reviews). The visuals of the film, as stated before
are staggering in their complexity and all invasiveness. I don't
believe there is one scene in "The Phantom Menace" that does not carry
a visual effect. That being said, the effects are seamless, blending
into the film in such a way that one feels that huge sets and dioramas
have been constructed for the actors to perform in. No faint praise.
George Lucas has managed to create a good old-fashioned adventure
film. While his dialogue is at time trite and forced ('There's always
a bigger fish'), it works in the context that this film (as all of the
other Star Wars films) is a fantasy for children. Lucas has managed to
delve deep into his belief in eastern philosophies and bring new depth
to the mythology of the Star Wars saga. Having a biological essence as
being a precursor for being a Jedi is interesting, if not completely
acceptable. Also, there is the continuing adaptation of
Judeo-Christian faith and mythology into the story in the idea that
Annakin Skywalker may have been birth by a virgin. But these tracks
are but fleeting thoughts in the film, brought to fore only in a
single line of dialogue. This, like the reference to the "Clone Wars"
in the original film may be there just to create a more complete
universe.
Lucas's direction is straight forewarn and unobtrusive. His staging of
the many battles and fight scenes are masterfully achieved. While the
climatic light saber battle between Obi-Wan, Qui-Gon and the evil
Darth Maul is powerful and exciting, after years of seeing martial
arts displayed on screen from Jackie Chan to this years "The Matrix",
the fights have nothing new to offer. Also, I found the fights lacking
in character in all but the suspense sequence wherein Qui-Gon and
Darth Maul must suspend their battle, separated by force fields.  This
particular scene leads a certain tension to the battle, as well as
giving an opportunity to move to one of the other simultaneously
accruing plot threads.  Unfortunately, it's a short-lived moment. The
fight scenes could have used more character. Hopefully, in the next
films in the series an action choreographer can be brought in to help
define the different styles and individualities that each character
would really have.  Lucas has also peppered the film with loving
references and tributes to earlier films and influences.  One
marvelous (and blatant) scene is when Qui-Gon uses his light saber to
melt through a series of metal doors on the Trade Federation ship. The
scene wonderfully recreates the famous climax of "Forbidden Planet",
wherein, the invisible Creature from the Id, melts through the
impenetrable doors of the Krell lab to get at it's victims.
This brings me to what I found to be the weakest thread in the film,
and that is the performance by Jake Lloyd as Annakin Skywalker. While
I can see the plotting that is taking place, some of Annakin's scenes
do not work simply because they are either too abrupt or Lloyd's
performance is not tuned well enough to embrace it. The most jarring
moment comes when Annakin agrees to leave his Mother, Shmi Skywalker
(Pernilla August) to go with Qui-Gon to the Jedi counsel. The
emotional drama and angst here is almost non existent, being brought
to it's conclusion with the dialogue exchange of Annakin: 'Will I ever
see you again?"  Shmi: "What does your heart tell you?!"  While it
fits into the mythology, it doesn't fit into the drama of the scene.
The structure of the film is similar to "Return of the Jedi". In fact,
in retrospect it seems that 'Return of the Jedi' was the template for
the film. The differences between the two are the depth with which the
political drama is played out. For this reason "The Phantom Menace" is
a richer film.
I must comment on the negative quotient of the film. There have been
several vocal reviews of the film. Some valid, some not. Some
reviewers have gone out of their way to disdain the film simply for
the sake of it. I recall back in 1977, with the release of the first
'Star Wars' that most critics praised the film for its special effects
but disliked the poor characterizations and performances.  One critic,
David Sheenan even claimed that the film served no purpose other than
to show how to choreograph laser beams and explosions. That being
said, I must say that while some have not enjoyed the film as much as
others have, that is no fault of the film. There has to be a certain
suspension of disbelief involved. And for some (especially those that
do not care for Sci-fi or fantasy) is equivalent to lifting an anchor
over their heads.
Now for all intents and purposes, is 'The Phantom Menace' a good
film. Yes! Is it the best 'Star Wars' movie. No. "The Empire Strikes
Back" still holds that distinction. Now is this film a worthy
successor. Yes. In fact "The Phantom Menace" manages to do something
that no other film in recent years has been able to do. Take us to a
place and time we've never been before and make it seem familiar.
On a scale of 1 to 5, 'STAR WARS EPISODE 1: THE PHANTOM MENACE" rates
4 stars. A good forebear of things to come and a marvelous return to
classic filmmaking with new and wondrous technology.
Copyright 1999 R. L Strong
All rights reserved Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without
the express written permission of the author.
--
Visit the Dungeonmaster Cornucopia of Film
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews/main.html

Author
Walter Frith
'Star Wars - Episode I - The Phantom Menace' (1999)
When 'The Godfather Part III' was released in 1990, people knocked it as
disappointing and not living up to the standards of the first two films.
There was a 16 year gap between II and III and Francis Ford Coppola was able
to find a fresh story and I thought the film was well executed.  When such
great films play on our sub conscious minds for years and we replay every
exciting moment in our heads over and over again, it is human nature to
expect the roll to continue.  How many of us want our favorite sports team
to win the championship every year?  It simply won't happen.
George Lucas once commented that he wanted to wait many years after 1983's
'Return of the Jedi' to tell the story contained within the first three
chapters of his 'Star Wars' saga because he wanted film technology to excel
and become what it has today.  There is a 16 year gap between 'Return of the
Jedi' and 'The Phantom Menace' and the original three 'Star Wars' films
generate as much debate as they do entertainment.  Many are split on what
film is better, 'Star Wars' or 'The Empire Strikes Back'.  Certainly 'The
Empire Strikes Back' was a better character enhancement of its leading cast
and isn't it odd that Lucas had no hand in the film's finished screenplay or
the direction of the film.  Lucas was responsible for the film's story line,
however.  Those credits for the movie's finished script belong to Lawrence
Kasdan and Leigh Brackett and the man who directed it was Irvin Kershner.
Most agree that 'Return of the Jedi' was the weakest chapter and Lucas not
directing it makes you wonder if he's a better businessman that filmmaker
with the success of all the merchandising tie-ins and his creation of many
post production facilities for motion pictures
'The Phantom Menace' begins about thirty years before the original three
films started.  The peaceful planet of Naboo is involved in a dispute with
the sinister trade federation.  Two ambassadors who are also Jedi knights,
Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and young Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) are sent
to peacefully negotiate the trade dispute but the trade federation, who
would eventually become the evil empire seen later in episodes IV, V and VI
try to wipe them out and pursue the good Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman)
into signing a treaty that will do more harm that good for her people.
Senator Palpatine/Darth Sidious (Ian McDiarmid) is the most evil of the
federation members.  A trait that would serve him well in eventually
becoming the Emperor, Darth Vader's lord and master.
Throughout the course of the Jedi's adventures, they come upon a young slave
boy named Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) whom they will train to become a
Jedi knight since the force is with him so strongly.  This idea is brought
fourth by Qui-Gon Jinn but Jedi master Yoda is unable to see his future
through the force and fears the boy may be an element drawn to the dark side
of the force and is against his training as a Jedi.
The story is sort of self defeating in many ways because we know how the
events will play out later so this is a major setback for the film.  It also
has a silly and unnecessary computer generated character named Jar Jar Binks
thrown in for no other reason than to mildly entertain children and even
then, some little ones may find his antics too silly.  On the redeeming side
of things are a space pod race halfway through the film that is absolutely
mesmerizing and a climax that manages to include four major conflicts that
keep our eyes glued to the screen.  Combined with the introduction of a new
master villain named Darth Maul (Ray Park, Peter Serafinowicz), and a look
at the origins of R2-D2 and C-3PO and Jabba the Hut also making an
appearance, the film is marginally well done from an academic stand point
and superb from a technical outlook.
Does 'The Phantom Menace' live up to its hype?  No.  It has major character
weaknesses that make many of the film's actors look like life size action
figures with little personality or complexity.  The story is well told in
part but is a bit tiresome and bears the markings of trying to go home again
which is usually not possible.  For technical zest and the memory of old
friends seen in the film, I recommend 'The Phantom Menace' to be savoured as
an experience  that will only be a one time deal for many but I am also
recommending it as giving George Lucas the benefit of the doubt that he will
improve in the weak areas when episodes II and III are released in the
coming years.  Maybe his plan is to build a slow burn uphill and not
downhill.  Time will tell.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Fontaine Lien
"Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace" Review
by Fontaine Lien
More reviews: http://members.aol.com/saitiau/cinema.html
(SPOILERS.  SOME YOU'VE HEARD ABOUT, SOME YOU PROBABLY HAVEN'T.)
**This review is dedicated to Lori "McGregor," who yelled "SEXY!!"
whenever Obi-Wan appeared on-screen.**
Imagine someone who's never seen or heard about Star Wars before
coming up to you and asking you what "Phantom Menace" was about and
what kind of movie it was like.  It would mostly likely be difficult to
describe creature fighting with atomic gumballs, a little boy who is
allowed to race "pods" at hundreds of miles per hour, and villains who are
never entirely introduced without some misgivings.  But this is "The
Phantom Menace," the prequel sequel to what is perhaps the most
successful science fiction franchise in the history of the western
hemisphere.  This is LucasFilms moviemaking, where they rely on
mindboggling effects, breathtaking graphics, and moviegoers' partiality to
win the hearts.  
This comes from me, X-Phile extraordinaire who has never been
especially inebriated by the Star Wars phenomenon.  I am no "Star Wars
groupie," as a friend attempted to label me a few days ago.   I have no
Skywalker or Han Solo action figures.  I never dressed up as Princess Leia
during Halloween.  I never _wanted_ to be Princess Leia.  I don't own the
trilogy.  I don't _remember_ most of the trilogy.  I did not see "Phantom
Menace" the first day it came out.   But nonetheless, the characters in
Star Wars has become as familiar to me as they have become to the
millions of Star Wars fans out there.  R2D2, C3PO, ewoks, Yoda, Obi-Wan,
Darth Vader, Jabba the Hut.  Oft-used terminology.  To sum it all up, I find
it extremely difficult not to extol this movie with high enthusiasm and let
that be the end of it.   
The idea that the "complete" story will be told in three sequels is
enticing, ingenious, but unfortunately, the integrity of "Phantom" was
sacrificed because of the same reason.  Those of you who were under the
delusion that we would find out how little Anakin becomes evil will be
disappointed.  Most of the characters were given little treatment, with
the primary focus being in Anakin.  At the end of the movie, we know
little about Qui Gon Jinn, Obi-Wan, or even Queen Amidala (except that she
is an extremely dedicated queen.) These are all characters that I would've
liked to spent more time with.  Darth Maul, who makes an interesting
villain, only appeared when he was required to look intimidating or to be
the enemy of the good forces.  He makes an appearance in only two to three
fantastic "duels" but is killed off too swiftly, too easily.  Goodbye,
painted face.  The primary villain in the movie is thus wasted.  The
federation, it seems, is entirely subject to the control of the hooded
hologram, and the hologram's purpose remains unknown (a story to be told
in Episode II, I suppose.)
Most of the action scenes are filled with typical Lucasian
improbabilities.  The Naboo troops never seem to take aim when they fire,
and yet they rarely suffer even a bruise.  The ultimate improbability
comes when the movie pulls an Independence Day -- oh no, we can't
disable their shields, here comes little Anakin who can do it just be flying
into the ships interior and flying randomly, thus enabling a swift victory
on ground.  Of course I realize that all of these events are essential for
the movie to continue, and they weren't quite so annoying given the
context.  This is Star Wars, after all.  The cheesy dialogue is no rumor,
folks; it seems great directors are incapable of writing sensible dialogue
(see Chris Carter's monologues or James Cameron's "Titanic.") Any angst I
felt during the Anakin/mom parting scene dissipated with the soap opera-
ish writing.  In contrast, the Qui Gon Jinn death scene was more effective
because it had more matter, and less art.   Again, the cheesiness seems
oddly in place in the scheme of things.  Nobody goes to this movie
expecting "The English Patient."
Most annoying character of the year goes to--yep, you guessed it--
Jar-Jar.  He is comical, yes, maybe even funny (though I find most of the
humor forced), if he hadn't been used so much and if his jokes were more
aptly-placed.  Portman, McGregor and Neeson were all reasonably
satisfying in their roles: Portman successfully portrayed the different
qualities of the queen all-dolled up, the decoy queen, and the gentle
"handmaiden" queen.   She looked for all the world a 14 year-old teenager
forced to take on the responsibilities of a planet yet strong enough to
shoulder it.  Neeson was also convincing as the wise Jedi Knight, and his
"moves" were none too shabby for a man his age; McGregor was often
reduced to saying "Yes, master," but when the occasion called for it he put
an admirable amount of intensity into Obiwan Kenobi, foreshadowing the
future that is to come.  All three were aptly cast.  Jake Lloyd is extremely
adorable, but sometimes the artificiality of his acting comes through; but
I suppose that's okay, because 12 year-olds don't have a tremendous
degree of depth anyhow.  In any case he compensates with his innocence
and charm, which is all the more poignant given the fact that Anakin turns
into the monstrous Darth Vader.  Most of the other minor characters (for
example, Anakin's mother and the captain), however, seemed lifeless. 
I think most will agree that the most successful element of the film
was its graphics and effects.  Lucas combined his powerful vision with
state-of-the-art technology and the best artists in the trade to produce a
world more breathtaking than even the previous Star Wars trilogy. 
Tattooine excites a degree of nostalgia; and the underwater city, the
Capitol, and the Naboo city are all works of arts on their own.  Each city
offers its share of curious creatures: the amphibians, the oddballs at the
Tattooine marketplace, the creatures of the Jedi Council (I especially got
a kick out of Mr. Conehead).  The dress and language seem to be successful
combinations of different world cultures -- I did not have a big problem
with the accents as others do.  I think it is mere coincidence that many of
the creatures ended up sounding like some ethnic groups on this planet. 
After all, if an actor is to emulate an accent, he's got to model it after
something he knows.   It just goes to show the diversity that exists in the
Star Wars universe.  Some people also find the CGI art to be to unrealistic,
but this also wasn't a problem with me -- this is a fantasy, and how can
you make a fantasy world look realistic?  It would take away the surreal
quality of it.  
While I am mindful of the flaws this film has (plot,
characterization, acting), I admit that for the most part they went
unnoticed during the 2 hours and some minutes I was in the theater
(except Jar Jar -- you just *can't* tune him out).  I was simply too much
in awe that I was watching Star Wars, that I had a chance to participate in
this even like my parent's generation had been able to do with the first
three Star Wars movies.  Seeing Portman and Mcgregor I couldn't but see
shades of young Hamill, Harrison, and Fisher.  However, I am not saying the
flaws are excusable; I make no attempt to disguise the fact that I am
extremely biased when it comes to Star Wars.  It's Star Wars.  Basically it
comes down to this: if you are as enchanted with the universe that Lucas
singlehandedly created as I am, you will enjoy this film; if you go in as a
casual viewer, you'd enjoy the film as well; but if you watch the movie as
a critic, you probably won't enjoy the movie.  I say let go for a while.  Let
the force take over for a bit.
(I will say that again and again, and I am sure its meaning will not
escape anyone who is in tune with pop culture to any extent.  When you see
the movie in this light, it becomes not just a movie but part of a whole, an
event that symbolizes the creation of an entire new world.  A continuation
(precursor?) of the saga.  A chance for two generations to connect in the
collective worship of a phenomenon.  As mentioned in the beginning, this
film relies heavily on the success of its predecessors to engage the
audience and to make them care for its characters.  I'd say, for me at
least, that they've succeeded.  I think I've found the ideal fantasy heros
for my generation.)
It's light and magic, sound and effects, heroes and princesses,
science fiction and drama, the allegorical good and evil.  And y'know?  It's
funny how, in the end, no matter what misgivings and cynicism I might
have had about the film, it all added up to one neat little ball of elation
and belief.  
*Tip I got from somebody: Stay till the end of the credits.  You'll get a
"surprise" (or more like a foreshadowing).
*The federation aliens look a lot like the "little green men" we are so
familiar with today.
*Thanks to Catherine for the "amphibians" idea, and Spero for the
character names.  

Author
Michael Redman
"The Phantom Menace" is possibly the most anticipated film of the last 50
years. "Star Wars" has transcended cinema to become one of the world's
mythologies. Obi-Wan Kenobi may not be more popular than Jesus Christ, but
he's giving him a run for his money.
For the two people who don't know, here's the Cliff Notes. This film
takes place a few decades before the first Star Wars movie. Obi-Wan
Kenobi (now Ewan McGregor) is a young Jedi apprentice to master Qui-Gon Jinn
(Liam Neeson). The two are dispatched to the planet Naboo which is being
blockaded by the Trade Federation. There they meet teen queen Amidala (Natalie
Portman) and amphibian Jar Jar Binks (played by a computer program).
Then they make a stop on Tatooine and encounter Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd),
a slave boy exceptionally strong in the Force and destined to become Darth
Vader. The bad guys are Sith Lords Darth Sidious and Darth Maul. There are
lots of light saber battles, weird creatures and space ships.
First of all: yes, it's great fun. The effects are magnificent, the best of
their type ever seen. A phenomenal high-tech hot rod race is guaranteed to
wake up the dead.  The battle between Darth Maul and the two Jedi is the most
stunning yet. The eye candy is beyond reproach. Forget the popcorn. Forget the
cokes. Forget the restroom. Don't take your eyes off the screen.
It's strange watching the first part of a story you know the ending to. When
young Skywalker's mother tells her son to go with the Jedi and live his dream,
you can almost hear a deep voice saying "To rule the universe."
As usual, director George Lucas cobbles together pieces of various cultures to
create an eerie but familiar atmosphere. When hordes of faceless droids under
the command of the Trade Federation Viceroy with an Asian accent attack the
peace-loving orange-robed inhabitants of Naboo, it feels like an intergalactic
re-enactment of the Chinese invasion of Tibet.
But then there's the rest of the movie.
Acting has never been the strong point of the "Star Wars" films. Mark Hamill
worked well as Luke Skywalker, but if you want to judge his acting skills,
take a look at the Marsh commercials.
It's especially disappointing in "Phantom Menace" because of the caliber of
actors. Neeson is remarkably flat. Samuel Jackson in a cameo as a Jedi master
is horrendous. Darth Maul seems to exist primarily to sell action figures.
There is an odd emotional distance to the movie. It's telling that the only
character who shows much humanity is the computer-generated alien Jar Jar.
There's no one the audience can identify with. The Jedi are too squeaky clean;
the villains, too dastardly and the kid, too damned cute. Where's Han Solo
when you need him?
There are flaws with the story. The Force is a mystical energy. Attempting to
explain it away with scientific babble is a bone-headed mistake. Too many
things happen by happy accident. The attack droids fall over at the slightest
provocation and are terrible shots. You know how the battles are going to turn
out: the good guys win.
Or do they? The major problem with the plot is that a very important element
isn't clear. Exactly who or what is the "phantom menace" is guesswork. The
relationship between the future Emperor and another character is key to
understanding what is going on and that relationship is only hinted at.
Revealed in the "Star Wars" novels, but not in the film, this knowledge
completely changes what the film is about.
Having said all of that, I'm going to make a confession and the first few
words of the next paragraph will forever brand me as an unrepentant fanboy.
Watching the film the second time a few days later, all of my problems with it
melted away. Jar Jar became enjoyable rather than annoying. Having figured out
the relationship mentioned above, the movie was much more intricate.
Expectations gone, I could settle back and have a great time.
Despite numerous flaws, it's still "Star Wars" and I was a kid again. That's
good enough for me.
(Darth Redman has written this column since before the first "Star Wars". He
considering starting to re-live his own prequel.)
[This appeared in the 5/27/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Author
Brian Adelstein
Star Wars I-  The Phantom Menace (Review)
Short Background/ Why Star Wars fans SHOULD love this Movie
    I would like to personally start off by mentioning that I am NOT a
die hard Star Wars fan and have never been one.  I did enjoy the
original trilogy, but I found Empire Strikes Back (1980) to be one of
the most boring films of all time as no one really died and no special
"war" took place.  The whole Hoth scene was simply filler.  I think
people have been mystified by the unbelievable relevation "Luke, I am
your father!" and have gone ga-ga over it more than anything else  As
for Return of the Jedi, I think my enjoyment quickly ended when Teddy
Ruxpin and his buddies started slugging the empire.  I mean, come on!  I
was laughing my way through the whole thing.  That leaves us here,
almost sixteen years later.  Would Star Wars go back to its cutsie roots
from Jedi or bore us to sleep like Empire?  I am happy to say,
definately NEITHER.
    Star Wars: The Phantom Menace has to be considered one of the best
films of the year, definately better than the last two sagas.  I mean,
think about this:  There were REAL ACTORS in this film!! Sit back and
think about it: Mark Hamill has done nothing since the trilogy and
Carrie Fisher has disappeared off the face of the earth too.  The only
actor of any merit who survived was Harrison Ford, and he hadn't learned
how to act by the original trilogy either.
     Liam Neeson and Ewan MacGregor were masterful in their roles and
kept me smiling the whole way through.  Ewan even mimiced Sir Alec to a
certain extent!  As for the rest, Natalie Portman did her job and little
Jake Lloyd was fine too.  I mean, did you really expect to hear those
infamous hissing noises from a little boy?  Give me a break...he played
the role very well.  Lastly, I really LIKED Jar-Jar Binks.  His so
called "accent" was not intentional in my humble opininon.  He was just
a little side kick who did his job.  For your information, I truly HATED
C-3PO from the original trilogy.  Talk about an annoying piece of space
trash!  All he could say was "You did it!" and "Oh my, Ive forgotten how
much I hate space travel" yada, yada, yada.  Let it go.  I let C-3PO go
too.
    What made this episode really special were the action scenes and
REAL intellectual stimulation.  Just in case you didn't catch it, (and
LOTS of you didn't, unfortunately) "Master" Darth Sidious IS the Emperor
from the first Trilogy and Senator Palpatine is one and the same.  That
is the whole concept of the Phantom Menace: Darth Sidious was the one
wrecking havoc on the Star Wars universe by making an issue out of an
otherwise non-important "trade" dispute and influencing Princess Amidala
to have himself promoted in the Senate.  Consequently, the victory on
the planet down below was a hollow one and probably "forseen!".  As far
as the action scenes, they were much better than the original trilogy as
well.  Darth Sidious may not have talked, but he was pure evil
nontheless.  As far as I am concerned, if Phantom Menace is heralding
similar sequels, I am happy for it.  If I wanted the original trilogy, I
would wish for bad acting and a silly, brainless love triangle in
space/evil father/ soap operal plot.  Phantom has none of the above.
What a fantastic film!!

Author
Wallace Baine

One of the enduring truths in the `Star Wars' cosmos is that the Force
cannot be manufactured. It's either with you or it's not. You can take
steps to attract it and manipulate it. But the Force defies mortal control.
In the filmmaker's lexicon, the Force is that ineffable magic that
separates mere entertainment from the deeply satisfying stories that strike
something deep in the collective psyche. That cultural `aha' moment is the
Force and, I'm sad to report, `Star Wars: Episode 1, The Phantom Menace'
just doesn't have it.
Granted, expectations are impossibly high for the most hyped pop culture
event since Moses dragged the stone tablets down from Mount Sinai. But in
between the predictable reactions sure to follow from both the Skywalker
idolators and the resentful grumps with the light sabers aimed at George
Lucas is this one inescapable truth: For all its technical wonders,
`Phantom Menace' -- which opens on 2,500 screens nationwide a minute after
midnight on May 19 -- is severely lacking in the human appeal that burned
the original `Star Wars' into our imaginations 22 years ago. In this case,
the ghost in the machine is missing the ghost.
Let's weigh the successes against the failures, but first a bit about the
story: As everyone over the mental age of six knows by now, `The Phantom
Menace' is the first chapter in a planned trilogy that precedes the
original trilogy in history by about 30 years. 
A trade dispute between a giant, malevolent organization called the Trade
Federation and the proud queen of the planet Naboo results in the
Federation's de facto invasion of the small planet. Two Jedi knights from
the governing Galactic Republic are sent to mediate the dispute only to
find that the Federation has no plans to talk to them. Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam
Neeson) and his young sidekick Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) quickly
become fugitives. With the help of Jar Jar Binks, a clownish outcast from
the bizarre Gungan tribe, the Jedis find the planet's queen (Natalie
Portman) and spirit her away to Corsucant, the planet that serves as the
Republic's capital.
Problems with their spacecraft, however, lead the heroes to the
out-of-the-way desert planet of Tatooine. There, in an effort to score
spare parts, Qui-Gon happens upon a nine-year-old slave boy named Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) who, the older Jedi believes, is the `Chosen One' of
Jedi mythology (He is, in fact, the future Darth Vader). Qui-Gon shrewdly
wagers with the boy's owner, a pot-bellied hummingbird-type creature named
Watto, to win both the spare parts and the boy's freedom.
With the boy in tow, the Jedis and the Queen's retinue finally make it back
to Corsucant where the Queen pleads for her planet's safety to the Senate
and Qui-Jon tries to convince the skeptical Jedi Council that young Anakin
is the Chosen One. Eventually, the action shifts back to Naboo where the
stage is set for combat between Republic and Federation forces and between
the Jedis and the film's dark lord, the evil Darth Maul.
The good: While George Lucas hasn't directed a film in 22 years, his
animators at Industrial Light and Magic has been honing their chops for
about as long in dozens of lesser movies with hopes of producing something
transcendent in new `Star Wars.'
Under the Lucas's supervision, the wizards of ILM have created no less than
four magnificent worlds: the white deserts of Tattooine; the claustrophic,
super-urbanized, vertically oriented cityscapes of Corsucant (imagine a
futuristic Tokyo that covers an entire plant); the lush Xanadu of Naboo;
and, perhaps most spectacularly, the underwater world of the Gungan, a
series of warmly lit, fairie kingdom bubbles hidden under the surface of an
otherwise anonymous lake on Naboo.
Many of the more stunning effects are, in fact, grace notes to the film's
central themes. For instance, in a too-brief sequence when Qui-Gon and
Obi-Wan are cruising the waters of Naboo in search of an underground
passage to the planet's other side, they are pursued by a number of
mind-boggling sea creatures. Just when it looks like the ship is about to
be snapped up by some disturbingly ugly serpent so big it makes a whale
look like a bath toy, here comes another even more immense creature to
dispatch that creature. `There's always a bigger fish,' says Qui-Jon wryly
and indeed, the sense of scale of the underwater monsters is convincingly
rendered. `Jaws' will never scare you again.
The film's computer-generated animatronics, virtually non-existent in the
first `Star Wars' triology, takes a giant step forward. Instead of actors
in wooly Chewbacca suits, Lucas this time opts for alien characters created
wholly from ILM software. The goofy Jar Jar Binks, a tall, floppy-eared,
horse-faced sidekick whose exaggerated gait suggests a drunk marionette
puppet, is convincing enough to blend in with the backdrop of his human
counterparts. Also impressive is Watto, a grubby, gambling Tatooine
junkdealer whose fluttering little bee wings labor to keep aloft his
bowling-ball belly. In the race to create wholly artificial live-action
characters, `The Phantom Menace' is a significant advance.
Also, this prequel gives `Star Wars' fans glimpses of those moments that
form the basis of the `Star Wars' mythos: We see the point when the famous
droids, C3PO and R2-D2, meet. When Qui-Gon introduces Obi-Wan to the boy
who would become Darth Vader, the moment will give you the thrill of fate
enjoined.
The not-so-good: The failures of `The Phantom Menace' seem niggling in
isolation. But taken together, they point to a frustrating lack of that
undefinable something that made the original movies -- particularly the
first `Star Wars' -- such a cohesive whole. They are, in the end, failures
of writing and serve as strong evidence that suggests Lucas is more
talented at marketing than storytelling.
For starters, the plot is built around an arcane dispute over trade policy,
not exactly a subject known for its sexiness. As a result, the reasons that
the Trade Federation moves in on Naboo are never clearly spelled out. The
planet's stately queen, bedecked like a kabuki diva, intones about the
suffering of her people, but we see none of that.
More importantly, the story sorely lacks the kind of swaggering appeal and
defiant humor that Harrison Ford's Han Solo gave the first trilogy. Han's
rough-and-tumble cowboy ethos, which served as a nice counterweight to
Luke's boy-scout earnestness, is nowhere to be found. Both male leads carry
the erect, humorless bearing of seminary students. Ewan McGregor, the
wild-eyed and charismatic indie-film star (`Trainspotting'), is
particularly gelded in his role as Obi-Wan Kenobi. He is left as a weak,
me-too lieutenant to the older Qui-Gon, who himself is Jedi nobility
personified (read: dull).
So many of the thematic elements of the original are missing in action --
the sexual tensions, the loyalties, the relationships, the
this-is-never-going-to-work desperation -- with nothing to compensate but
stiff political posturing and quasi-mysticism. Even the evil is a pale
comparison: the horned nemesis Darth Maul, whose satanically painted face
makes him look like a comer in the WWF, is given hardly any screen time to
really scare you. His menace is measly compared to the labored, artifical
breathing under the black mask of Darth Vader.
Ultimately, however, this is the boy's story and young Anakin is given a
chance to strut his Jedi fighter spirit in a prolonged set piece called a
`Podrace,' a no-holds-barred drag race through the desert vistas of Naboo.
The race predictably leads to Anakin's first combat mission (an accidental
one, actually). It is here where the `Star Wars' cosmology gives way to
adrenaline-soaked, video-game sensation that quickly becomes tedious and, I
suspect, a stand-in for any kind of grand design.
Then there's Jar Jar Binks who is clearly meant as the film's comic relief.
The character's braying pidgin English and exaggerated mugging never get
beyond annoying and the cast, as if sensing the thing is a flop, don't seem
to get anywhere near him.
Finally, I think, `The Phantom Menace' is hurt by lazy thinking. The reach
into religious allegory is more than a little ham-handed. Young Anakin is
not only tabbed the `Chosen One,' he's also the product of a virgin birth
(born as a slave in a dry desert landscape, no less).
What's more, the Lucas worldview seems tainted by, if not racism, at least
ethno-centrism. Is it a conscious decision that the `Chosen One' is a
tow-headed white boy with nice Americanized vowels? The boy's grotesque
owner, who speaks an Middle Eastern-sounding dialect, is a fat slob with a
lust for a good bet. Offensive to Arabs? The strange pidgin spoken by Jar
Jar and his fellow Gungan sound suspiciously like native Asians trying to
master English. Offensive to Asians?
George Lucas, the lord of Skywalker Ranch, clearly has a God complex and,
considering the astounding deference given him the last 20 years, who can
blame him? But George is as human as the rest of us with the same amount of
hours in his days. In the four-plus years since `Episode 1' has been in the
works, he has supervised the effects, controlled the marketing and
publicity as well as having written and directed what will be another
triology. Something had to give. `The Phantom Menace' shows the fruit of
his hard work and how he spent his energy. Unfortunately, it also shows
what he neglected. This time, the Force wasn't with him.

Author
Eugene Novikov
 Starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Jake Lloyd, Natalie Portman,
Samuel L. Jackson. Rated PG.
The event of events is upon us. People have waited twenty-two years for
the prequel to Star Wars and die-hard fans have been camping out at
theaters for months to get tickets to see it. I don't think that America
will ever actually recover from what this hurricane of a film has
caused. It is not a bit of an exaggeration to say that this is the most
highly anticipated movie in history. Anyone who tells you "It's just a
movie" is either lying or clueless.
It is clearly obvious that after the waiting and the hype actually
seeing the movie will be anticlimactic. The second coming of the Lord
could not live up to the kind of buzz (which is far too weak a word)
that Star Wars Epsode I: The Phantom Menace so effortlessly generated.
But that does not mean that the film itself is bad. In fact, it is
terrific. I strongly suspect that many of the people who were
dissappointed by it have simply surrendered to the media machine and the
inevitable backlash.
It is set some decades before the events of the original 1977 Star Wars
took place. The film focuses on the fledgling Republic of Planets and
the conflict that is raging: The Trade Federation, angry at some tax
raise that was recently put in place has invaded the small, peaceful
planet of Naboo. The Republic sent two Jedi Knights (people that can
actively communicate with what is affectionately known as "The Force"),
Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) to
negotiate. Unable to stop the tide of events that was about to occur,
the Jedi and the Queen of Naboo (Natalie Portman) escape Naboo and head
for Coruscant to try and get the Republic Senate to intervene.
On the way they get sidetracked to a planet called Tatooine, where they
meet the movie's real focal point, young Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd).
He is an innocent slave boy, but "the force is strong with him" so Qui-
Gon is determined to take him with them to the Jedi counsel and get him
trained as a Jedi. As any self-respecting Star Wars fan should know,
Anakin will grow up to be Darth Vader and give birth to Luke Skywalker.
>From the beginning it is evident that this is not an actor's movie.
Around 70% of the characters, if not more, are computer generated in one
form or another, and though the effects are seamless, the movie lacks
soul. I think that although the computer has played an incredibly
instrumental part in moviemaking this decade, cinema should still be a
human art and The Phantom Menace nearly defies this.
This is the lightest installment in the Star Wars saga thus far, with
plenty of broad comic relief to go around, much of it courtesy of an
irritating knew character named Jar-Jar Binks. He's essentially a
computer-animated sidekick who says things like "Exqueeze Me?" and "Mesa
go now, okeday?", and although it is often amusing it is also inherently
annoying.
The visual effects are astounding (although director George Lucas often
chickens out by cutting away from them) and the movie is a thrilling
triumph. If it lacks in plot and in acting it makes up for it through
imagination and excitement. The climactic lightsaber battle (oh, come
on, as if you didn't already know), among other things, is outrageously
entertaining and defines the term "popcorn movie".
What made me surrender and give this movie ***1/2 stars was the score by
John Williams. Even though it does seem like the man scores every single
movie that comes out these days, his work here is nothing short of
brilliant. His use of opera during the climax really does add a punch
and his ingenious way of utilizing the Imperial March as a sort of
prophecy is chilling.
The Phantom Menace is probably most effective as pop nostalgia. When you
see "A long time ago, in a galaxy far, far away", when the familiar
music plays, when the words "Star Wars" appear on screen, you'll feel a
tingle even if you didn't see the movie when it first came out in '77.
It feels oddly exciting to be introduced to young Anakin, a boy whose
innocence, we know, will be taken away and who will soon cross over to
the dark side. It is the perfect example of dramatic irony to see the
Jedi masters aspire to get him trained in the Jedi arts; we know that it
will do more harm than good, but they do not. We not only feel more
involved in the story, but we feel like we're seeing the beginning of a
saga that we have cherished for years.
The Phantom Menace, although lacking in human aspects of the story, is a
very worthy installment in the Star Wars. It works as an action flick,
visually eye-popping and often paralyzingly exciting; it also works as
an elicitor of memories, a piece of exquisite nostalgia.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Author
James Sanford
There's a famous story director Alfred Hitchcock once told about
working with Ingrid Bergman in the 1940s. Bergman, Hitchcock said,
wanted only to appear in masterpieces and feared starring in a film
that wouldn't live up to her lofty standards.  Hitchcock couldn't
understand why she spent so much time fretting over every single
aspect of her work.
"Ingrid," he told her, "it's only a movie."
Those words could also apply to the fanatics who have camped out in
theater parking lots, traded bits of trivia on the Internet and
counted down the days until the opening of "Star Wars: Episode I - The
Phantom Menace," the first of writer-director George Lucas' "Star
Wars" prequels.
It turns out it is, after all, only a movie, and nothing ever
committed to celluloid could possibly live up to the astonishing
amount of hype surrounding this one.  "Episode I" doesn't even come
close. It's merely a two-hour parade of mesmerizing images, set to a
stirring John Williams score and featuring an assortment of faces old
and new.
Is it fun? For the most part, yes. Is it a life-changing experience?
Only if you reach puberty, give birth or die while watching it. Set
alongside the previous installments, "Episode I" has considerably
fewer cliffhangers than "Star Wars" and none of the complexity or
terror of "The Empire Strikes Back," and shares with "Return of the
Jedi" a fondness for the kinds of cuddly creatures only a toy vendor
could love.
What makes the movie a worthy addition to the series is its visual
sense. Practically every frame of the film is drenched in bold colors
and even the backdrops - such as an underwater city made of shining
golden bubbles, or a planet entirely consumed by urban sprawl - are
fascinating to study. Those who see "Episode I" more than once will
want to take a closer look at the extraordinary details packed
intoevery scene.
Several of those scenes are exceptionally fine.  "Episode I" kicks off
with an exciting escape, follows that up with a dazzling invasion
sequence then moves on to a nail-biting episode involving fish
monsters and gigantic mutant eels. A "pod race" on the desert planet
Tattooine is also smashingly well-crafted and a climactic, multi-level
battle between Jedi Knights and a bloodthirsty Sith Lord provides a
much-needed kick to the story's third act.
"Episode I" introduces some memorable characters, a few of whom will
figure prominently in the next two chapters: Amidala (Natalie
Portman), the youthful queen who dresses like a supergeisha and fights
like Princess Leia; Qui-Gon (a suitably heroic Liam Neeson), the
stalwart Jedi mentor of Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor, who does a
perfect vocal imitation of the young Alec Guinness); and Darth Maul
(Ray Park), a merciless assassin in Kabuki makeup who brandishes a
lethal double light saber and whose head is crowned by a ring of
horns.
Unfortunately for those over the age of 10, "Episode I" also brings in
an asinine amphibian named Jar Jar Binks who speaks in mock
Rastafarian tones and appears to have been inserted in the story by
the merchandising arm of Lucasfilms. He's irritating from the moment
he first appears and goes a long way toward bogging down the action.
The movie further caters to the kiddie audience by casting the
button-nosed Jake Lloyd as Anakin Skywalker, the fledgling warrior
whowill someday grow up to be Darth Vader. Cute he may be, but an
actor he is not.
Then again, many of the performances here seem underdirected, even
that of the generally on-target Portman, who has some initial
difficulty bringing Amidala to life. A similar problem keeps Pernilla
August from making Anakin's mom into anything but a smiling
cipher. The movie's dramatic sequences are frequently tepid and
overlong, perfectly designed for trips to the concession stand.
They're also indicative of the film's greatest failing, its inability
to exert any sort of emotional power whatsoever. This might be
partially due to the nature of the material itself; after all, this is
basically a lengthy backstory for the intrigue and romance yet to
come.
But as a director, Lucas seems more caught up in dishing out digital
magic than in working with flesh and blood. "Episode I" routinely
dazzles the eye without ever engaging the other senses.
Those expecting to stand up and cheer at regular intervals might be
taken aback by the movie's almost weird restraint. Imagine taking a
roller coaster ride after swallowing a handful of Valium and you get
some idea of the tone.
Awash in state-of-the-art sound and fury and devoid of feeling,
"Episode I" is a technical triumph that seems untouched by human
hands. In manufacturing, that's a plus. In filmmaking, however, that's
not a good thing.  James Sanford

Author
Jeremiah "Spassvogel" Rickert
Starring: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd
Written and Directed by George Lucas
     Hype hype and more hype! After a while soon the large amount of hype
itself became a news story, in essence they hyped the hype.  Would it...
could it live up to the hype?
     George Lucas has been teasing, hinting, and out and out whetting our
appetites for this film for the last twenty years.  It's been believed
that he has written a nine part story and that someday we'd see the other
six parts.  Recently his tune has changed and it's now a six part story,
and we're two-thirds of the way there.  I waited until this film had been
open a while before I reviewed it, mostly because I wanted to insulate
myself from the hype, which I think was a good idea.
     First of all, I wanted to watch this film with perspective.  This is
the first part of what Lucas calls his six-film epic.  Just like the
prologue to a book, I knew right off that the groundwork for a variety of
plot threads was going to be laid down, most of which would not come to
fruition until 2005 when the final film in the prequel trilogy is
released.  Most people expected the same sort of whizz-bang here it comes
feeling of the original Star Wars.  You have to remember that the first
film was written without the expectation of sequels, so George had to pack
as much as he could into it.  The Phantom Menace on the other hand was
written with the thought that pretty much barring his death, the other two
films are going to be made.  As a writer, that leaves him a lot more time
to develop plots slowly and carefully; good for film fans, bad for the
casual movie-goer perhaps.  The other thing that I noticed about the film
is that most people, especially fans, were dissing the film after only
seeing the trailer.  People wondered why Natalie Portman's accent changed,
for example, and were saying that George was sloppy.  Of course, that is
all explained in the film.  Finally, people complained that the ships and
such looked like they were "higher-tech" than the later films, and that
again George was sloppy.  It's obvious that the Republic was about at its
apex during the film, the height of its power and scientific advancement,
and that after the wars of the 2nd and 3rd films, things are in a bit of a
dark age.  These are things that most film goers didn't get.
     The plot is very Machiavellian.  A greedy Trade Federation is
illegally blockading the small planet of Naboo, taking advantage of the
endless bickering and bureaucracy in the Galactic Senate.  We soon learn
that someone referred to as Lord Sideous, who looks and talks like a
certain Emperor from the later films has put them up to it.  The Senate
Chancellor (Terrance Stamp) sends Jedi Master Qui Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson)
and his apprentice Obi Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) to force a settlement,
but they are soon attacked.  As the Federation starts their invasion it's
up to the Jedis to protect the Naboo Queen (Natalie Portman) from attack.
After fleeing the planet with the Queen, they end up on Tantooine with a
damaged ship and are forced to enlist the help of a slave boy named Anikan
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) who also happens to be very strong with the force.
Can this motely crue stand up to the droid armies of the Trade Federation?
What of Lord Sideous and the mysterious Sith who seem to be behind the
attack?  Stay tuned...
     Lucas has again taken "the next big step" in film.  He's created a
virtually photo-realistic computer-generated universe, which basically
means he is now only limited by his imagination as to what he can create.
Are there times when you can easily tell it's a computer effect?  Well,
yes, but not very often.  I was slightly disappointed with the sound.  I
was told before the film's release that Lucas was going to use the new
Dolby Surround EX sound system, and demand that theaters showing The
Phantom Menace upgrade if they want to show it, however that doesn't seem
to have happened. 
     The acting in the film was not as bad as many had reported it to be.
McGregor's Obi Wan was a great precursor to Sir Alec Guinness' more
experienced character that we meet later.  Pernella August as Anakin's
mother Shmi Skywalker was paticularly good, conveying an incredible array
of emotions in her face and eyes.  Reviewers who said this film was cold
and sterile must not have paid attention to her performance.  This was
George's first trip behind the camera since 1977's Star Wars.  For the
most part he was all right, but at times traded a little directorial
artistry for technological artistry.  I thought this was most apparent
during some of the various fire-fight scenes, when it looked like he was
pretty much reusing shots and camera movements from the original Star
Wars.  I'm almost sure it was intentional that he aped the first film, but
it did come off as a bit obvious.  
     Jar Jar Binks is a character who has inspired some rather heated
words from fans.  Speaking as someone who bought the toys, read the
comics, and played the video games, I didn't think he was that bad.  I do
agree that at times he was difficult to understand, particularly when he
is explaining why he was expelled from Gungan City.  I do, however, agree
that instead of making new races, more familiar ones should have been used
for the main villains and creatures we see in the film.  This would have
not disturbed the story any, and would have made the film have a slightly
more familiar look to it.  I realize that George probably has a back story
written where a certain race would be seen on a certain planet, but it is
information that we just don't have.
     This was an infinitely detailed film, with small little touches that
I didn't even notice without repeated viewings.  The score by John
Williams is again very effective particularly during the big Jedi
Lightsaber Duel.  His song "Duel of the Fates" compliments the action so
well it almost seems as if they were created in some sort of symbiotic
fashion.  
     Once people are able to put their expectations and their
prejudices behind them, they will be able to appreciate The Phantom Menace
more.  Also, when viewed in the context of the other two films in the
trilogy, I'm sure that for most people, their questions will be answered
to their satisfaction.  
Of the 4.75 I paid for this film, it was worth $8.00
(c) 1999 Jeremiah Rickert
--

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The opening moments of Star Wars:  The Phantom Menace brought back some
memories for me, as it probably will for you.  I remember sitting in my
dad's beat-up Chevy station wagon and watching the first Star Wars movie in
the parking lot of Texas Stadium.  (They set up a drive-in theater in the
parking lot during the summer to make some money when the Cowboys weren't
playing.)  I remember using my toy light saber as a flashlight to read
comic books in bed.  I remember standing in line for the second and third
movies at the theater in the Forum Mall in Arlington, looking up at this
big Star Wars mural they had painted in the lobby.
But when I walked out of the movie, I was reminded most of this Pop Art
exhibit they had at the Dallas Museum of Art a couple of years ago.  There
were the requisite comic book panels, of course, but there were quite a few
paintings that were these big close-ups of brushstrokes, great big smears
of color that I enjoyed, in an abstract way.  (A little art humor there.)
What I really liked, though, was this Roy Lichtenstein sculpture of a
chair.  The sculpture was comprised of the same kinds of brushstrokes I'd
seen in the paintings, just as though they'd been lifted of the
two-dimensional canvas and given new three-dimensional life.  The sculpture
was dependent on the earlier paintings -- it wouldn't have made sense
without that context -- but converting the brushstroke images to actual
shapes caused the sculpture to transcend its origins and become a stronger,
better work of art.
Star Wars was a great movie.  Star Wars: The Phantom Menace is not a great
movie.  Instead, it's a sublime work of art that's based on a great movie,
that uses bits and pieces of the earlier movie to fashion a new visual
masterpiece.  Just as Lichtenstein transferred his imagery from painting to
sculpture, George Lucas has transferred his imagery from film moviemaking
to digital moviemaking.  All of the elements are present -- light sabers,
droids, the Force -- but they're just the frame for an awesome,
unprecedented work of art.
Star Wars:  The Phantom Menace is best described as an infinity of
dreamscapes.  To mix a sci-fi metaphor, George Lucas boldly takes us where
no man has gone before:  to the rolling plains of Naboo, the underwater
refuge of the Gungans, the twisted desert landscape of Tatooine, the
soaring towers of Coruscant, to a vast array of space battles and pod races
and laser swordfights.  The Phantom Menace offers us an array of sights so
wonderful, so gorgeous, so jaw-droppingly amazing, that it's almost
impossible to describe them.  (The people who do audio description for
moviegoers who are blind have their work cut out for them.)  The
backgrounds are lavishly illustrated and ornately detailed, and the
foreground is filled with exciting, hyper-kinetic action and impressive new
creatures from the Lucas alien bestiary.  This is a work of art to be
experienced on the huge silver canvas down at your local multiplex.
If you set Star Wars: The Phantom Menace next to groundbreaking special
effects movies like Titanic or What Dreams May Come, it emerges head and
shoulders above its competition.  It's a superlative example of the
emerging new genre of computer animated movies, and art directors will be
copying from it for years to come.  But The Phantom Menace is a Star Wars
movie, first and foremost, and it will ultimately be judged by the
yardstick of the three prior movies rather than on its considerable
artistic achievement.  And based on that yardstick, The Phantom Menace
falls slightly short of the mark.
The Phantom Menace starts off full of promise, with audiences cheering the
return of the classic logo and the initial plot crawling slantwise up the
screen.  Apparently, the peace loving planet of Naboo is being menaced by
the Federation, an alien race responsible for collecting taxes on Galactic
trade.  The Federation is what the Internal Revenue Service would be like
if it controlled a vast army of robots, and one hopes that nobody at the
IRS gets any ideas.  Jedi Knights Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and Obi-Wan
Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) are dispatched to the planet to rescue the Queen
(Natalie Portman), fighting duckbilled androids and giant fish and Dark
Lords of the Sith along the way.  The Jedi run across the young Anakin
Skywalker / Darth Vader (Jake Lloyd) at a pit stop on the desert planet
Tatooine, discover his innate Jedi abilities, and make plans to train him
in the ways of the Force.
The plot is not the problem with the movie, so I won't give any more of it
away than I already have.  And the action scenes are on a par with anything
in the previous movies.  What's missing here -- what's been lost in the
translation from adventure movie to work of art -- is the chemistry that
the characters have with each other and with the audience.
Neeson is fairly good as the elder Jedi statesman, but there's something
reserved in his portrayal of Qui-Gon.  Neeson is at his best when he's
playing characters that have a fierce inner spark of motivation (Oskar
Schindler, let's say, or Rob Roy).  That spark isn't really present here.
Neeson projects inner peace and Jedi self-discipline, but it might have
been more fun if he had some of the roguish qualities of Han Solo.
McGregor is given much less to do as Obi-Wan than you might think, although
one would imagine him to have a prominent place in the second and third
installments.  He's a student here, not a teacher, and he has a subordinate
and passive role most of the way in.
Instead of Luke and Leia, we've got two very good young actors in Jake
Lloyd and Natalie Portman, but they don't do much for the overall chemistry
either.  Lloyd, playing the six-year-old who is destined to grow up to be
Darth Vader, shows exceptional maturity and self-assurance in his role.
(If anyone out there is still interested in bringing Orson Scott Card's
novel Ender's Game to the screen, call this kid's agent.)  Portman has all
the gravity and imperial bearing a Queen should have and does a fine job
behind her ornate costumes and makeup.  (The dead-white makeup looks pretty
cool, but one hopes that it won't give Whoopi Goldberg an excuse to show up
at the Oscars in whiteface again.)  But both actors are pretty reserved as
well.  They don't bring with them any of the childish enthusiasm or passion
that made Star Wars so enjoyable.
Compared to their Star Wars predecessors, the characters of The Phantom
Menace seem stiff and lifeless.  Even Darth Maul, the much-hyped super bad
guy, can't hold a candle to any of the formidable Star Wars villains.
Additionally, the obligatory cutesy alien, a floppy-eared amphibian named
Jar-Jar Binks, doesn't do a thing to help matters.  Binks looks as though
he was designed by the same malevolent committee that allegedly built the
camel on Earth:  he's got an incomprehensible computer generated lisping
Caribbean accent, lame dialogue straight out of Wayne's World ("Ex-squeeze
me?") or worse, Full House ("How wude!"), and an innate clumsiness we
haven't seen since Martin Short stopped doing Ed Grimley.  I kept hoping
that Chewbacca would show up and pummel him.
These flaws exist, and they keep The Phantom Menace from being as
thoroughly fun and enjoyable as its predecessors.  However, it would be
wrong to call the movie a disappointment, no matter how annoying or
pervasive the hype has been.  The Phantom Menace is worth seeing, worth
marveling over, worth enjoying both as entertainment and as a luminous work
of art -- not to mention its considerable value as a passport back to
childhood.  (Where did I put that old light saber, anyway?)

Author
Eric Robinette
Turmoil has engulfed the movie-going public. The worth of "Star Wars: Episode I
- The Phantom Menace" is in dispute.
Hoping to resolve the matter with a sensible, clear-eyed review, the errant
knight, Sir Phil M. Critic, endeavored to offer his own opinion, even if he was
a little late with it, to help settle the conflict.
As far as Sir Critic could see, it was like a period of civil war amongst the
moviegoers. A handful blindly loved the movie, having been starved of a "Star
Wars" film for 16 years. Another surly and disgruntled group tried to score a
victory against what they called "The evil Lucasfilm empire" by leveling
accusations of racism at the film. A third large and unruly group complained
that the movie was all flash and fire, with no true sense of heart or emotion 
Sir Critic immediately dismissed the racism claims of the surly group,
believing its arguments had enough foolishness to embarrass an entire
profession.  Alarmed by the group's cynical tone, the knight branded them as
the sort of charlatans who like to spend time looking for messages that simply
did not exist, with their real purpose being to draw attention to themselves.
"What utter nonsense!" the knight declared. The Trade Federation aliens speak
in a Japanese accent, I believe, because this is homage to the Japanese films
of Akira Kurosawa, who inspired the "Star Wars" series in the first place. As
for the sidekick Jar Jar Binks' Jamaican overtones, that is because this is the
accent that the voice actor, Ahmed Best, actually uses."
Evading the dreaded racist claims, Sir Critic tried to begin his proper review.
However, the other critics, obsessed with shooting the film down, dispatched
hundreds of angry barbs at the film, in particular assailing the sidekick
character of Jar-Jar, whom they labeled as a constant nuisance.
Sir Critic conceded that Jar-Jar's pidgin English, which sounded like a warped
form of Pig Latin, was off-putting and unnecessary, but aside from that, he
found the character amusing in the role of a clumsy oaf, which gave the film
many lighthearted moments of humor.
The unruly group then changed tactics, focusing on a new, pointed attack even
more powerful than their first. They argued the film was nothing more than an
overstuffed visual feast, with plenty to look at, but little to care about and
no depth of character or storytelling to be found.
Sir Critic had to concede this argument, but only up to a point. He agreed that
the movie was basically two-hours plus of setup for the darker chapters in the
saga that were to follow, and this particular episode had little in the way of
emotional heft.
Even so, Sir Critic predicted that when the entire series was completed, "The
Phantom Menace" would fit in nicely with the entire series. He found it
especially interesting that Obi-Wan Kenobi trained Anakin when he was an
inexperienced Jedi, which makes for some ominous foreshadowing.
"But do not forget the most important point," Sir Critic advised the others.
"When all is said and done, the most important question is 'Was the film an
entertaining, exciting time at the theater?' My answer is yes, very much so.
'The Phantom Menace,' is, like the other films, an adventure story at heart. 
As an adventure, it succeeds grandly with great set pieces like the pod race
and the final battle with Darth Maul, which are worth the price of admission by
themselves.
"Could it have been better? Yes, it could have, but no movie could possibly
live up to the expectations that had built up behind it. 'The Phantom Menace'
may not be the best of the series, but it has one thing in common with the
other films: it is a lot of fun."

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by George Lucas.
Cast: Liam Neeson, Jake Lloyd, Natalie Portman, Ewan McGregor, Pernilla 
August, Samuel L. Jackson, Ray Park. 
Voices: Ahmed Best, Frank Oz, Anthony Daniels, Kenny Baker.
1999 - 131 minutes
Rated PG (for mild violence).
Reviewed May 20, 1999. 
"Star Wars" fans across the nation have been waiting sixteen years for 
the promised prequels to the most popular series in motion picture 
history. The original trilogy somehow captured viewers' imaginations 
like no other movie possibly could, taking them on a wild ride through 
never-before-seen places and meeting unforgettable characters and 
creatures. The most die-hard fanatics have been sitting outside the 
Mann's Chinese Theater in L.A. for over a month, simply to be the first 
in line to see director-creator George Lucas' latest opus. On Wednesday, 
May 12, advance tickets went on sale at 3:00 p.m., and I was instantly 
in amazement, arriving at the theater almost two hours before the 
tickets were to be sold, to see a line going all the way around the 
building. Many people were said to have camped out overnight (and this 
is in the small town of Frederick, MD!), and the two guys next to me in 
line both said that they had called off work on that day. Ultimately, I 
waited three hours to get tickets to the 7:30 nighttime showing on "May 
19," a date that will probably be forever ingrained in some peoples' 
minds. Expectations were so high for the film, with many nearly treating 
the impending release as "The Second Coming." On the other hand, I have 
never been that big of a fan of "Star Wars." I like them, and in the 
case of 1980's "The Empire Strikes Back," I nearly loved it, but I am 
far from a crazed devotee. I couldn't, however, pass up going to see 
this "Event" on the day it opened.
The film in question is, obviously, "Star Wars: Episode 1--The Phantom 
Menace," set many years before the goings-on in the original trilogy, 
Episodes IV, V, and VI. Going in, I chose to not have any sort of 
expectations (although they admittedly were kind of low), but to simply 
hope the film would do its job in amazing and exciting me. Early 
critical reviews have not been very kind, but there have been a slew of 
overwhelmingly positive ones, including Roger Ebert and Janet Maslin (of 
"The New York Times"). And so, without any certain presumptions, the 
final word on "The Phantom Menace" is that it is perhaps the most 
visually astounding motion picture I have ever seen, far more 
stimulating than the previous "Star Wars" movies, due to such 
extravagant technological visual effects advancements since the 
late-'70s/early-'80s. Unfortunately, those movies by-and-large had one 
vital element that this movie is sorely lacking, and that is any sort of 
character involvement. While Han Solo, Lucas Skywalker, and Princess 
Leia were likable characters with distinct personalities, "The Phantom 
Menace" holds no such close scrutiny. But then again, that leads to 
another predicament, which is that this film is only the first in a 
planned prequel trilogy, meaning that many of the characters will, no 
doubt, be further explored and development in the later installments, 
currently due out in theaters in 2002 and 2005. Problems abound in "The 
Phantom Menace," many more than there needed to be, but George Lucas 
truthfully had an overwhelming amount of elements to handle here, as he 
had to do the most difficult thing so far in the series, and that is to 
start it with the first vital chapter in the "Star Wars" legacy. You 
would be out of your league to say Lucas succeeded on every level, but 
he did do a respectable job, and treated me to extraordinary images that 
are worth the price of admission alone.
"Episode 1" begins as The Trade Federation are preparing an attack on 
the planet of Naboo, headed by the 14-year-old Queen Amidala (Natalie 
Portman), whose life is in jeopardy. After a narrow escape from the 
Federation, who turn out to be more twisted and corrupt than expected, 
two Jedi Knights, the no-nonsense, scruffy Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), 
and his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), set off for Naboo to 
rescue the Queen and take her to Tatooine, a planet of safety. When 
their spacecraft breaks down, they venture out into a small desert town 
where they come into contact with two slaves, Shmi Skywalker (Pernilla 
August) and her 9-year-old son, Anakin (Jack Lloyd). Sensing the Force 
is with Anakin, and that he is destined to become a powerful Jedi, he 
hesitantly leaves behind his mother to join Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan, 
promising to return and set her free one day from a slave life.
Since "The Phantom Menace" has the tiresome task of setting up 
everything to come later on, the villains come off more as an 
afterthought. The main one, I suppose, is Darth Maul (Ray Park), a 
fiendish sith with red-and-black face makeup, but he is literally given 
about four scenes and three lines of dialogue. How are we supposed to 
feel negatively towards Maul when we don't really even know who he is, 
and we never actually see him do any bad things, save for the inevitable 
climactic lightsaber battle between Qui-Gon, Obi-Wan, and himself? 
Villains probably aren't the point in this installment, though, and 
since they are so uninvolving and slight, it doesn't come off as a major 
problem.
Sure, this movie is basically an arrangement for everything to come, but 
that still isn't an excuse for what does come off as a problem, and that 
is the performances, which are as lifeless as a piece of chopped-up 
wood. Neeson and McGregor are the centerpiece of the film, but we learn 
almost nothing about them, and they recite their lines without any 
feeling, as if their hearts weren't really into it. Maybe it is not the 
actors' faults, since they are so thinly written. At any rate, I'm sure 
McGregor felt especially out of place since he is a real actor, and 
probably not used to being what is essentially a background prop who 
stands there like a good boy and rarely says anything. Jake Lloyd, as 
young Anakin Skywalker, later to become Darth Vader, is an unctuous 
child actor if I ever saw one, with almost nary a line of dialogue that 
he is able to pull off. Surely, Lucas could have found a stronger, more 
assured actor to fit the bill of what is the most vital character in the 
film, as Lloyd is annoying and seemingly always aware that he is "in" a 
movie. Out of the four central roles, Natalie Portman easily fares best, 
but did you expect anything less of her? At 17-years-old, she is already 
a near-veteran, popping onto the scene in 1994 with her heartbreaking 
performance in "The Professional," and carrying it over to what was a 
performance snubbed of an Oscar nomination, in 1996's "Beautiful Girls." 
Portman knows how to make a scene work, even when the material isn't up 
to her level, and it will be intriguing to follow her character's 
development in Episodes II and III. Pernilla August, a Swedish actress 
in her first American film, is touching as Anakin's solemn, caring 
mother, and in each of her scenes she gives Neeson and Lloyd a run for 
their acting money. Also making brief appearances are Yoda (voiced by 
Frank Oz) and Mace Windu (Samuel L. Jackson), who sense an underlying 
uneasiness within Anakin, as well as friendly androids, R2-D2 (voiced by 
Kenny Baker) and an unfinished C-3P0 (voiced by Anthony Daniels). 
Brought to life as "Star Wars"'s first-ever major character that is 
completely computer-generated is the amphibious Jar Jar Binks (voiced by 
Ahmed Best) who, judging from his thick accent, must have been born and 
raised in the outskirts of Jamaica. Much talk has been raised about how 
Jar Jar is an annoying, kid-friendly addition to the film, and although 
he is probably more targeted for the children in the audience, I 
actually did like him, and his goofy, lovable nature. He is integrated 
seamlessly into each frame, never really looking like a special effect, 
and gives a better performance overall than any of the humans do.
If the characters are lacking depth and three dimensions, no one can 
accuse "Star Wars: Episode 1--The Phantom Menace" of not being original 
and often awe-inspiring. The landscapes and marvelous city vistas are 
never anything less than powerful, majestic, and sumptuous, 
picture-perfect images that I could stare at for hours on end. Words 
really can't describe the visual experience of "The Phantom Menace," but 
every frame in the 131-minute movie is gorgeous to look at. Some images 
I will never forget include: the atmospheric, dreamy overhead views of 
the city skyscrapers in the planet, Coruscant; the endless green fields 
in Naboo where a climactic war is held; the Queen's kingdom, which is 
surrounded by curved, bubble-like buildings, as well as a crystal-clear 
waterfall leading into a river; and an underwater city in Naboo, 
populated by fish, giant water creatures, and Jar Jar Binks' own race of 
giant, floopy-eared pseudo-hares. "The Phantom Menace" is such an 
optical triumph that, like "Terminator 2"'s liquid-metal and "Jurassic 
Park"'s dinosaurs, stands as a new turning point in visual effects 
artistry, this time proving that every frame can look completely 
believable, as if no effects were even actually used. If I didn't know 
better, I'd say that Naboo, Tatooine, and the underwater city were 
actual places that exist.
"The Phantom Menace," although more dialogue-oriented than 
action-inclined, as in 1977's "Star Wars," nonetheless includes some 
startling setpieces, including an exciting, superbly-crafted pod race 
that Anakin enters in with a pod he has made himself. Soaring through 
rock passageways and down cliffs, this sequence is the first true sign 
that we are back in "Star Wars" territory, and it is further carried out 
in the climax, which intercuts between three separate action storylines, 
including a war in the fields of Naboo between an army of robots from 
the Confederation and the amphibious Naboo residents; a fight to the 
death between Darth Maul, Qui-Gon Jinn, and Obi-Wan Kenobi; and the weak 
link, due to the corny, throwaway one-liners and weak acting by Lloyd, a 
space battle between Anakin and enemy troops.
Flawed as it is, "Star Wars: Episode 1--The Phantom Menace" captured my 
imagination and I enjoyed it. With a more tightly-written screenplay and 
characters, George Lucas would have really had something, but just as 
with "Episode IV," you have to look at the movie as a jumping-off point 
for the two later films, which most likely will be better on the story 
and, hopefully, on the performance levels. Going into "The Phantom 
Menace," I wasn't actually a "Star Wars" fan, but coming out I wanted more; 
I wanted to see what was going to happen next. "Episode II" may be three 
years away, but I'm already highly anticipating it, and the 
imperfections of "Episode I" have only sparked my interest even more 
since, like "The Empire Strikes Back," it is sure to be superior.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Samuel L.
Jackson, Terence Stamp, Frank Oz, Kenny Baker, Warwick Davis, Brian
Blessed, Anthony Daniels
Written and Directed by: George Lucas
Running Time: 131 minutes
Date Reviewed: May 19, 1999
I always wondered how I would review the original Star Wars trilogy if
I was seeing it today for the first time.  After all, I'm not a
wide-eyed, impressionable youth anymore.  Now I'm a tough-to-please,
sarcastic, cynical film critic.  I thought I would have this
opportunity when George Lucas released the "special editions" of the
original Star Wars trilogy back in 1997.  The fact of the matter was
that even though I hadn't seen these films in the theater in ages, too
many childhood memories came flooding back as I viewed them to sway my
opinion at all.  Simply put, I love the original Star Wars trilogy.
Growing up, I must have seen those three films hundreds of times.  So
now that there's a new chapter in the Star Wars saga, Star Wars
Episode I - The Phantom Menace, I get my chance for an unbiased
review.
The Phantom Menace is a prequel to the original Star Wars trilogy,
which were episodes 4-6 of George Lucas' science fiction vision.  When
the first trailer for The Phantom Menace hit theaters last year, I saw
it once... maybe twice.  I tried my best to withhold judgment against
everything I saw, simply because I didn't want to have any
preconceived notions about anything for the film.  Months passed, and
a second trailer was released.  Again, I only saw it once, trying not
to get my hopes up.  I didn't read anything online about the film's
production, and only briefly scanned through the preliminary reviews
that flooded the web after the initial press screenings.
On a side note: I saw all the people waiting in line for tickets weeks
before the film's release, and I saw all those same people standing in
line again so they could be the first ones into the theater for the
Wednesday, May 19th 12:01am show.  On a whim, I walked up to my local
gigaplex at 12:15am that Wednesday and asked if there were any tickets
available for the second show at 12:30am.  I was told that over 300
were still available.  So I purchased one, walked into the theater and
got my usual middle of the theater seat...  all of which took me about
60 seconds to do.  Waiting an extra 29 minutes saved me hours of
standing in line.
When the 20th Century Fox and Lucasfilm logos appeared on screen, the
crowd I was with cheered.  Those cheers exploded into energetic frenzy
when the Star Wars logo came on screen to the familiar John Williams
score.  At this moment, I actually had a chill of excitement run
through my body.  I was seeing the new Star Wars movie.  But despite
my attempt at low expectations, by film's end I was disappointed.
I won't even bother getting deep into the plot of The Phantom Menace
simply because it doesn't matter.  It doesn't matter to you reading
this because I'm sure you already know it, and it doesn't matter much
to me because quite frankly, it's not very interesting.  Two Jedi
warriors try to save a queen and prevent a war... amongst trade
negotiations and political debate and Senate meetings and the like.
Most of it is as exciting as watching a futuristic version of C-SPAN.
Yawn.  At the center of all the political blah in the film is the
introduction of Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd, not doing a very good
acting job I'm afraid), who of course grows up to be the father of
Luke Skywalker and Princess Leia, and also becomes Darth Vader.
Now I must admit, one thing that I knew I would have a problem with is
the character of Jar Jar Binks.  Put simply, this might be one of the
most annoying characters not only in the Star Wars films, but in film
history.  Completely computer generated and talking in an embarrassing
Buckwheat-style slang, Jar Jar is an abomination to the Star Wars
universe (take the annoying Ewoks and multiply them by a million and
you still don't have the annoyance factor that this character
produces).  George Lucas has stated that he made this movie for kids,
and so kids are supposed to love Jar Jar.  Good for them.  As a kid
though, I hated the Ewoks... and I'm pretty sure I would have hated
Jar Jar too.  What makes me sad about this "kid humor" factor is that
Lucas feels that fart jokes and Jar Jar stepping in piles of crap are
funny.  Is that how you reach a kid of the 90s?  Poop?
Now yes, the special effects in the film are great... but they are CGI
effects.  Now I don't know about you, but I just don't like CGI
effects because to this day they just don't look real.  Give me models
and guys wearing latex masks and puppets any day.  Until CGI effects
blend in with real action, I'm not going to be a big fan of them.  Of
all the huge effects in the film, my favorite was the underwater
sequence in the first hour of the film.  Many will say that the pod
racing sequence was their favorite, and maybe it would have been one
of mine, but at that point in the film we've seen oh... 10,000 CGI
effects!  Nothing about it stood out, except maybe how annoying the
two headed CGI creature that was announcing the race seemed to be.
The most disappointing thing about the entire film is it's lack of a
main villain.  Darth Maul (Ray Park) is the closest thing the film has
to a villain... he's the apprentice of another villain of sorts in the
film Darth Sidious (who becomes the emperor that we see in both The
Empire Strikes Back and Return of the Jedi).  But the character of
Darth Maul (like all the characters in the film) is so underdeveloped
that the only way you know he's a villain is because he scowls at our
heroes when he sees them.  As a matter of fact, you'll see more of
Darth Maul at your local Taco Bell than you will here.  This character
had huge potential, and I would have loved to see more of him.  But as
I've said, Lucas didn't make this movie for me (nor does it seem he
made it for the die hard fans either).
A positive note for the film is it's final 20-30 minutes or so.
Cutting back and forth between a land war, a space battle, and a
lightsaber duel between Darth Maul, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor),
and Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), the sequence is what Star Wars is all
about.  Had the whole film been on this level of interest and
intensity I'd be delighted.
Quick questions about the film: Why do the droids C-3PO and R2-D2 not
recall any of the events in this film when we see them in Star Wars?
Why are the battle droids used in mass number for anything?  Sure they
may look pretty cool, but the battle droids are the most ineffectual
fighting force I've ever seen.  I think I saw them hit exactly one
target that they were shooting at throughout the course of the film.
Why not use more of those droids that could roll into a ball and chase
after you?  Those were much more effective.  What on earth was that
force field contraption that the Jedi get trapped in during their
battle with Darth Maul?  And finally, what does the title The Phantom
Menace even mean?  Who is the titular phantom menace?  Technically,
this film could also be called The Pesky Ghost, or The Troublesome
Spectre.
When I left the theater I was left with the question "Is the new Star
Wars film any good?"  It's so hard to really say.  Is it as good as
the original trilogy?  Definitely not.  Is it even a good science
fiction movie?  Almost.  The story lacks a human element to it.
There's no Han Solo character for the audience to identify with,
instead there's just a lot of Jedi jargon which sounds dangerously
like Star Trek inspired technobabble.
I'll say this for it though, even though at about thirty minutes into
the film I started to feel the effects of the silo full of soda which
I was enjoying, I didn't even consider leaving my seat.  I wasn't
going to miss a second of the film.  Despite all of my disappointment,
that has to say something about the film.  So to you George
Lucas... you made me not want to go to the bathroom.  Cheers to you.
[PG]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Author
Paul McElligott
Star Wars: Episode 1 - The Phantom Menace
Having seen the original Star Wars films more times than I can count
(more times than any adult cares to admit), I so wanted to love this
movie.  I was mentally prepared to be swept back into a world I haven't
seen anew since I was 17.  With the imagination behind the first trilogy
re-invigorated by a long rest, and equipped with technology not even
imagined in 1977, I expected an unequalled triumph of the imagination.
Okay, there were a few warning signs along the way.  Two years ago, when
the first trilogy was re-released with new effects, the key scene where
Han Solo (Harrison Ford) guns down the bounty hunter Greedo was
re-edited so Greedo fired first.   Not only did the new version look
ridiculous, it also emasculated a key character, softening his rough
edges.  This told me that Lucas was not making creative decisions purely
on artistic merit, but that a politically correct element had crept into
his thinking.
The trailers, however, looked good, filling me with hope that Episode I
would take the Star Wars saga to new heights.
Such is not the case, however.  The Phantom Menace is such a mixed bag
of small pleasures and major disappointments that it's hard to decide
whether or not I actually liked the movie.  (I'll probably have to see
it four or five times to be sure).
The biggest problem with the film is the relative flatness of the
characters.  The first film had clearly defined personalities that
contrasted well.  They were archetypes, of course (the farm boy, the
princess in distress, the soldier of fortune and the old wizard), but
they were well-drawn archetypes inhabited by talented actors.   In The
Phantom Menace, everyone seems to be of the manor born, always speaking
in high, formal language.  None of the personalities stand out well from
the others.  In the first film, even when the characters were speaking
more formal tones, there was still a spark of humanity and humor ("I
thought I recognized your foul stench when I was brought on board").
Something else missing was a clearly defined threat to care about, such
as in the first film, when the Rebels had to destroy the Death Star to
keep themselves and their planet from being blown to tiny bits.  There
is no such easily understood threat here.  Part of the problem is that,
although we are told that the people of Naboo are suffering greatly at
the hands of the Trade Federation, we don't see any example of that on
screen.  I'm not asking for the film to wallow in unpleasantness, but
rather just for anything that would have personalized the situation and
given it some urgency.
In a sense, the title of this film seems rather apt, since the true
villain of this peace never really materializes.  The on-screen threat,
the Trade Federation viceroy and his battle 'droids seem to be a poor
substitute for Darth Vader, Grand Moff Tarkin and Imperial Storm
Troopers.  The really interesting threat, in the persons of the Sith
Lords Darth Sidious and Darth Maul, get far too little screen time.
Darth Maul is a great villain, as far as he goes, but is far too
underutilized here.
I'm not going to fault the quality of the acting too much, since the
actors were given so little to work with.  Ewan McGregor (Obi-Wan
Kenobi) seems especially wasted in a rule that should have had far more
spark and humor.  Liam Neeson () gets a little more meat to chew on, but
even he seems a hemmed in this role.  And as much as I like Samuel L.
Jackson (Mace Windu), I have to wonder how much of a long distance bill
he ran up while basically phoning in his brief appearance.
On the plus side, Natalie Portman (Queen Amidala) brings sweetness and
surprising strength to her role.  Jake Lloyd (Anakin Skywalker), despite
early rumors that his performance was a problem spot for the film, is
also charming and affecting as the ordinary boy who grows up to be Darth
Vader.  Ian McDiarmid is also effective as Senator Palpatine, the future
Emperor, but it is the two young stars that almost save this film's
bacon.
I have to admit that I did not mind the character of Jar Jar Binks,
Qui-Gon Jinn's reluctant comic sidekick.  So much negative hype about
how annoying this character was going to be had spread like wildfire
though the Star Wars fan community that it was impossible for Jar Jar to
live down to it.  My only reservation about this character is that he
was essentially the only source of humor in this film, and it was almost
all slapstick.  There was none of the witty dialogue that typified the
characters of Princess Leia and Han Solo ("It was a boring conversation
anyway") in the first trilogy.  That is one element this film sorely
needed.
I won't give away too much, but the ending of this film seems to depend
far too much on luck and accident, both in the ground battle and up in
space.  As far as the space battle goes, it may be Anakin's abilities
with the Force manifesting themselves, but that is not made clear enough
if it is true.
>From a technical standpoint, of course, the film is faultless.  Director
and writer George Lucas creates totally fantastic and believable worlds
on which we can feast our eyes.  Never once did I find myself looking at
a creature or environment in this film and thinking, "That's a special
effect."
It's a shame that the story doesn't quite live up to the setting.  Of
course, Titanic had the same problem, and it didn't do too badly.
Still, Lucas needs to get a better handle on dealing with characters and
the actors who play them as he goes to work on the next film.  I can't
help but think that a director who hadn't been in the chair in more than
20 years could have tried a smaller, more intimate film before
attempting the most technically ambitious film of all time.
On the plus side, this film more than whets my appetite to see Episode
II, coming in 2002.  The Phantom Menace sets up a number of future
sub-plots that are potentially far more interesting than anything in the
film.
I give the film a 7.5 out of 10.  That's 5 out of 5 for technical merit
and 2.5 out of 5 for artistic impression

Author
Greg King
THE PHANTOM MENACE (PG).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: George Lucas
Stars: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Terence Stamp, Samuel L Jackson, Frank Oz, Ray Park, Kenny
Baker, Anthony Daniels, Pernilla August, Ralph Brown, Hugh Quarshie,
Ahmed Best
Running time: 130 minutes.
Expectations have been high for this eagerly awaited and long
overdue prequel to George Lucas' classic sci-fi adventure Star Wars.
Given the barrage of hype that has preceded the movie, Star Wars
Episode 1, subtitled The Phantom Menace, was always going to have a
hard job living up to those lofty expectations.  Inevitably, The
Phantom Menace is a little disappointing!  The original Star Wars was
a film ahead of its time; The Phantom Menace is merely a film for its
time!
Returning to the director's chair after a twenty year absence,
Lucas takes the audience back to the beginning of his envisaged nine
part saga, and introduces us to the young Anakin Skywalker.  As every
Star Wars fan knows, Anakin is the Jedi knight who, of course, later
grew up to father both Luke Skywalker and Princess Leia before
crossing over to the dark side of the force as the evil Darth Vader.
Caught in the middle of a trade war between the powerful
Federation and the peaceful planet of Naboo, Jedi knights Qui-Gon Jinn
(Liam Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) try to
negotiate a settlement.  While on the planet of Tatooin, Jinn
recognises the nascent power of the young slave Anakin (played with
charm by Jake Lloyd), and decides to take him under his wing.
In many ways, The Phantom Menace follows the broad plot
threads of the original Star Wars, although without the same sense of
wonder and inspiration.  What was once a simple fable about the battle
between good and evil has become far more mystical and mythic, and
occasionally bogged down in more complex ideas.  In establishing the
framework for what follows, Lucas raises nearly as many questions as
he answers.
One of the main problems is that the film is occasionally a
little slow, with some passages of plot development that will prove
tiresome and a little boring for younger audiences.  The film also
lacks any villain as imposing or as intimidating as Darth Vader.
Instead, the best Lucas can offer us here is the rather bland and
forgettable Darth Maul (played by martial arts champion Ray Park, in
his film debut).  There is a much more obvious emphasis on slap stick
humour throughout this film, especially with antics of the accident
prone Jar-Jar Binks, a computer generated character who speaks his own
strange language.
However, some of the action sequences are quite exciting, with
a couple of light sabre duels and a battle sequence between two
digitally created armies.  The undoubted highlight is the pod race, an
incredible sequence that resembles a futuristic version of the famous
chariot race from Ben Hur for the Nintendo generation.
The special effects and state of the art computer generated
imagery, which took some two years to complete, is indeed spectacular,
and represents the future direction of film making.  Unfortunately, it
is a pretty heartless and soulless future in which human performers
are dwarfed by increasingly spectacular effects and technology.
About 90% of The Phantom Menace has been digitally created,
and the human performers seem a little lost when called upon to
interact with their brilliantly realised cyberspace universe.  In many
ways this is symptomatic of Lucas, a pioneer of digital effects, who
shows little understanding of the emotional development of his
characters.  Lucas seems to regard his human cast as mere accessories
to his whiz bang technology and cynical mass marketing techniques,
and, in this aspect, he is light years ahead of Hitchcock in his
reputed disdain for actors.
Neeson, who normally has a powerful screen presence, seems a
little awkward here, while McGregor seems as bewildered and as
uncomfortable as Alec Guiness did in the same role twenty years ago.
Performers of the calibre of Terence Stamp and Samuel L Jackson are
wasted in small, undemanding roles.
Many of the new characters introduced here are fairly
unimpressive.  Whereas we once might have followed the charismatic Han
Solo, the impetuous Luke Skywalker and the feisty Princess Leia to the
ends of the galaxy, I'm not so sure that I'd follow this bland and
forgettable lot for a stroll in the park!

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Star Wars: Episode I -- The Phantom Menace (1999)
Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Pernilla 
August, Frank Oz, Ian McDiarmid, Oliver Ford Davies, Hugh Quarshie, 
Ahmed Best, Samuel L. Jackson, Ray Park, Peter Serafinowicz, Ralph 
Brown, Terence Stamp, Brian Blessed, Sofia Coppola. Music by John 
Williams. Written and directed by George Lucas. 131 minutes.
Rated PG, 3.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests 
On a Wednesday afternoon in 1977, I casually decided to catch an 
opening day matinee of "Star Wars." I knew nothing about the movie. 
Aside from a large, nondescript ad in the Sunday paper, there was no 
local hype for the film. The last sci-fi picture to play Indianapolis,
 "Logan's Run," proved quite a disappointment, so my expectations for 
this new offering were nil. At the uncrowded theater (the frenzy 
would not hit until the weekend), I entered with an open mind and 
emerged with an ear-to-ear grin on my face. 
22 years later, I tried to attend a critics' screening of "Star Wars: 
Episode I -- The Phantom Menace" with a similar frame of mind. To 
hell with the hype, to hell with analytical viewing, and to hell with 
the plot, for that matter. I would just sit back and let the movie 
wash over me. When I left the theater 131 minutes later, my grin was 
far less broad than in my youth, but it was still a treat to revisit 
George Lucas' universe. 
"The Phantom Menace" is a feast for the eyes and ears. The images of 
exotic cities on distant worlds are spectacular and the myriad alien 
species wildly imaginative. John Williams' rich, sweeping score 
enhances every aspect of the production, from the action scenes to 
the quiet moments. Lucas offers larger than life characters and a 
mythic storyline tempered to a degree by comic relief. But despite 
the presence of so many of the right elements, the production leaves 
an oddly distant feel, because Lucas forgot the all important Han 
Solo factor.
This film desperately needs a wisecracking swashbuckler, someone for 
viewers to identify with so we can vicariously experience the story 
rather than simply observe it. In Episodes Four, Five and Six, Han 
Solo fit the bill perfectly, always ready with a caustic remark, a 
glib aside and open expressions of anger, fear and, occasionally, 
heartfelt sentiment. He humanized the proceedings in a way that no 
character does here. 
In "The Phantom Menace," the primary players are a boy, two Jedi 
knights and a Queen. The Jedi Master and his apprentice project the 
inner serenity appropriate for disciples of the Force. The Queen, due 
to her station in life, must maintain an air of dignity and the child 
mostly remains in awe of the incredible goings-on around him. As a 
result, we witness a grand adventure enacted with far too much 
restraint and reserve. To truly engage us, we need at least one full-
fledged adventurer. Instead, we must make due with a kid surrounded 
by royalty and Mennonites. The actors are all fine, but Lucas plops 
them into a stifling stylistic box.
Comic relief is provided by Jar Jar Binks, a computer-animated 
sidekick who speaks in a fractured fashion reminiscent of Jamaican 
patois and falls down a lot. Initially, Jar Jar is phenomenally 
annoying, but he grew on me as the film progressed and, towards the 
end, was almost likable. Other humorous touches include a two-headed 
sports announcer who provides lively commentary during a high-speed 
race, and Ewan McGregor's hair. The Jedi apprentice sports a close-
cropped 'do with a long rattail, the kind of style that was popular 
in the '80s and now is worn only by the young sons of aging rednecks. 
McGregor's hair serves as a reminder that the story is indeed set "a 
long time ago in a galaxy far, far away." Later scenes feature a vast 
army of battle 'droids whose bowling-pin heads suspiciously resemble 
that of Crow, the wiseacre robot from "Mystery Science Theater 3000." 
Coincidence? Perhaps, but I suspect their appearance is a sly homage 
from Lucas.  
Although set decades before "Star Wars: A New Hope," several 
treasured characters from the initial trilogy appear in "The Phantom 
Menace." The ever-cranky Yoda pops up, as does plucky little R2-D2 
and a not-yet-finished version of C-3PO, history's first gay robot. 
As a young Obi-Wan Kenobi, Ewan McGregor adds a nice touch of 
continuity by echoing Alec Guinness' vocal cadences. 
But, for better or worse, personalities are the least of "Star Wars: 
Episode I -- The Phantom Menace." The main pleasures of the film come 
with the spectacle of it all; from a wild flight past a magnificent 
underwater city to a razzle-dazzle pod race that is half "Ben-Hur," 
half Indy 500. While "The Phantom Menace" is emotionally remote, it 
is also unquestionably sumptuous. This installment of George Lucas' 
self-described "Saturday afternoon serial for children" may not be 
the best in the series, but it certainly has its share of rewards. To 
enjoy the production, do your best to forget all the hype and just 
let the movie wash over you.

Author
Mac VerStandig
Director George Lucas' fourth undertaking of the Star Wars legacy is his
strongest. Star Wars: Episode One - The Phantom Menace has qualities that
make it a fine film. The special effects are some of the most dazzling and
amazing ever seen on the big screen. In addition, the acting is excellent.
However, that is met by an exceptionally weak plot that makes the 130 minute
film, about a half-hour too long.
The latest Star Wars installment takes place in the realm of space at a time
unknown. The evil Trade Federation is plotting to take over the planet
Naboo. The key to this task is having Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman) of the
Naboo people sign a treaty. Having intelligence and courage far beyond her
young years, the Queen refuses in the interest of her people.
In an attempt to negotiate a trade agreement, Jedi Knight Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam
Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) come to the Trade
Federation, acting as peacekeepers of sorts. The Trade Federation is opposed
to the Jedi, and therefor tries to kill these two ambassadors at once. If
this situation seems a little sketchy or lacking explanation and detail,
that is probably because the movie has none, something that is inexcusable
for a film calling itself "Episode One."
As the plot, or lack thereof limps along for the next two hours, you meet
several new characters. This long list includes some robots called R2-D2 and
C3-P0, creatures named Jar Jar Binks and Yoda, and a little boy named Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) who is thought to be the so called "chosen one" of
the Jedi Force.
The other blunder in relation to the story is its complexity. This is a film
aimed at all audiences, proudly wearing a PG rating. But some of the
political aspects are far too elaborate for young audiences. A key point of
the film's later stage focuses around an intergalactic senate. As is, that
is a concept needing explanation for children. But almost all youngsters are
bound to be lost when the primary focus of a scene shifts to a no confidence
vote, again with no definition offered for those who are not already
familiar with this form of political assassination. In this aspect, the film
fails to truly reach a versatile audience of all ages.
Some 22 years ago, a little film called Star Wars revolutionized special
effects. The director had created something once thought to be an oxymoron:
low budget eye candy. Today Lucas has once again produced a film that is
delightful to watch. The light saber fights that the series is famous for,
are astonishing to see once again. For instance, take a climatic scene where
Qui-Gon Jinn and Obi-Wan Kenobi find themselves fighting an evil creature
named Darth Maul (Ray Park). This is a moment that would ordinarily be
ruined by the gross predictability of the scene, but the dazzling
choreography and vivacious site of laser beams striking each other, hold the
audience over and actually makes watching the moment a voluptuous surprise.
Despite early bickering to the media about the experience of making an
effects driven science fiction film, Liam Neeson gives an immense
performance. Ewan McGregor does so as well. They bring quality to a script
plagued by obscenely distressed dialogue. Almost always on screen as a duo,
the two clearly have chemistry together. The finest example of this occurs
in the beginning of the film when the two are acting as ambassadors in the
Trade Federation, and come into their first battle scene alone together. The
surprise displayed by the two as they realize an attack upon them is
imminent, in combination with their performance fighting the creatures, is
simply magnificent.
Despite the positive screen presence of the film's key actors, and enjoyable
effects, Star Wars: Episode One - The Phantom Menace is about a half-hour
too long. It is slow to start in the beginning and there are fewer action
sequences in this installment than previous versions. It would come as
little surprise if the die-hard fans who stood in line for days to get
opening night tickets, caught up on some much needed sleep during the film's
slower parts.
Some movies are just different. They are not like the other films that come
out each year. They are unique. That is not necessarily to say that these
productions are the best works of cinema. Star Wars: Episode One - The
Phantom Menace is certainly one of these movies. It does not matter how good
or bad the various elements of this production are, because most people
aren't going to see it for the normal reasons. When you consider the
aforementioned fans that camped out for tickets, the 22 year legacy of the
series, and just the overall zest that Lucas gives each of these works, you
come to a simple conclusion: Star Wars: Episode One - The Phantom Menace is
not so much a film as an event, and because of that, everyone should see
this movie.

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
An even longer time ago in a galaxy far, far away ...
Imagine a world different to ours.  Imagine a world where in the mid
90s George Lucas falls on hard times.  Desperate for money, he is
approached by a shadowy corporation.  The rights to "Star Wars" change
hands.  From their sweaty, crowded offices (based in a remote tropical
country for tax and legal conveniences), the new owners hatch their
plans for a quick buck.  Using evidence carefully accumulated over the
years (photos of adolesents, movies on no-one's resume), several A-list
actors are blackmailed into cooperating.  The cast is completed by
extras who are willing to pay to get into the film.  Large quantities
of special effects are ordered and shoehorned into the film, primarily
to cover up for the sullen acting.  Those who refuse to cooperate are
tranquilized and lead through their scenes.  The production takes a
single month.  Direction is done by members of the local cinema club,
editing by the corporate accountant.  Journalists are leant on,
critics bribed, fan groups lead along.  Anyone who asks for a
merchandising license is given one.  The whole world eagerly awaits
"The Fandom Menace".
A question: could this film be distinguished from the one that was
released in our world?
The original "Star Wars" trilogy is a flimsy hero for all the
monuments that have been built to it.  The storyline is thin, the
acting only passable, the direction competent, the universe simplistic
(and, "Chasing Amy" jokes aside, astoundingly white Anglo-saxon).  It
contains nothing that has not been done before in SF/F. But that's
largely the point: if you're going to make a dumb swashbuckling space
opera, it had better swash and buckle.  For better or worse, that is
what the original trilogy did.  The passion of the most fanatic "Star
Wars" fans is inexplicable, but it is a durable piece of escapist
entertainment.
And then we come to "The Phantom Menace", which is not a terrible
film, but is terribly disappointing, banal and disjointed even by the
subterranean standards of fandom.  A movie only a marketer could love,
its central problem is simple: it is badly made.  The acting tanks,
the dialogue is terrible, the script (there is no other word for it)
sucks.  It is disorganised and careless, a dumb film trying to be
meaningful, an adult film unable to explain itself, a child's film that
is pretentious.
The plot is best left untold, lest the malevolent demons that had
apparently possessed the script-writers during production are invoked. 
At best it's pedestrian (about a tax dispute!)  and sprints from scene
to scene with hurried explanations.  At worst it becomes deliriously
stupid, a few gems being:
   * Anakin building, in his spare time from bits and pieces, the
   fastest podracer on Tatooine which he races and wins in, untested.
   * A sub-Duchovnian explaination for the Force, which sounds like an
   amalgam of the ideas that L Ron Hubbard and Wilhelm Reich rejected.
   * The virgin birth of Anakin, which is either a gobsmackingly wide
   Christ metaphor (which makes no sense) or a desperately lateral
   attempt to avoid mentioning sex and so get that family rating
   certificate.  (Actually I don't think anyone in the Star Wars
   universe has sex - the only person we meet who ever has is Darth
   and he's batting for the other side.  Which is to say, he's a
   figure of ultimate evil.  Go figure.)
   * Jar Jar Binks, a cringing Uncle Tom figure with an impenetrable
   accent who walks like he has a specific gravity less than cotton
   candy.  Even during the somber scenes, he's dancing about in the
   background doing pratfalls.  This demonstrates how advanced the
   "Star Wars' universe is: Instead of prejudice towards non-white,
   non-male humans (not that there are very many in "The Phantom
   Menace"), there is prejudice towards aliens.
Even those in the cast who usually turn in strong performances
(Neeson, McGregor, Portman) are terrible.  The suppporting cast is
hideous, especially the utterly resistable Jake Lloyd as Anakin
Skywalker.  (Or "Ani", as it's pronounced in Tatooine mallspeak.) 
With lines like "Yippee!"  and "But Mom, didn't you tell me the
problem with the universe is that noone wants to get involved?", I
don't wonder the Jedi don't want to train him.  He'd spend every
morning at Jedi High getting his head flushed in the toilet by other
students.
However, the worse thing about "The Phantom Menace" is its lack of
imagination, Lucas literally self-cannibalising from the original
trilogy: Anakin (Luke) flying in and destroying the robot control
station (death star) with the help of R2D2, the Gungan natives (Ewoks)
fighting a delaying battle as the Jedi try to shut down a vital
installation; the death of the old Jedi and passing of the flame to
the new Jedi.  Pop has not only eaten itself, it is smacking its lips
and clammering for dessert.  So eager is the director to connect to
the original story that it becomes almost autoerotic as old characters
are rushed by the camera: R2D2, C3P0, Jabba, Greedo, Yoda.  Even
Obiwan doesn't have any real reason to be in this film.  He spends
most of the film looking worried and doing the Jedi equivalent of
pumping his fist and shouting "Yeah - what he said!"
Is there anything good about "The Phantom Menace"?  Some of the sets
are impressive, for the scant seconds we see them.  Some action scenes
like the podrace and lightsaber fights come to colorful life,
unspoiled by brain-damaged dialogue.  It is interesting to note that
these scenes would have been under the control of the SFX director and
action choreographer.
How come "The Phantom Menace" is bad?  How did the most anticipated
and tightly controlled movie of all times get to be so bad?  For many,
the villian of choice is creator Lucas, guilty of fathering the
"blockbuster movie", the dumb, hyper-merchandised and rigidly
formulaic films that pollute our screens each year.  This accusation
seems hollow to me.  The marketing of any of the original "Star Wars"
trilogy comes nowhere near that as is now routinely practiced.  Even
if there is a direct causal chain from the "Star Wars" to
"Independence Day" and "Wild Wild West", it couldn't have been
foreseen.  The vast bounty that Lucas has made from Star Wars is as
much a historical accident as anything.  Conversely, it's difficult to
blame the makers of the over-hyped films that followed, the Emmerichs,
the Spielbergs, the Sonnefelds.  When the success of a movie is so
ruthlessly bent to marketing, can they be blamed for saying "I want
some of that?"
Similarly, it's very easy to accuse Lucas of just milking the public
for squillions of dollars.  No doubt he will do well out of TPM, and
certainly the hype and control exercised by him were extraordinary. 
But this falls far short of evidence for avarice on his part.  (And
realistically, just how much more money could he use?)  No, I think
Lucas is sincere and the juggernaut way he controls his creation is
just a mark of how much he cares about his product, how much he wants
to enthral people, to create a phenomena.
And he doesn't have the skill.  The lumbering script is evidence of
that.  The cannibalisation of everything he has seen, including his
own movies, is evidence of that.  The incoherent, leaden direction is
evidence of that.  Lucas is the reason "The Phantom Menace" is bad,
but this can't explain how it was allowed to become bad.
The culprits, I fear, are us, the audience.  We've allowed ourselves
to be fired-up by publicity, to be dragged along to see a "Star Wars"
film, no matter what it is.  We'll go and see a lousy movie, just so
we're not left out of loop of conversation.  This is why marketing is
everything and quality is nothing.  Ask yourself just how bad "the
Pahntom Menace" would have to be before you wouldn't see.  People
could be dropping dead in the aisles or driven blind by the sheer
badness, and most of us would still say: "Well, the death rate is down
in recent sessions, so maybe we'll wait until the weekend ..."
"The Phantom Meance" is crap, but then that's what movies are now, and
always will be.  At least while we keep going to them.  It may be a
futile gesture, it's unlikely to make you any happier, but skip the
next blockbuster, skirt the next load of hype.  It's the only
solution.  [*/misfire] and "like a thousands voices had cried out" on
the Sid and Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: ***1/2 (out of 4 = very good)
1999, PG, 131 minutes [2 hours, 11 minutes]
Starring: Liam Neeson (Qui-Gon Jinn); Jake Lloyd (Anakin Skywalker); Natalie 
Portman (Queen Amidala); Ewan McGregor (Obi-Wan Kenobi); produced by Rick 
McCallum; written and directed by George Lucas.
Seen May 19, 1999 at 5 p.m. at the Crossgates Cinema 18 (Guilderland, N.Y.), 
theater #1, with my brother John for $8.50. [Theater rating: ****: excellent 
seats, sound and picture]
(Critic's note: This review is the longest I've ever written and still only 
scratches the surface. I'd recommend this be read only by those who have seen 
the film as a form of critical analysis.)
        As my friend and fellow film critic Ted Prigge said in his review of 
`The Phantom Menace' - how do I even write this review? Never mind the fact 
that I've been waiting for a new `Star Wars' movie since I was seven years 
old. Never mind the fact everyone on the Internet had already dissected and 
discussed the movie before it was even released. Never mind that there's so 
much going on in this movie in terms of plot, action, special effects and 
long-term story that to analyze every aspect would take a lot of time and 
energy and still wouldn't cover everything.
        And also like Ted does in all of his reviews, I'll try to review this 
in a way different from my usual reviews and instead write as casually as 
possible as if I was talking directly to you, the reader.
        Before we can begin analyzing the specific aspects of the film, many 
of the most general and most significant factors must be considered (to get 
the specifics of the film, skip this and the next four paragraphs). As has 
been made obvious for the last several years, another trilogy of films will 
be produced to account for the [missing] initial three installments of the 
`Star Wars' series (the first of the films was actually episode four, not 
one). George Lucas, the creator of the series, has probably just assumed most 
people know the first-produced trilogy (`Star Wars,' `The Empire Strikes 
Back' and `Return Of The Jedi') is actually the second trilogy, 
chronologically. In media interviews in the past he has explained why the 
movies were made out of order, but I can't recall his reasons. With this new 
film he as writer and director has also assumed viewers are at least vaguely 
familiar with the storylines and significant plot points of the first trilogy 
(err... second trilogy... well you know what I mean). And in order for this 
review to be thorough many of those significant points must be mentioned 
which, unfortunately, may serve as spoilers so proceed with caution.
        [Critic's note #1: It is one my personal policy not to intentionally 
analyze spoilers because I would like my reviews to be able to make sense to 
the reader both before and after viewing the film reviewed, but it would be 
nearly impossible to do the film justice here without breaking the rule. 
Critic's note #2: Reviewing this film also breaks the universal critics' law 
of reviewing movies, which as Roger Ebert coined, `It's not what a movie is 
about, but how it is about it.' Because so many outside factors come into 
play in the film's plot and significance as part of a trilogy, and just 
considering modern society, it again would be difficult, if not impossible to 
simply review the film as a completely autonomous story.]
        First of all we have to catalog what we know about the film before 
even going into it. We know that young Anakin Skywalker will grow up to 
become the evil ruler Darth Vader who is also the father of Luke Skywalker, 
who will lead a successful revolution against him and his Empire. We know 
Obi-Wan `Ben' Kenobi was the trainer of Anakin in the ways of `The Force' in 
attempts to become a Jedi Knight, but would fail and thus Anakin would fall 
to the `Dark Side.' We also know something about `The Force' itself, that it 
is some kind of universal force which determines fate and can be manipulated 
by those whose minds are expanded enough to believe in it and feel it (the 
Jedi). 
         What we don't know for sure is the history of the ruling of the 
galaxy, which is most likely much longer and more complex than any government 
we have had here on Earth. To me, this was one of the most fascinating 
aspects of the first three films because there seemed to be a subtle, 
definite order to all the complexity. 
        Also, it seems that we're supposed to be familiar with a few other 
details about the story which have come out of the thousands of comic books 
and paperbacks published in the years since the movies ended. Most notably, 
details regarding the Emperor from `Empire' and `Jedi,' and that he was once 
a senator and his last name is Palpatine. For those who haven't kept up with 
all the `Star Wars' paraphernalia over the years, there is still a way to 
know these details simply by recognizing an actor (or his voice at least).
        With `The Phantom Menace' being the first chapter of a long saga, one 
would assume the basic groundwork would be laid, including the history behind 
all the major factors of the series, especially `The Force' and the Jedi 
Knights. Unfortunately, this film does more of the opposite as it simply 
builds on top of what must be a history so long and detailed it could never 
be explained.
        I didn't liked that aspect to this film and is one of the reasons it 
falls just short of greatness. If you're going to tell a story from the 
beginning - tell it from the beginning (is it possible that after this 
trilogy is complete there could be another trilogy of episodes -1 through -3 
to clarify the back story even further?).
        But I digress. I've said so much and yet I haven't even touched on 
the specifics of the film itself. All these necessary `disclaiming' elements 
should go to show just how vast the story of the `Star Wars' series is and 
this individual film itself.
        What we get here is a movie not unlike any of the other three we've 
come to know and love since the late 1970s. Its similarity to the other films 
helps to keep the spirit of the series familiar, but at the same time seems 
to be a flaw in the filmmaking process itself since it sometimes rings of 
unoriginality.
        The basic story is rather sorted, complex and even confusing at 
times. We're told that an army known as `The Trade Federation' has set up a 
blockade around an seemingly insignificant planet called Naboo. We're not 
given too many details to clarify the back story of what the federation is 
and what their purpose is, instead the film opts to get its story moving 
quickly. 
        We're introduced to two Jedi, the master Qui-Gon Jinn (Neeson) and 
his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (McGregor). The two are acting as ambassadors 
of some sort in hopes of ending the obvious hostility between the federation 
and the planet's queen, Amidala (Portman). The leader of the federation, an 
alien called Viceroy, is following the orders of a strange, mythical 
character - an older human man whose face and body are covered and shadowed 
by the black robe and hood he wears. He is referred to as Lord Sidious but 
considering his appearance, and especially that creepy evil voice of his, he 
is a obviously one of the most significant characters in the series.
        Sidious communicates to Viceroy only through digital transmissions 
and never in person. Clearly his actual whereabouts are something he wants to 
keep secret because that would also reveal his identity (which is never 
openly revealed in the film, but should be clear to most viewers. I have a 
feeling we'll delve into his background in the next two films).
        The film doesn't have one specific plot and works in the same manner 
as the other films in the series where as what we get is one mini-plot and 
adventure on top of another. There are so many of these 
mini-plots-within-plots in this film I would not describe them all because it 
is what gives the movie its hook. The other films have relied on this type of 
storytelling, but because of the limits of the technology at the time, the 
films' screenplays were also limiting.
        The sense of limitlessness here is what gives `The Phantom Menace' 
its unique traits.
        As we already know, the film takes place at least a generation or two 
before the original `Star Wars' trilogy which means a lot of the background 
which was unclear and/or unexplained may be cleared up here as it is the 
beginning of the vast epic story. And here the most significant storyline is 
that involving the discovery of 10-year-old Anakin Skywalker (Lloyd), by 
Qui-Gon Jinn and his introduction to the Jedi Council.
        To briefly summarize the story, Jinn stumbles upon Skywalker in an 
attempt to buy parts for Queen Amidala's spaceship which was damaged in 
efforts to free her from the federation. Their meeting on Tatooine is mostly 
chance but of course Jinn chalks it up to the will of the Force. Jinn can 
feel that Skywalker has a great natural power in the Force, and through 
another sub-plot involving a bet on Skywalker in a fantastic race he will 
enter, more and more details of his significance begin to reveal themselves.
        This also provides for a new elaboration and explanation of the Force 
which has never been mentioned before. In fact, it seems to be something so 
important it is upsetting it has never been mentioned before. The element 
seriously undermines the mystical aspect of the Force and transforms it into 
something more physical and scientific which is completely unnecessary.
        By the film's third act all the major significant elements become 
tied together in a rather familiar execution of the plot. It's funny how the 
reality of the `Star Wars' world seems so embedded in mythology, New Age-like 
philosophy and religion and yet the solution to all the major conflicts in 
the series has been violence.
        Not that this technique hasn't been used in movies and in real-life 
situations countless times throughout history. And at least it's all in the 
spirit of the ultimate powers of good versus evil in a fun and exciting 
matter. It does border of the cartoonish sometimes, but that's just the film 
appealing to our inner child, which is the basic reason the entire saga 
exists and has become such a big part of our modern society.
        `The Phantom Menace' delivers exactly what you'd expect from a `Star 
Wars' film which is why it succeeds as well as it does but is always why it 
never truly achieves greatness. So many things in the film we've seen before 
and done with more heart because the filmmakers concentrated just a bit more 
on story and character because they were limited. But this film is far from 
bad because it at least embraces the spirit of sheer fun at the movies.

Author
Justin Felix
THE PHANTOM MENACE (1999)  
(a.k.a. STAR WARS: EPISODE ONE)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery --
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0699/movie2.html  
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com 
Written and directed by George Lucas.  
Starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman.  
Rated PG (contains violence)  131 mins.  
Synopsis:  Jedi Knight Qui-Gon Jinn and his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi,
protect the cute Queen Amidala and the computer-generated Jar Jar Binks from
bad Federation trade aliens and the menacing Darth Maul.  In the meantime,
they meet a young Anakin Skywalker and have their faces plastered on
T-shirts, boxer shorts, computer games, coloring books, potato chip bags,
action figures, and Taco Bell cups.  
Comments:  It is finally here.  After months of near-continual hype and fan
speculation, the first STAR WARS movie in 16 years has been released.  The
product tie-ins can only be described as an onslaught.  Walking into any
Wal-Mart or K-Mart right now is like entering Mel Brooks' store in
SPACEBALLS (a parody of the original STAR WARS trilogy).  Lines began
forming nearly a month prior to THE PHANTOM MENACE's release, and its
first-day box office total is a record.  Amongst all the interviews,
trailers, and plastic Taco Bell cups, one may ask "Is this all worth it?"
Despite whatever negative thing you may have heard from movie critics privy
to advance screenings, the answer is "yes it is!"
Whether or not THE PHANTOM MENACE "beats" TITANIC as the biggest-grossing
film of all time seems largely irrelevant to me.  THE PHANTOM MENACE,
whatever it ultimately grosses, may be the biggest movie event of the decade
(it certainly is the most anticipated).  As such, it seems to be attracting
some controversy:  Is it as good as the ground-breaking STAR WARS, EMPIRE
STRIKES BACK, and RETURN OF THE JEDI?  Is it too childish?  Is it too hyped?
The answer to all three, as far as I'm concerned, is yes.  But who cares?
Going to the theater and watching THE PHANTOM MENACE was fun.  It was very
fun.  From start to finish.  I can't wait to see it again.  This is a movie
to see in the theaters again and again.  How many times does one honestly
feel that way about a film?  (Science fiction fans, by the way, are having a
good year.  THE MATRIX, released a month or two ago, was also very
entertaining, though, unlike THE PHANTOM MENACE, it isn't a movie for the
kids.)  Before rambling on and on about the movie, perhaps a brief overview
is in order.  
THE PHANTOM MENACE is a prequel to the earlier STAR WARS trilogy.  Yet,
anyone who has seen the last STAR WARS movie, RETURN OF THE JEDI, can most
certainly tell, right away, that technology has advanced considerably.  At
its heart, THE PHANTOM MENACE is a visual movie.  George Lucas has created a
jaw-dropping whopper of a visual feast for the eyes.  Using, once again,
ground-breaking technology, he has constructed convincing alien vistas.  One
planet, Coruscant, featured giant skyscrapers and countless ships which
continuously zigzagged across the horizon, while another planet, Naboo,
contained vast underwater cities.  Stunningly designed creatures inhabit
these places.  In a memorable scene early in the movie, the Jedi Knights and
Jar Jar are nearly consumed by a giant fish.  They are saved only when an
even larger fish preys on the smaller.
One common criticism of THE PHANTOM MENACE is that it lacks well-developed
characters.  While this complaint does hold some validity, it did not really
seem to hinder the movie's overall impact.  The human characters are
well-played by fine actors.  Qui-Gon Jinn is played by Liam Neeson, a
wonderful actor perhaps most notable for playing the lead in the powerful
World War II film SCHINDLER'S LIST.  Obi-Wan Kenobi is handled ably by Ewan
McGregor (yes, amazingly, the same Ewan McGregor who played Rent Boy in the
heroin flick TRAINSPOTTING).  The young and appealing Natalie Portman played
Queen Amidala.  She's appeared in a number of other films, including one of
my favorites, HEAT, one of the most overlooked and underappreciated action
films of the decade.  Throw in Samuel Jackson as a Jedi, and you've got some
serious talent at your disposal.  
Yet, if anything, the acting seems subdued and takes a second stage to the
visuals of the film.  The most memorable characters, in fact, are memorable
for their appearance.  Queen Amidala, for instance, changes outfits in
nearly every scene, several of which are strikingly offbeat, bizarre, and,
well, alien.  My favorite of the new characters, Darth Maul, has a look that
is well-conceived.  Bloodshot red eyes, scarlet and black tattoos(?), and
bony protubrences make him seem like the devil himself.  Darth Maul, unlike
his counterpart in the original trilogy, Darth Vader, has very few lines.
He rasps something about gaining revenge, at last, on the Jedi, but, for the
most part, he just looks evil and tries to kick the living crap out of the
Jedi.  As I watched the film, I wanted to know much more than was revealed
about this character, but, afterward, I changed my mind.  Somehow, in
retrospect, he seems more evil having not been developed.  Once again, the
most memorable scene involving this character was a visual not a verbal
scene.  In the climatic battle between the Jedi, Darth Maul is seperated
from his opponents by some sort of transparent blast shield.  Maul paces the
length of the shield back and forth, like a wild animal in a cage, glowering
at the men he is about to fight.  If you haven't seen the movie, trust me,
this is good stuff.  Maul seems to have the habit of just appearing at
certain times, immediately ready to kick ass.  
Jar Jar Binks, a computer-generated character, was perhaps my biggest
concern going into the film.  I'm not a big fan of the goofy, cutesy stuff
in the original trilogy.  The Ewoks, for instance, are too teddy bear-ish
for my taste.  Yet, to my surprise, the comic relief coming from Jar Jar was
usually quite effective.  The floppy-eared character stumbles from one scene
to another, and, though not always on target, its humorous exploits often
elicited a laugh from me.
A couple of minor things did bother me enough to downgrade this movie from a
five-star rating.  These things, by no mean, subtract from my recommendation
of this movie to anybody.  I was disappointed, however, that Lucas chose to
give some kind of biological, scientific explanation for the Force.
Qui-Gon, for instance, has Anakin's blood analyzed because it is unusually
concentrated with some gobbedlygook.  This seemed to take a lot of the
mysticism out of the Force.  Also, occasionally, Lucas gets a little too
carried away with "the messages" in his screenplay.  Some of Anakin's
dialogue suffers because of this.  
Overall, however, THE PHANTOM MENACE receives my high recommendation.  It is
a fun movie that can be enjoyed by all ages.  Don't over-analyze it like I
just did.  Just sit back in the theater seats and enjoy the sights and
sounds (John Williams, by the way, returns to add another magnificent score
to his body of work).  And, if you must, wear that Darth Maul T-shirt and
eat Pez from Star Wars dispensers while you're at it.  

Author
Bill Chambers
THE PHANTOM MENACE **˝ (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers ( starwars@filmfreakcentral.net )
(For more critiques you'll disagree with, visit Film Freak Central:
http://filmfreakcentral.net
Bring a friend!)
starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd
written and directed by George Lucas
I want this review of Star Wars: Episode 1  The Phantom Menace to
stand out from the pack you've been reading, so I will forgo my
typical essay-style approach and discuss the film in bits and pieces.
I can't promise not to spoil anything, but I will do my best to avoid
giving too much away.
Menace takes us back three or four decades before the original Star
Wars (A New Hope to us dweebs). It is the story of Qui-Gon Jinn, a
rebellious Jedi master who becomes, along with his pupil Obi-Wan
Kenobi, embroiled in a trade war. The plot seems vaguely modeled on
The Last of The Mohicans': Qui-Gon plays reluctant guard to nobility
(including Queen Amidala) as he treks a path to freedom; his band is
pursued by the Magua-esque Darth Maul, a bloodthirsty aide to the
Trade Federation. The similarities to James Fenimore Cooper's tale end
at the point when Qui-Gon stops on Tattooine for vessel repairs and
discovers a preternatural little slaveboy possessed of rare mental and
physical gifts. Qui-Gon swears the kid,  Anakin Skywalker, is "the
chosen one," the future Jedi who will bring balance to the force. He
even stakes his (shaky) reputation on it before the Council, which is
headed by Yoda and Mace Windu (Samuel L. Jackson in a cameo).
Qui-Gon, who stands tall, walks swiftly and speaks softly, is the most
compelling new presence in the Star Wars universe. Liam Neeson's
performance recalls the authority of Alec Guiness in the later films,
which is most appropriate, given that Guiness portrayed the mature
Obi-Wan-it's now as if Qui-Gon's self-confidence rubbed off on Obi-Wan
more than any other aspect of his training. Lloyd also shines,
especially in his scenes with Yoda and company; he has a sweet and
innocent face, but there's a trace enough of mischief in his narrow
eyes to leave no doubt this cherubic munchkin will one day submit to
his darkest urges. Jar Jar Binks ("Stomp" dancer Ahmed Best), the
rabbit-eared, six-foot reptile (part of a race called the Gungan) who
follows Qui-Gon around like a loyal servant (and talks like the
stereotypical plantation worker, circa 1800s, an attribute sure to
rankle those members of the black population who already feel
misrepresented in the original trilogy), sporadically amuses but
mostly annoys, especially with his inept soldier schtick during the
climactic battle between the Gungan and hordes of Battle Droids.
(While I'm on the subject of droids, C-3PO and R2-D2 make curiously
perfunctory appearances in The Phantom Menace-though they normally
supply the comic relief, only Jar Jar's theatrics are mined for laughs
this time around.)
Also of note are Portman, McGregor, and Ian McDiarmid. The former
plays surely the most beautiful queen in any galaxy-with or without
the Kabuki make-up, she glows like a young Audrey Hepburn, but
Princess Leia she's not. Amidala is ballsy but lacks the sauciness
that endeared Leia to little girls (and, yes, little boys) across the
world. McGregor is marginally more successful as the eager Obi-Wan,
but he is more or less a walking action figure, someone who asks a lot
of questions mostly for the sake of nudging us into the next sequence.
Finally, McDiarmid, as Senator Palpatine, brought a smile to my face
whenever he was on screen; whether by virtue of some fine acting or
the knowledge that Palpatine eventually becomes the dreaded Emperor, I
cannot say.
Perhaps the most disappointing character in Menace is Darth Maul. Fans
have hitched their wagon to the wrong train, it seems (Maul was the
most popular costume at the midnight premiere, and products bearing
his likeness are the best selling Menace merchandise so far), for Maul
is no less robotic than the machines who fight for his cause. His
entire persona is summed up by his double-bladed lightsaber: cool at
first, silly upon reflection.
Lucas didn't want to make another Star Wars movie until CGI equipment
caught up with his imagination. Indeed, Menace is
brimming-overstuffed-with special effects whose detail is impressive.
Yet there's nothing sparklingly original about them, especially
concerning the animated beings. Star Wars and Star Trek share a common
flaw in their creature design. As weird as the bodies and skins get,
the aliens of both galaxies usually have humanoid faces: two eyes, a
nose, and a mouth. Lucas also continues a trend begun in his
refurbished editions of episodes 4, 5, and 6: the monsters of Episode
1 are clownish or juvenile (the appearance of a small Greedo-type
recalls Jim Henson's "Muppet Babies") and, dare I say it, uniquely
synthetic. While the technology now allows for a group of
computer-generated Gungans to flop around like so many Stephen
Fetchits, I still find digital flesh, ninety percent of the time,
thoroughly unconvincing. (The wisest directorial decision Lucas made
was to  have Yoda return in all his foam rubber glory, replete with
strategically placed props to disguise puppeteer Frank Oz.)
More successful are the CGI cityscapes of Couriscant and Naboo, as
well as the many interiors and exteriors of ships. In fact, most of,
if not all, of the non-creature F/X work is breathtaking enough to
give pause to the most jaded viewers.
The myriad explosions and close-calls and laser blasts do tend to
overwhelm Menace's narrative, but it's safe to say that Lucas is a
solid enough filmmaker that he pulls off the Pandemonium with much
more grace than we're accustomed to seeing in summer pictures of this
sort. Yes, we're dealing with a different George Lucas than the one
who made Star Wars back in 1977-that director had budgetary
restrictions imposed on him that really taxed his imagination. The
trash compactor  sequence in Episode IV, so basic it could easily be
duplicated by enterprising teenaged videomakers, holds more suspense
than any similar moment in Menace. ('90s Lucas is also the parent of a
preschooler, and therefore eager to please all ages.) Sometimes, less
is more. Why mince words? Less is always more. That's also why a
simple breathing appartus used by Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan for an
underwater jaunt in Menace fascinates more than the complicated
machinery on display, because it's the kind of goofy prop one might
find in schlocky B-movie serials, one of Lucas' obvious inspirations.
I'm tempted to say The Phantom Menace is uninspired, but it's not. I'm
tempted to say it's uninvolving, but it's far from that. The movie is
burdened with having to lay the groundwork not only for two
hypothetical movies, but a completed series of beloved films, and the
best scenes in Menace (the Jedi Council conferences; Obi-Wan's big
number) indicate that episodes two and three will be more stimulating
affairs. I'd have to say it's a better picture than Return of the
Jedi, but falls into the same third-act trap of juxtaposing a terrific
swordfight with boring, slapstick scenes of combat.
Ultimately, I'd like to see The Phantom Menace again, because there is
so much to drink in. If I have some advice for Lucas it is this: for
the sequel (read: second prequel), write and write and write until
you've defined your characters, because (as any true fan will agree)
it was the rock-solid personalities of Han Solo, Luke Skywalker,
Princess Leia, Chewbacca, C-3PO and R2-D2-and the chemsitry between
them-that endeared the Star Wars trilogy to audiences, not nifty
production values.

Author
Gary Jones
Star Wars Episode1: The Phantom Menace (4/10)
Written and directed by George Lucas. What a scary credit. Who was going
to take his lordship to one side and have a quiet word? "Now I hope you
don't mind me saying this Mr. Lucas, sir... but, well, ummmm.... this
whole story is crap and there are no decent characters in it." 
The film (which his Georgeness has decreed shall at all times be
referred-to by its full title of Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom
Menace) has plenty of computer generated material that is very
impressive, especially the spectacular italian-oriental panoramas of the
planet Naboo, the many sequences featuring the evil Trade Federation's
robot troops and guards, and the zoo-load of new creatures. Having seen
him in the trailers, I was not looking forward to getting to know Jar
Jar Binks, an annoying computer-generated cross between a rabbit and a
cow who is presumably meant to provide the film with some humour as the
witless comic sidekick. He turned out to be not quite as irritating as I
feared, and I nearly, but not quite, actually liked him. But there are
just no decent human characters. Instead we get Liam Neeson as Jedi
knight Qui-Gon Jinn, Ewan McGregor as his apprentice - a young Obi-Wan
Kenobi - and Natalie Portman as the pretty but dull Queen Amidala.
Neeson is as wooden as usual and McGregor's clipped upper-crust Alec
Guiness accent does not suit him and his performance is very flat.
Natalie Portman is probably the only one of the three whose credibility
will benefit from appearing in the film, which suffers from the lack of
a loveable scoundrel like Han Solo and a feisty princess like Leia from
the earlier films. There is an excellent bad-guy in the form of Darth
Maul with his red and black face, horns and double-ended light-sabre.
Maul is played (but not voiced) by martial arts exponent Ray Parks, who
does a great job as the athletic villain who is on screen all too
briefly.
The plot is much too complicated and much too thin at the same time. The
endless talk of tax wars and trade disputes and negotiations involving
the senator from here-or-there and the commssioner of this-or-that
confused me completely. I had no idea what planet I was on half the
time. As best as I could figure it out, the film makes no sense as a
dramatic whole and is just a giant set-up for what happens in episodes
two and three.
The pod race sequence is a fairly exciting rip-off of the chariot race
from Ben Hur, and the battle sequences are well constructed and
animated. There are also some nice little touches for film nerds, such
as the pod from 2001 appearing in a scrap yard, but overall this is a
film that's much too worthy and virtually humourless, despite the best
efforts of Jar Jar Binks and other supposedly comic creatures. But worst
of all, the film is just plain dull. George Lucas has lost the plot and
someone should have a word before it's too late to save the next two
films in the series. The first Star Wars trilogy ended with a stinker.
Let's hope this second trilogy has just got the stinker out of the way. 
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Shane Burridge
The fourth (or is it first?) STAR WARS movie is finally with us (I resist 
the urge to make any pun along the line of 'May the fourth be with you' as 
it's probably already been - oops; too late). So confident am I regarding 
the critical reaction to this film that this review has been written prior 
to any actual viewing of same. Critics around the world have made up their 
minds about it already, so why shouldn't I jump on the bandwagon too?
I should point out firstly that I am not a STAR WARS fan - never have been, 
although I've seen each episode on the big screen three times - so I'm not 
out to grind any axes. I just see the whole business as an interesting 
chapter in pop culture. It's taken the act of film reviewing out of the 
cinema and turned it into something else - a reaction not to a film but to a 
cultural and economic phenomenon. It's where Art and Commerce mix, in a 
galaxy not too far, far away from your local KFC or Toyworld. This of 
course, is anathema to Serious Filmgoers. Who said that these films were 
supposed to make money, especially lots of money? God forbid, that might 
actually empower producers and directors to make more movies in the series.
I haven't read any reviews for THE PHANTOM MENACE yet, but you can tell I've 
already guessed their tone. Nor have I seen any any Making Ofs, interviews, 
picturebooks, or trailers. If you're not going to listen to the anti-hype 
you don't listen to the hype either. But the little that I have heard 
telegraphs the direction many critics' arguments are sure to have taken. 
THE PHANTOM MENACE is devoid of humanity, quoth they. Its digital world - 
the computer generated sets, locations, and characters - will have them 
lamenting the film's lack of humanity (I guess there's nothing more 
upsetting than a bunch of aliens and robots with no humanity). They will 
also complain about how the latest episode is merely more of the same - 
bigger battles, the same story elements, the same STAR WARS icons, and 
another wall-to-wall John Williams score (although the Bond films have been 
following the same formula for decades and I don't remember anybody ever 
getting worked up about them at any time). They will object on principle: 
that actors should not be replaced by CGI fabrications because human actors 
deserve center stage on our screens, dammit (in that case, goodbye E.T, 
goodbye Pinocchio, Dumbo, the Muppets, HAL 9000, King Kong, everything by 
Ray Harryhausen, Stan Winston, Pixarjust write your own list). The critics 
have been sharpening their claws for months now, I'm sure. George Lucas 
copped a bad year - the pendulum of Fickle Favor has swung against him, just 
the same way it had swung in favor of James Cameron's TITANIC the previous 
year. The irony is that thirty years ago when he made THX-1138 he was 
receiving plaudits for the same 'dehumanization' that he's being taken to 
task for now.
But wait a minute. TITANIC was based on a real event, and THX-1138 had real 
humans. STAR WARS, on the other hand, is all made up.  It never happened.  
It's meaningless. Therefore it is just a gigantic conceit.  Furthermore, by 
purporting to be yet-another-episode in a larger saga it has franchised 
itself, a thought that is sure to get the critical bile rising. The 
universe is expanding, and the STAR WARS universe is no exception. It has 
become so all-pervading that it has replaced a simulacrum of reality with 
its own complete alternative. To which there can be only one argument: 
exactly. What validates THE PHANTOM MENACE's worth as a film (as opposed to 
a 'movie') is that it has used every tool available at its disposal to 
create something that would otherwise exist only in one individual's 
imagination. It *shares a vision*, surely the guiding precept of all 
cinema. I'm looking forward to THE PHANTOM MENACE.  It's going to be every 
comic book I read as a boy and every game I played with plastic action 
figures. Most of which, I might add, were never 'human'.
I have just seen THE PHANTOM MENACE. In lieu of a second protracted rant I 
offer the following observations:
ˇ It's interesting seeing Jake Lloyd playing the young, tousle-headed 
Annakin Skywalker - it's not until afterwards you remember that the 
cheerful boy hero of this film turns into the villain of the series, 
slaying his mentor, torturing his daughter, and attempting to kill  his 
son. It's in the nature of prequels to be ironic.
ˇ In this installment it is revealed that microorganisms within the   Jedi 
act as a conduit for the Force - maybe the next story could    take us 
into an inner universe as opposed to outer space.
ˇ The Jedi might be wise and powerful but they still can't cure Yoda of 
dyslexia. End every sentence on a verb he does.
ˇ The Trade Federation sound like Samurai and the Gungan speak like 
Jamaicans.
ˇ Conclusion to above point: Lucas has been spending too much time with 
Joseph Campbell.
ˇ Is Lucas trying to fit the phrase 'I've got a bad feeling about this' 
into every episode? This is at least the third film it   appears in.
ˇ Lightsabers are still the coolest weapons in the universe.
ˇ One too many 'oops' in Jake Lloyd's dialogue.
ˇ The twist involving Natalie Portman's character isn't too surprising if 
you can recognize Portman on screen and already know what part she plays.
ˇ The worst line of dialogue is easily the alien sports commentators use 
of that worn-out 90s phrase 'That's gotta hurt'
ˇ Liam Neeson and Ewan McGregor make great Jedi Knights.
ˇ The screening was packed with families, reminding us once again that 
STAR WARS is not made for a bunch of stuffed shirts armed with notebooks 
and their own five-star rating system, but for people that like to have a 
good time.
ˇ Lucas and Spielberg are friends, aren't they? How about Spielberg   
directing one of the remaining two installments? The petition  starts 
here.


Author
M. Pierce
 I have never seen a man so in love with himself than George Lucas.  With the
overt success of the three original Star Wars films, Lucas has become, not
necessarily a filmmaker, but the head cheeze at a huge toy company, with The
Phantom Menace the new product on the shelve.  Only this toy was made for $115
million, but every kid wants it, and, like all other expensive toys, falls
apart within an hour after playing with it.
  The product in question, Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom Menace (jeez!), is
pure and simple:  Its about the money, baby!  No one in their right mind would
create such a fiasco if they knew it wouldn't make a ton of money before its
fourth week of release.  I come to the SW franchise as a stranger, since I have
absolutely no idea why the SW movies are so popular.  I find them rather boring
and full of nothing but eye candy.
  Phantom Menace is like the first SW, minus 10.  Nothing in the whole concept
is remotely enjoyable.  Even the special effects seem rather bland.  The story
in this new one is a mindless mess...the acting wooden...and the action
sequences like something out of a video game.
  SW: Phantom Menace is one of the worst films of the year so far.  With a
title like SW E1: TPM, Lucas has one big head on those shoulders.  I thought
Chris Carter did for releasing an X-Files movie, although, that movie
adaptation was an excellent way to spend two hours.  PM is one long headache.

Author
Julian Gold
Some phenomena have such a profound cultural infulence that one cannot but
help  being swept along by them. Such was George Lucas' Star Wars in the
late 1970's, which gave thrills and spills to millions and spawned two more
films, The Empire Strikes Back and The Return of the Jedi.
For me, the original and bafflingly IVth Episode, was a shallow but
enjoyable affair lifted by a pleasant quirkiness, the presence of Sir Alec
Guiness and of course the unprecedentedly accomplished visuals. These were
further lifted in the second (Vth!) film, with many more fast-moving
spaceships per frame, and a superbly dark if fragmented plot which had, for
once, the Goodies on the receiving end. The final film in that trilogy tied
up the story, but also managed to make most adults cringe by having an army
of unconvincing teddy bears called Ewoks help the heroes to do much the same
thing as they did in the first film.
Deeply unsatisifed, on learning of his intentions to make Episodes I to III,
I yearned for Lucas to make amends for this disappointment and return to the
form of The Empire Strikes Back. Having attracted the likes of Samuel L
Jackson, Ewan Macregor and Liam Neeson, and with the years of Industrial
Light and Magic experience to draw on, the endless possibilities for
creating a masterpiece of science fiction/fantasy made my mouth water.
Sadly, the reality was that Lucas carried on where he left off. Episode 1 is
a child's film propped up by special effects that are now so realistic they
are almost not special, even if they are outstandingly beautiful. But I
would not deny that the majority of the credit, such as it is,  go to the
post-production crew. For all others concerned: shame on you! You could have
done anything, but you chose to produce a film with a plot so confused and
paced so atrociously that I found myself yawning on occasions. I wasn't even
sure what the title was about (what menaces there were were anything but
Phantom)!
Set against the fascinating (sic) background of intergalactic taxation, two
Jedi warriors (Neeson / McGregor) are sent to sort out a blockade by the
Trade Federation. Why that blockade is there is never explained, indeed
Lucas is happy to assume throughout that we are all fans and we know the ins
and outs and nerdy details of the previous three movies. This is surprising
when you consider that 15 years or so have passed since Episode VI and that
much of the target audience may not have even seen the original three films.
And those that did will be adults now and may well demand more from a film.
One things many adults might not demand in a movie is one of those stooge
characters who despite their intrinsic and irritating buffoonery manage to
win battles. Unfortunately, Episode 1 gives us just such an individual quite
early on. Jar Jar Binks is a bug-eyed, long-eared big-handed alien. If that
were all, Lucas might have gotten away with it, but he is clumsy, and talks
in an only partially intelligible and uncomfortably
stereotype-Afro-American-slave fashion. Worse, he walks like a Bro' too: for
those that know the Simpsons episode where Itchy and Scratchy gain an extra
character, Binks is very like Poochie the Dog and just as effective an
addition to the film as Poochie was to the meta-cartoon.
So the plot labours on, held together by the effects team, though sometimes
the gratuitous use of CGI only adds to the confusion. The acting is wooden,
even from those who have some acting pedigree. Anyway, said blockade becomes
an occupation, though it is the squeaky-cleanest occupation you ever didn't
see, because though we are often told of the people suffering there is no
visual evidence of it. Consequently, it is hard to care, indeed the film
finds it near impossible to build a sense of drama or tension throughout.
The central character is really Anakin Skywalker, who we meet half-way
through the film as a precocious10-year-old child. We know that he's
destined to be Darth Vader, the big baddie of the earlier (ie later)
episodes, but for now he's the teeth-clenchingly wholesome Kid With Special
Powers who loves his mommy. Indeed Lucas dwells on this in one yawn of a
scene that has remarkably little CGI but a lot of tedious dialogue, as if we
are to believe that he will become the scourge of the galaxy because he
misses his mum.
The rest of the film is as predictable as it is long-winded. There are some
political machinations that are as tedious as they are naive, a bit of
swashbuckling with the McGregor/Neeson, and a boring space battle resulting
in another one-small-fighter-succeeds-where-many-big-fighters-failed
scenario. There's also a ground battle involving warrior droids who
conveniently fall to pieces at the slightest provocation and talk to each
other in Battlestar Galactica Cylon voices.
Star Wars: Episode 1 is a turkey of a film, not simply because it is
intrinsically bad (which it is), but because it could have been an awful lot
more. No doubt it will collect the pounds and dollars from the public to
break whatever records, but it will probably not do as well as predicted
(certainly if the US attendances are anything to go by). George Lucas is a
very smart man with a track record of style, vision and flair. He has not
yet proven he can acknowledge his mistakes though, let alone learn from
them, and against that, I must say I am less than desparate  to see the
forthcoming Episodes II and III.

Author
Gargoyle_Lord
This is a review of StarWars Episode 1: The Phantom Menace.  It will
probably not be like most reviews I won't cover  the acting special
effects and all of the visuals.  What I want to talk about is the
charectarizations in it.  Especially a very strong positive image for
young girls.
Quenn Amidala is a very good role model for young women.  She is
strong, confident, and very capable.  She handles herself with poise,
dignity, and confidence in whatever situations she is involved.  I
applaude George Lucas for her.  Long has it been since such a strong
young lady has graced the silver screen that isn't screwed up or
warped or played as an airhead.  Her charectar alone has given me a
renewed hope in the art of scriptwriting.  In an age that shows young
ladies as hardened or dumb blondes or any of the other stereotypical
archtypes she is a breath of fresh air.
To those that say that "science fiction" has nothing to appeal to
women or "girls" will be woefully wrong if they think to include The
Phantom Menace in the group without first watching it.  Episodes 4-6
had Leia that was a strong female prescence and a good image for women
to see.  But in Phantom Menace and hopefully the next two movies of
this trilogy there is Queen Amidala, a strong vibrant powerful caring
young lady of 17 that is a good image for not only females but a
generation of young adults that are looking for something out there.
Let us hope that the charectar of Queen Amidala will give them
something to believe in and to inspire them all.

Author
Peter Booth
OK, let me start off by saying that this movie is of an entirely
different calibre to the "previous" three. No, I'm not talking about the
millions of dollars more injected into it, or the plethora of
mind-bending special effects, but the feel.
It is one seriously disjointed film, and in places, ceases to make sense
and becomes somewhat incoherent. The pre-release hype and marketing does
the actual film almost zero justice. Darth Maul, portrayed as the next
version of the Ultimate Bad Guy by fans and some elements of the press
is largely a mute non-event...he says about three lines of dialogue in
total and is hardly an imposing character, despite his devilish makeup.
Nevertheless the scenes in which he actually fights are excellently
choreographed and make the sabre duels of the "previous" three films
look wooden and contrived. 
Back to the disjointed bit...well, the movie is about a trade
embargo...ho hum, yawn yawn to most people. The trouble is, the actual
embargo of Naboo doesn't seem to truly affect its citizens, nor is their
any evidence of the "my people are dying" or "the deathtoll is
catastrophic" allegations made earlier in the film...you just have to
believe that this trade embargo is a Bad Thing. Why Darth
Sidious/Senator Palpatine has bankrolled this manoeuvre in order to gain
ascendancy is an odd decision. It is patently obvious that there must be
better ways. It sort of flies in the face of what we are told in "The
Journal of the Whills" back-story presented in the original Star Wars
novelisation done in 1977...still, Star Wars is Lucas and he can do what
he likes...and that's precisely what he has done here. One very large
act of self-indulgence totally paid for by himself.
It is chiefly disjointed by the almost total lack of character building.
None of the protagonists of the film could be described as fleshed out,
especially Qui-Gon Jinn and moreso Obi Wan Kenobi. They are virtually
marionettes acting out Lucas' fairytale. Faceless folks running on
rails, as it were. Ewan McGregor is woefully under-utilised, almost in a
role of Neeson's yes-man and sidekick...both men are exceptional actors
clearly struggling to portray characters which could only be classified
as cardboard cut-outs...
...and kudos to anyone who understood Jar Jar Binks on first
viewing...Ahmed Best makes him sound like some digital Charlie Chan on a
bumbling excapade through life.
The younger actors, Natalie Portman and Jake Lloyd do quite well, by
comparison. I can't agree with elements out there that say Lloyd's
performance was hammy and hollow. He is quite good in his role as
boyhood Darth Vader even if at times, you feel he's playing some
outrageous video game.
Portman lends the film an air of gravitas; surprising for an actress of
her age and experience with her steadfast denouncements of Federation
intentions...
Ian McDiarmid plays his dual roles as well as expected, especially as
Senator Palpatine, representative of Naboo...the consummate politician,
appeasing all comers and all sides.
Well, I've been all negative so far...what good was in this film?
Everything else, essentially. There have been enough reviews of the
jaw-dropping SFX posted for me to make further impression, but they are
eminently effective, and don't necessarily drown out the uneven plot and
development. The "flight" of the Gungan craft as it swims through the
planet's core is excellent, with amazing creatures seeking to make this
ship their next meal...quite awesome.
The pod race is simply amazing too, not only for the vertiginous ride it
gives you, but the hilarity in the alien participants...the
Humpty-Dumpty look-a-like who stalls at the start had me in stitches as
did the expression on the face of another as he is about to collide with
a canyon outcropping...
...and then we had Tusken Raiders taking potshots at racers along the
way...
...and a two-headed race commentator...
The entire pod race sequence is quite a delight. Sebulba is the ultimate
win at all costs hot rodder, and a bizarre little creature who walks on
his hands.
Lucas goes for laughs quite often in his battle sequences...the
Federation's droids coming undone at the hands of blue electric balls
unleashed by the Gungans is comical, as is Lucas' penchant for severed
limbs and people going bump on things they shouldn't...
In essence, the Phantom Menace is a good film...nothing phenomenal or
abysmal...simply a good film that needed some serious ironing out,
especially in the categories of plot and character development...you are
left feeling that none of these players can be taken seriously,
something hammered into you in the "previous" three films...you did take
Darth Vader seriously...Darth Maul or the Viceroy of the Trade
Federation? Cartoons...
On a final note...I swear I saw E.T's in the Republican Senate
chamber...this has probably been discussed in various SW
forums/newsgroups to death and is possibly common knowledge among SW
cognoscenti, but as I don't frequent them, i don't know if that' in fact
what they were. Wouldn't surprise me considering Lucas' friendship with
Spielberg.
In summary...a wooden, cartoony movie giving a taste of more serious
matters to come in 2002 and 2005. Don't pick holes in the plot, for
you'll find them in plenitude, don't admire the characterisation of the
protagonists too closely, but sit back, and simply enjoy a visual and
aural blast of a film...

Author
Gregory Cook
            Let me begin by saying that over the past few months, I,
and most of the members of rec.arts.sf.starwars.misc, have been
inundated with spoilers and as of late reviews of this film. Unlike
some, I chose not to avoid the spoilers (nor did I seek them out). But
I read as many reviews as I could. Despite the overall negative tone
from both professional critics and fans alike, I feel they had an
overall positive effect of lowering expectations in those who had
built up way too much faith in the film. I will not say that "The
Phantom Menace" is "just a movie" as many have, but I will say that it
is the product of humans, and as a result cannot be perfect.
            Disclaimers aside, I went in expecting to find "The
Phantom Menace" more enjoyable than "Return of the Jedi," and I was
not disappointed in this respect. The film was amazing. Many have
panned both the writing and the direction. While I find Lucas'
direction of the human actors to be lacking (as well as his dialogue),
I do not agree with this overgeneralized condemnation of everything in
the film. Well, everything but the music--John Williams has gone
relative unscathed. The writing was fine. All of the action, and most
of the interaction, are faithful to the feel of the original trilogy.
            Now, as to the character everyone had the most trepidation
about: Jar Jar Binks did not, as many had predicted, "ruin" the movie.
While his antics were a bit distracting and took up more than enough
time towards the start of the film, he later became much less
annoying--a process of adaptation to a new comic relief sidekick that
most fans will no doubt experience. I was born in 1977, so
unfortunately I cannot relate quite as well to the situation with "A
New Hope," but I am sure many people had problems with C-3PO in May of
that year. Jar Jar added too much humor for some, myself included, but
this movie needs it. It has the most difficult task of any of the
films (with the exception of whatever turns out to be the Star Wars'
saga's finale), that of introducing an entire galaxy and its
populations. Understandably, the film's running time is jam-packed
full of explanations, events, the introduction of new species and
civilizations, and, of course, action sequences. The pace, therefore,
was at times much too breakneck, but again this was expected. 
            The other computer generated characters were superb. Watto
was excellent as Anakin's owner, most notably. The battle droids,
while having poorer aim than the Empire's legions of stormtroopers,
served as a good battleforce, since the two Jedi, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan
McGregor) and Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), could not simply use their
persuasive powers to win (though they did use their "push" ability a
time or two to impact the droids physically). An army of human (or
Neimodian) enemies would have been too easy for them to fight.
            Turning to the "real" characters, then: Ewan McGregor was
perfect as Obi-Wan. His Alec Guiness impression aside, every bit of
personality that shown through his sparse lines was right on the mark.
Obi-Wan will no doubt continue to be portrayed this well by McGregor,
and for that I am quite thankful. Liam Neeson brings a solemnity to
Qui-Gon Jinn that balances Obi-Wan's (and Anakin's, for that matter)
youthful rashness. Yet, he has his own careless tendencies as well.
Both Jedi come across as very human; criticism of their woodeness is
not really accurate--they were serious when the situation called for
it, and this just happened to be the case quite often. Portman, who I
immensely enjoyed in "The Professional," is good here. She only gets
to express emotion in her few scenes with Anakin (Jake Lloyd), but we
have a glimmer of things to come from those moments.
            While perhaps not exactly counting as a member of the
supporting cast, Jake Lloyd was acceptible as a young Anakin
Skywalker. Unfortunately for most post-teens, his gleeful repetitive
shooting-galleryesque destruction of battle droids in two separate
scenes are a bit overblown. However, I suppose they do forecast a bit
of an unfeeling lack of compassion that he is to develop over the
entire prequel trilogy, his tragic flaw. The single thing that was a
bit too much for me to suspend my disbelief towards was his accident
torpedoing of the main power reactor for the entire Neimodian ship,
thereby saving the Gungan army on the surface of Naboo. His mother,
Shmi (Pernilla August), is a bit underemotional at his leaving (crying
either tears of sadness for him leaving her or tears of joy for him
finally living his dream would have been nice--but the front she must
put on to not give him additional guilt is appropriate, I suppose).
Otherwise, she is great. Samuel L. Jackon, while not quite as "bombad"
(as Jar Jar might say) as his characters in "Pulp Fiction" or "Jackie
Brown," is nonetheless effective in his handful of lines. I look
forward to seeing him in action in Episode II. Yoda looks a little too
young (only a few decades have passed by the time "Empire Strikes
Back" rolls around, after all), but his lines sound less corny in
context than they did in the trailers.
            The villains were not the focus of this episode as much as
they were in the original trilogy, but what little screen time they
got was used to great effect. Darth Maul (Ray Park) is quite
intimidating, and his pacing shark-like walk while waiting to fight
the Jedi is tantalizingly suspenseful. The duel (or perhaps duel isn't
the word for him taking on both Obi-Wan and Qui-Gon at once) with the
Jedi is magnificent. Without a doubt it surpasses EVERY existing
lightsabre duel in the original trilogy, including the excellent one
between Luke and Darth Vader at the climax of "Empire Strikes Back."
Palpatine, a senator not yet come to imperial power here, is given
subtle menacing touches by Ian McDiarmid here. Especially excellent
was his foreshadowing of things to come with his comments to Anakin at
the end of the film.
            Aside from the wonderful lightsabre fight, the best action
sequence is, unsurprisingly, the pod racing sequence. However, at
three laps it dragged on a bit too long. Still, it has me wanting to
play the PC version as soon as possible, so perhaps I am only bitter
at it trapping me into buying the game. The space battle that Anakin
participates in is a little short, a little too simple, and not quite
as engaging as I had hoped, unfortunately. All that will change in the
next two episodes, though, so I am content to wait.
            No one knows if "The Phantom Menace" will break the
box-office record, but frankly, it doesn't matter; as long as Lucas
has enough money to finance the next installment, fans will be happy.
And from all the foreshadowing in this film, I can guarantee that the
next one will satisfy our curiosity. Can Lucas shape this trilogy into
a three-part play, with the auspicious beginnings eventually becoming
corrupted and destroyed? Yes. Will he do so and surpass his original
trilogy? Perhaps. But I, for one, have faith in him doing so.


Author
Brian Takeshita
The opening crawl tells us that the galaxy is in turmoil over the
taxation of trade routes, and the greedy Trade Federation has used
it's armada of powerful space battleships to blockade the planet
Naboo.  We soon find that the Federation plans to invade the planet
with an enormous army of warrior robots and force Naboo's ruler, the
young Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman) to sign a treaty giving the
Federation control.  However, the galactic Republic has sent Jedi
Knights Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor)
as emissaries to the Federation in order to negotiate for the ending
of the blockade.  No sooner do they arrive than the Federation leaders
are instructed via holographic transmission by a mysterious cloaked
figure to destroy the Jedi, and the first battle begins.
It seems that for me and thousands of people like me, the love for
George Lucas's trilogy of  STAR WARS movies has only grown over time.
We're the fans, not the freaks.  We won't go dressing up like Darth
Vader (although you have to admit those Imperial uniforms are pretty
darn cool), and we won't incorporate lines from the script in our
everyday conversations (not all the time, anyway), but if someone
wants to challenge us to a little trivia contest, we're throwing down.
All right, stop looking at me like that.
We have been faithfully and patiently waiting.  Waiting for this movie
ever since the end credits of RETURN OF THE JEDI started to roll.  You
see, The Trilogy is not just a set of movies, but a religion of sorts
to we, the faithful disciples, and THE PHANTOM MENACE is tantamount to
the second coming of the Messiah.
Unfortunately, it is not Our Savior.  For weeks beforehand, I was
going around telling people that this movie had better be damned good
- stupendously good - miraculously good.  Anything less and it'll be
the biggest disappointment of the century.  I didn't want the
doomsaying prophecy to come true, really I didn't, but this film
nevertheless fails to reach the pinnacles of filmmaking.
Character development is virtually nonexistent.  With the possible
exception of Qui-Gon, most of the film's characters seem left with
nothing to do but go through the motions.  None seem very affected by
their experiences, and few even show any passion at all.  Contrast
this with the horribly irritating comic relief we are nearly
continuously subjected to in the form of Jar Jar Binks, a creature
belonging to a race which lives in underwater cities on Naboo, in
precarious symbiosis with the land dwellers led by Amidala.  Jar Jar's
life is saved by Qui-Gon early in the film, and travels with our
heroes for the sole reason of making us laugh (or supposedly so).  His
speech mannerisms are so "cute-ified" that I couldn't understand a
third of what he was saying, and the slapstick he performed was just
distracting.  His head gets caught in an electronic field, his foot
gets caught in the stirrup of some large beast, he describes being in
trouble as "deep doo doo," and even manages to step in some of the
same while walking around in Mos Eisley Spaceport.  Therein lies a key
difference between this film and one of its predecessors.  In STAR
WARS, we had Obi-Wan telling us Mos Eisley was a "wretched hive of
scum and villainy."  In THE PHANTOM MENACE, we get doo doo.
The films of The Trilogy took me away from my everyday life and
immersed me in a story "A long time ago in a galaxy far, far away...."
This film, on the other hand, constantly reminds me that it's only a
movie by including situations and phrases that are so uniquely modern
American that they seem incredibly out of place and serve to jerk the
viewer from the experience.  Perhaps the most blatant offense occurs
during a scene where young Anakin Skywalker enters into a pod racing
competition (it's kind of like chariot racing with large engines
instead of horses), and there are a couple of commentators in a press
box delivering Indy 500-like play by play.  I liked the pod race; it
was really exciting and ratcheted the tension, but when the heck did
Lucas think up the idea of putting in the sportscasters?  The race
would have been even more exciting without the distraction.  This
aspect, coupled with the emphasis on humor simply baffled me.  I
suppose one may say that Lucas was trying to appeal to the younger
viewer, but would more intelligent scenes and dialog hurt this appeal
at all?  Didn't millions of youngsters still go back to see the
original STAR WARS in 1977 over and over again?  Didn't the action
figures still sell like hotcakes?  Of course they did, and it's only
poor judgment that allows the most-eagerly awaited film in history to
be marred by pandering to children who would still have enjoyed a film
with more appeal for adults.
One aspect that will appeal broadly, however, is the use of special
effects.  The people at Lucas's Industrial Light and Magic, the
world's premiere effects house, outdid themselves in providing
seamless integration of computer-generated images and real-life
footage.  Some of the scenes have to be seen to be believed,
especially the shots of a land battle between the Federation's robot
army and Jar Jar's countrymen.  The space battles are also impressive,
although improved over past efforts by only subtle margins to the
casual observer.  This, however, is a testament to the work which ILM
produced two decades ago and still holds up well today.
John Williams is back, of course, providing a score for the film as
only he can.  His music is pervasive throughout, as rousing and as
dramatic as ever, always serving to punctuate scenes noticeably and
appropriately.
Since this film is supposed to be the first installment in a
nine-episode story (STAR WARS, THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK and RETURN OF
THE JEDI being episodes four, five and six, respectively), THE PHANTOM
MENACE has the daunting task of setting up the origins of several
characters we know already, in addition to those with whom we
unfamiliar.  As a result, attention to history and characterization
was spread a little thin.  It would have been nice to get more in
depth with Yoda and Obi-Wan, for example, but given the fact that
there were several new characters to cover, it is understandable that
some of the development has been left for the next two films.
One of the new characters is Darth Maul, hailed as the new villain
with as much hype as marketing forces could muster prior to this
film's release.  In spite of the hype, Darth Maul is a character which
almost didn't have to be in the film, his role is so insignificant.
He has maybe three spoken lines (believe it or not, a second actor
voices the character) and the rest of the time just scowls and looks
mean.  With that working against him, he never has a chance at being
interesting and instead ends up an utter disappointment.
Lucas seems to have wanted to develop the spiritual nature of the STAR
WARS universe, something which has been prominent throughout.
However, he does so largely by paralleling the STAR WARS spirituality
with the bible, offering an easy out for story-writing and once again
bringing the viewer back to planet Earth with a real-life connection.
Oddly, while trying to capitalize on spirituality, Lucas at the same
time introduces the fact that mastery of The Force is dependent upon
having little Force-loving parasites in your body's cells.  This only
serves to de-mystify the workings of The Force a few notches by
offering a scientific connection.
Don't let me mislead you too far.  THE PHANTOM MENACE, by most
standards, is a good film.  It contains a lot of visual treats, sets
the stage for an epic story, gives us a bit of excitement here and
there, and even allows us to revisit some of our old friends.  It's
just that when held up to it's predecessors (and to not do so would be
unrealistic), this film simply pales.

Author
Matt Prigge
Writer/Director: George Lucas
Starring: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Pernilla August, Ray Park, Samuel L. Jackson, Terence Stamp,
Olvier Ford Davies, Ahmed Best, Frank Oz, Kenny Jones, Anthony Daniels,
Warwick Davis, Brian Blessed
How the hell do I even write this review?  That's been the question on
my mind ever since I became a critic, as amateur as I am, since the
announcement that a new Star Wars film came out long before I even began
to write these things.  I'm a Star Wars fan, I may admit it; though I'm
not a "die hard fan" (amongst the scariest people in the world, I assure
you...though a quaint second compared to Star Trek fans), and because of
this personal problem, I have a huge bias against judging this film on a
fair basis.  I love the other three, though hardly on equal levels, and
would easily and without much trepidation award each of them the coveted
four star rating - yes, even 'Jedi' - but how does one even begin to put
into logical order the thoughts concerning the viewing of the newest
installment in this saga, let alone the first in nearly 16 years?  I
pictured early drafts  of this review that would lapse into considerable
amounts of hyperbole, virtual years before seeing the actual movie, and
I swore tonight, a mere hour after leaving the theater, that I would: a)
write the review and get it out there before I passed out from fatigue;
and b) try not to do what I feared I would do under pressure.
But though the temptation may have been strong to over-dramaticize the
greatness thereof before, it's remarkably easy not to after actually
having seen it.  As people talked about how incredible it was on the way
out, remarked about the action sequences with flustered enthusiasm, and
already began speculated about the way everything we saw is incorporated
with the other three, I kept a mild and reserved contain on my
emotions.  A big grin plastered on my face, not merely because I had
actually seen the most anticipated movie of all time two weeks before it
is released to the general public in America (a feat I am almost certain
I would have been killed for, or at the very least tortured inhumanely
for), but also because it did in fact work for me.  Thanks to several
unexpected disappointments within the past couple years with highly
anticipated movies that had actually blown, I made a conscious decision,
say about six months ago, to not get too pumped up for any movie (and
this includes new films from the likes of Greenaway, Egoyan, and Leigh),
and thus lessen the impact of disappointment on me.  Instead of building
this new film up to be the Most Incredible Motion Picture Experience Or
Else, I kept a handle on things, and by walking into the movie, I was
more excited about actually being there, seeing a big exec from 20th
Century Fox in person, et. al., than I was about the fact that what
would unfold in front of me in a very short amount of time was yet
another movie in the saga that is the most embraced cinematic saga of
all time, and a personal favorite of mine.  I was prepared for the
mediocre, to put it bluntly.
That may have backfired on me though.  Instead of either really loving
it above all or hating it above all, I just really liked it.  I sat
there watching the movie, nearly forgot that it was a Star Wars movie
from time to time, and was just really entertained.  The story was well
told, the characters were for the most part nicely drawn, and the action
was phenomenal.  Even the CGI effects, which I swore would be its
downfall (I mean, it looks so...fake...), worked extremely well and
didn't bother me for a second.  So in short, very recommended.  But my
big problem is this: do I really like it because I wasn't expecting much
and it delivered more than I thought it would; and if so, am I sure this
movie isn't really the mediocre mess my friend made it out to be (a
non-Star Wars fan, for the record, who must be glad I haven't targeted
him for scorn in this)?  There were things that bugged me, namely the
fact that instead of running smoothly like the other three, it seems to
have adopted an ebb-n-flow technique that isn't incredibly satisfying,
at least not as satisfying as it should be.  It introduces elements to
us that are terrific and mesmerizing in theory, but does it work
as a whole in execution?  I'd answer that with a reasonable "sort of,
for the most part."  Looking at the plot structure of the film from afar
makes it sound incredibly incredible.  The Federation may be overtaking
the Republic with an illegal attack that may run its course due to
corrupt politicians and legal technicalities.  The Queen of the Republic
of Naboo is saved by two Jedi Knights who stop by Tatooine on the voyage
to safety due to a damaged ship and stumble upon no less than Annakin
Skywalker at the ripe age of about eight.  He helps them in their
current predicament, gains their trust, and the fact that he is a Jedi
is made known to everyone.
The rest is, of course, predictable, but just look at the situation, by
god.  Annakin, the same guy who becomes Darth Vadar even before the
original 'Star Wars' (or probably to be forever recognized under the
more dour title, 'A New Hope'), becomes the completely ironic hero of
the film!  Star Wars geeks get to have a field day with this situation!
If the most prominently figured character - a Jedi Knight named Qui-Gon
Jinn (played marvelously by the ever-reliable Liam Neeson) - is the most
wise character in the film, and he fingers Annakin as the messianic one
of the Jedis who will bring everything together in peace and harmony,
he's in fact dead wrong, isn't he?  Or is he?  Isn't by training Annakin
to become a Jedi Knight only to have him turn to the dreaded Dark Side
the good option since his becoming evil actually causes everything to
come together so neatly in 'Return of the Jedi?'  This is loads of fun
to think through, especially for anyone who's ever given any serious
thought to the 'Star Wars' saga in terms of novelistic entrapments, but
does this automatically make this new film - called 'The Phantom
Menace,' by the way, though there doesn't appear to be an 'official
official' title for it - a brilliant piece of art?  Is it great merely
because it comes fourth in being made but first in terms of order, thus
giving it a weight it wouldn't have to begin with?  Lucas may have
stumbled onto something quite clever by making the fourth episode first,
but it doesn't automatically make this film anything great.
Yet what I admire, perhaps most about this film, is how it doesn't at
all play up to this contrivance.  There isn't a lot of Lucas pointing
out irony here in the delicious situation he's cooked up for us; no
clever asides that gawk at the brilliance of himself, how he managed to
make an entire movie that could potentially hold onto the reins of the
previous moneymaking machines without doing any of the steering for
itself.  In fact, it seems, quite refreshingly, that Lucas is actually
working to make this good.  He actually cares about the storyline
and isn't automatically set to shoot anything in front of us and feel
confident that everyone will like it because it's Star Wars.  No, Lucas
is the real deal.  He doesn't bullshit us with all the work he's done
before creating this universe.  He makes it all seem incredibly real and
fresh and new.  In fact, it hardly seems a thing like the other three.
The  irony is here, not only with Annakin, but with Emperor Palpatine
(Ian McDiarmid), the gentle, kind man who becomes the head of the
counsel, but who by the next trilogy becomes the dreaded Emperor who
shows up prominently in 'Jedi' and is done away with nicely by
Vadar/Annakin (McDiarmid, by the way, is great).  This paradox hadn't
even occurred to me during the run of the film (though Diarmid also
portrays Darth Sidious, who like Emperor Palpatine in the other films,
is only seen with a cloak brought down over his head mysteriously), and
only afterwards did this hit me.  This kind of thing makes me excited,
not only because this means we also get to follow his assured path to
evil, but because that means this film is for real because it doesn't
play it up.  Even Annakin isn't overblown.  The kid they've chosen to
play him, Jake Lloyd, plays him like he was playing just a normal kid
who's entranced with everything he sees.  There's no sign of Vadar in
him yet, and if you hadn't seen the other three (and had subsequently
been living on Mars in a cave with fingers placed firmly in ears), you'd
have no idea of the tragedy about to ensnare him.  That he plays this
completely straight is marvelously commendable for anyone else would
have wanted to brag about the fact that they've developed something so
immensely adroit.
For most of it, it's an exciting, engrossing motion picture, mostly
because it's slow paced enough to take in the situations and
interestingly enough structured.  Neeson commands most of the movie,
bringing a realistic and natural feel to the first act and it's more
standard escape-from-the-bad-guys stuff, and thus to the rest of the
movie which plays out a whole lot smoother.  In fact, once Annakin has
popped up for the first time by around the 40 minute mark, the film
begins to really take off.  He becomes a source of selfless aid to
Neeson and company (including his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi - played
with dour temperament by Ewan McGregor - and Queen Amidala - played with
reserve, dignity, and head dresses galore by Natalie Portman) during
their tenure on Tatooine, and though some of the plot points are
contrived (as are their explanations: "Nothing happens by accident." -
gimme a break), it at least feels fresh while happening, mostly due to a
state of intellectual tension that's there (read: if you think about the
fact that if they don't hurry up and get the Queen to her rendezvous,
more and more people will die, though they hardly keep reminding you).
I was even impressed by the way Lucas seems to purposely gloss over the
inclusions of characters from the next trilogy, including a brief
appearance by Jabba the Hut, a couple scenes with Yoda (as a senator,
walking cane firmly in hand), and introductions to both R2-D2 and C3P0.
R2-D2 is even glanced over when he first appears, and C3P0 is given such
a brief role that it's refreshing that Lucas didn't pander too much to
his audience.  The same goes for the inclusion of Samuel L. Jackson and
Terence Stamp, two terrific actors given unglamorous cameo-sized roles.
Still, a lot of the film feels like it was pasted together out of neat
ideas that don't gel terribly well together, something not present in
the other films.  There's also an odd air of "we should be completely
enthralled though we aren't that enthralled" throughout.  My reason for
this is because, with the exception of Annakin and Qui-Gon Jinn, there's
no real source of emotional appeal.  Neeson's likable just because he's
commanding and wise and confident, and Annakin's likable because Lloyd
makes him so darned appealing (also, kudos to Pernilla August for
playing his mother so damn well, adding a considerable amount of
emotional weight to the film).  But most of everyone else is a bit
disappointing.  Amidala is underwritten, and the same times two goes for
Obi-Wan Kenobi (McGregor turns in a 'not bad but not great either, is
it?' performance, consisting of trying too hard to appear like a young
Alec Guiness and coming up with vacuousness).  The other films, even the
first one, had sharply drawn characters that were full of personality if
nothing else and only got better as the series went on.  With these
characters, I doubt much can be done, though.  Amidala possesses some of
Princess Leia's feistiness from time to time (probably because she's her
mother), but she's mostly authoritative and kinda cold; I can already
picture her reasons for wanting to marry Anakin in a later episode.  And
Obi-Wan's future seems painfully clear already: he'll learn more and
more and become stern and wise as he gets older.  For Annakin, though,
it's wonderfully vague.  I'm nearly anticipating the second episode
already, just so I can see where Lucas takes his character on his
journey to assured evil.
While this all factors in the fact that I shan't be giving this a four
star rating like the other ones (sorry, guys), I was at least totally
thrilled with the film's final act, a juxtaposition a la 'Jedi' where
three battles go on simultaneously and are shown via cutaways at key
moments, that was exciting, filled with originality, and
pulse-pounding.  The inclusion of the character Darth Maul plays a key
role in the impact of this section as he's probably the most incredibly
fascinating minor character in the saga since Boba Fett: his face is
painted red and black stripes, he has horns on his head that aren't
revealed till the finale (and with lots of 'oo's and 'ah's from the
audience), and he says all of one or two lines.  A mysterious character
like this, especially one so menacing, is all this film needs, and his
final battle with both Obi-Wan and Qui-Gon is nothing short of
breathtaking.  The orchestra adds choir voices and then pounds away with
intensity, the acrobatics and choreography are probably better than the
stuff in 'The Matrix,' and there's so much tension, namely in the
survival of Qui-Gon, that it's sublime.  Only problem is the other two
aren't nearly as captivating, though still terrific, and every cutaway
is like a massive jolt that lasts until the next time they come back to
it.  Same thing happened with 'Jedi'; why this structure wasn't avoided
at all costs by Lucas is beyond me (well, really not; he probably thinks
'Jedi' is just flawless stuff).
But still, this entire section, plus a nifty (and short) denouement cap
the film off with an enjoyable feeling, leaving the audience pumped up.
And while I left with a big stupid grin on my mouth, the thing I really
respected is how divorced this is from the other films.  It doesn't try
and play like one of those films, and by playing it so differently, the
CGI effects actually work.  They don't look too unreal, as I feared, but
they do give it a whole other feeling that wasn't there in the other
films, which relied mostly on puppets and real creations, not CGI.  But
that all works with this film.  The characters seem to have more life in
them, and we're able to visit places where more diverse creatures dwell
in large numbers.  This didn't work at all in the re-releases (where you
could visibly tell where they injected CGI), but it works here because
it's consistent and clearly defines its reality (the flip-side ot this
is it seems to have given Lucas the chance to add broad comedy to the
brew - mostly in the form of 'comic relief' Jar Jar Binks - most of
which falls flat and proves quite annoying).  It'd be nice for a return,
just because I prefer the look of those films, but if this is the
direction Lucas is taking this trilogy in, I'm glad to follow along.
His dialogue may still be shit, and he's lost a bit of his storytelling
magic, but 'The Phantom Menace' is at the very least incredibly
satisfying, which is commendable since this is, in fact, the most highly
anticipated film of all time.  It's nice not to be letdown by such a
film, even if you have turned skeptical.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Dennis Schwartz

STAR WARS: EPISODE I--THE PHANTOM MENACE (director: George Lucas;
cast:(Qui-Gon Jinn) Liam Neeson, (Obi-Wan Kenobi) Ewan McGregor, (Queen
Amidala) Natalie Portman, (Anakin Skywalker) Jake Lloyd, (Jar Jar Binks)
Ahmed Best, (Shmi Skywalker, Anakin's mother) Pernilla August,  (Yoda)
Frank Oz,  (Mace Windu) Samuel L. Jackson, (Darth Maul) Ray Park,
(Chancellor Valorum) Terence Stamp, (Senator Palpatine/Darth Sidious)
Ian McDiarmid, (R2-D2) Kenny Baker, 1999)
The new Star Wars trilogy, as a prequel to the Star Wars saga, will go
back in time a full generation to tell the story of Anakin Skywalker,
the innocent boy who will one day become the dreaded Darth Vader, who
was the father of Luke Skywalker, the young farmboy who became a hero in
the struggle to overthrow an evil empire and had to confront one of the
Empire's staunchest henchmen, Darth Vader.
In this movie, that goes beyond the boundaries of what a movie is,
because it has become a trademark name that is as easily recognized as
any popular brand name is; if I mentioned KFC, you would know that I am
talking about a fast-food chain that sells fried chicken (ugh!), and if
I mentioned Star Wars (ah!), the same familiarity would ring a bell with
you. Since the movie first surfaced in 1977, it has been a very popular
film, basically over-taking many other types of films that took on the
moral battle of good and evil, such as the Western, and it created a new
myth that does not challenge the old myth, but incorporates pieces of
mythology not only from the Judeo-Christian roots of the Bible, but from
the Eastern religions, as well. It has become so commercially successful
a film and enterprise, that even though the film cost about 115 million
dollars to make, its profit margin is a sure thing, since it has
merchandise deals tied into its release, that are estimated to be around
3.5 billion dollars.
With this in mind, there can be no ordinary viewing of this film, since
it is already hyped and promoted beyond any reasonable level of
expectation, it is therefore hardly likely that it could meet such
expectations, even with its fanatical fan base, willing to stand on long
lines for a long time in order to get tickets and who will most likely
see the film a number of a times, and a public that is primed and ready
for the product. How many times will viewers want to see it, is hard to
gauge at this early date, though what is guaranteed, is that it will
draw large crowds and pump life into the movie industry, as many will
see this film as an event, therefore making it critic-proof and ensured
of being a legendary film no matter what might be perceived of it on
screen.
What takes place on screen, if I can consider myself, a voice of
moderation on this subject, is not as terrible a storyline and acting
job as one could be led to believe by listening to some film critics,
nor is it as great a film as many unabashed fans might think, who feel
taken with the innovative special-effects, and are really caught up in
the aura and excessive exuberance the total film's package presents to
them, from John William's recognizable Star War themes, to some original
musical scores he added, as special for the film. There should be
something in this film for everybody to like, especially in a THX
theater, where the digital sound system and wide screen is best suited
for viewing it. The tremendous effort put into the details and scope of
its project, makes it seem stupendous at times, and, even throughout the
film, when there are lulls in its story, it still sets a very galactic
mood, that is trance-like and illusionary in a positive hypnotic sense,
but it does suffer, at times, from being too talky and lacking enough
emotions and depth in its story and in its characters, and is scripted
with a banal dialogue, plus there is no romance in it, which makes it a
film that is more geared to a younger audience, an audience that will be
around to follow all the other episodes that will surely come forth.
As a positive feature of the film, it is not interested in gratuitous
violence, and for that it scores high marks, as there is no blood in it,
as all the action scenes involve mostly robotic things being dismantled.
As we read the screen for the opening scene, we learn that two Jedi are
off to arbitrate a dispute caused by the Trade Federation against the
planet Naboo, that is being interfered with unjustly by the Federation,
who are blockading it. The two Jedi sent, are master Jedi Qui-Gon Jinn
(Liam Neeson), who is a first-timer to the Star Wars series, and his
apprentice, Ben Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), who was played by Alec
Guinness in Episodes IV, V, and VI. They encounter difficulties and get
caught in a trap sprung by the evil Darth Sidious (Ian McDiarmid), who
wants to take over the Galactic Republic, and they are forced to use
their lightsabers to fight their way out of the jam, which they
successfully do, then realizing that they could use someone familiar
with this planet to be their guide, as they escape Naboo, they use this
thing they came upon when entering Naboo, someone named Jar Jar Binks
(Ahmed Best), a non-stop talking and jittery alien, who is some sort of
a combination of a frog, who acts like a cartoon creature that children
could gravitate to, but whom I found somewhat offensive because of his
speech patterns, which were subservient and stereotypical, like
Hollywood sometimes uses to depict certain ethnic groups, only in this
case, he is only a representative of these Gungan creatures on Naboo,
except he did talk in a West Indian patois.
After the Jedi rescue the 14-year old Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman)
from the planet and her favorite droid, R2-D2, they are forced to land,
due to broken parts, in a remote desert planet called Tatooine, that is
not part of the Federation. Here the Jedi meet Anakin Skywalker (Jake
Lloyd), a slave child, born by means of immaculate conception, working
for a junkman that has the parts to fix the space craft. Qui-Gon Jinn
recognizes in Ani, the possibility of him being "The Chosen One", that
is, a special Jedi, with a tremendous potential in the Force, though
there is, also, a sense of uncertainty about him. Darth Maul (Ray Park),
is the evil force, with Jedi-like powers, who is sent here by Sidious to
track and kill the Jedi and prevent help for the people of Naboo.
The pace of the film picks up with its most innovative addition, an
exciting and, I might add, dizzying racing sequence featuring "pod"
space ships, as Ani has to win the race to gain freedom for himself and
for the Jedis to get their needed space craft parts, as a wager is made
with Ani's junkman boss on the pod race. This is pure video game stuff,
that should thrill its younger audience, perhaps more than it did me,
but it was effective and added something new to the Star Wars legend.
What gives Star Wars all its charged up energy are its great duels, with
lightsaber weapons, as good versus evil is clearly the theme that
propels it, and here the duels are accomplished in a top-notch fashion,
better than in other episodes, as the villain, with a painted
black-and-red
tattooed devil's face and short horns, and menacing sneers and graceful
martial-arts movements, Darth Maul, battles the master Jedi, admirably
portrayed, by a low key Liam Neeson, in a role that he doesn't seem to
be having much fun in, but is, nevertheless, convincing as a wise Jedi,
teaching his more rambunctious apprentice Jedi, Ewan McGregor, the
ropes, as they both have a chance at dueling with Darth Maul.
Delving into the evil nature of politics, there is the dual role played
by Ian McDiarmid, as Senator Palpatine/Darth Sidious, cast perfectly as
a shadowy villain and a hypocritical senator, who in future episodes
will become Emperor Palpatine and should provide more chills for
viewer's to reckon with. Without its frightening villains, Star Wars
would be stripped of its soul.
Some of the actors did not impress me enough as the above mentioned. It
is probably not fair and not nice to criticize a youngster like Jake
Lloyd who plays Anakin Skywalker, but I thought, that though he was
sometimes bearable to see on the screen, as when he played with his
computer toys, he was, nevertheless, miscast and did not have the skills
to pull off the difficult role he was asked to fulfill. Anikin's mother,
the great Swedish actress, Pernilla August, is just right for the part;
in fact, she is too good for the part, because she makes the boy seem
very amateurish and not caring enough when he is teamed with her and
can't respond with the proper emotional responses expected from his
role, while she is fluid and graceful in her role, even though she is
stuck in a wooden part.
There were non-distinguished cameos by Samuel L. Jackson and Terrence
Stamp, that have neither added nor distracted anything from the film. I
would have preferred seeing unknown actors in those minor roles, giving
them a chance to get known and earn some "bread."
Some of the more exciting scenes, that weren't crammed too tight with
every computerized gizmo Lucas could throw at us, so that we were
literally choking on too much alien and droid consumption, came from the
just gorgeous and eye pleasing set designs on the planets, such as the
submerged underwater city on Naboo, filled with dangerous sea monsters,
and a Coliseum-like stadium on Tatooine, where the "pod race"
transpired, covered by talking head sport's personalities. Then there's
Coruscant, the Republic's capital - a planet where the single city
encompasses the entire globe.With its soaring skyscrapers and a sky
filled with exotic spaceships and its views of the world, that was just
too stunning to fully grasp. That is where the council chamber is, where
Queen Amidala makes a plea for her people, amidst the overwhelming
effects of the Senate chamber floating in space. All these space
landscapes gave the film all the color and spectacle it could ever need,
making it a most entertaining and enjoyable movie experience, which is
really what this movie is all about anyway, since I find it difficult to
get too worked up over its so called "new mythology," Joseph Campbell
blessed or not, since this movie only expresses what is just a shell of
what myths can mean to a society. Be that it as it may, I do understand
that many feel that what is missing in today's society, is some kind of
positive myth, that there is something that has gone wrong with our
culture, and this film does offer some encouragement for those who feel
movies have caused a certain amount of degeneracy in this country's
cultural war, and they should be pleased that Lucas's film reasserts,
his personal belief, that good can triumph over evil, as many feel
restless and unsure about the world they live in and need reassurance
that we have the same positive values other generations of Americans
have had, and they should look forward to seeing a film such as this
one, that has such a rosy outlook.
And again, it should be remembered that this is an action film, that
lives for its battle scenes, that has the "bad guy" droid army fighting
the "good guy" army of Naboo, in a computer game war, as the victorious
Naboos feel the pride and relief of victory over their enemy, for the
moment, as the film ends with the insidious Senator Palpatine taking
over the Galactic chancellorship.
It is a movie about the taming of nature in the future but made for the
age we live in, and will be remembered by future movie viewers, not for
its trite dialogue, but as a step up the ladder in our technical and
computer skills, and in our deep yearnings to find hope in the world we
live in. It seems regretable that we have to wait three more years for
the next installment of these episodes to be released. I would say that
this imperfect film, is still, a not-to-be missed film, and even if it
has become tied-in with corporate America, nevertheless, George Lucas
used his great technical skills to make this film as artistically good
looking as he could, not aiming to make an exploitive film. And for
that, we should all be grateful. I have immensely enjoyed the film for
what it was and was not overly concerned about what it was not.
I think it is fair to say, that when you plunk down your money and see
this film, you will be getting your money's worth.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
=A9 ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Jamey Hughton
STAR WARS: Episode I - THE PHANTOM MENACE Review
For more MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton, visit:
http://welcome.to/movieviews
With all the hype that Star Wars: Episode 1- The Phantom Menace has been
receiving, it seems almost impossible to avoid interest in seeing the
film. The movie is easily the most anticipated motion picture ever, with
a marketing campaign so strong it has brought Colonel Sanders, the Taco
Bell Chihuahua and Pizza Hut together. Can George Lucas succeed yet
again with transporting us back a long time ago, in a galaxy far, far
away....?
YES. This Star Wars prequel may be the worst of the bunch, with
amateurish dialogue and an overall lack of humanity. But that doesn't
mean it fails to comply on the basis of solid entertainment. The Phantom
Menace features the most eye-catching, jaw-dropping visual look in
cinematic history. The tremendous action sequences will have you
clinging to your arm rest, and the special effects are nothing short of
the best (and most plentiful) to ever be caught on film.
The vast digitized worlds and sheer imagination that was applied to this
project is astounding. The Phantom Menace is a delectable feast for the
senses, even if it has some disappointing aspects.
After we're treated to the famous prologue in the sky, with John
Williams' thundering score, we meet Qui-Gon Jonn (Liam Neeson) and young
Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), a Jedi master and his trainee `Padawan'.
They are on the ship accommodating the fleet headquarters for the evil
Trade Federation, and have been sent to settle disputes regarding the
taxation of trade routes to the planet of Naboo.
Oh, but enough about that. The prime concern for this prequel is
introducing young Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) into the picture. As you
already know, this seemingly charming lad is the boy who will soon
become Darth Vader.
A spectacular Pod Race comes soon hereafter. This particular race is the
most exciting, energetic, high-octane action sequence that you'll ever
see. One of the delights of the series is meeting the newest set of
strange alien creatures that Lucas has devised, and The Phantom Menace
is no exception. I loved Sebulba, the rat-like scoundrel whom Anakin has
to face in the Pod Race, and Boss Nass, the leader of the Gungans (who
are a neighbouring species to Naboo). One character who has been subject
to criticism is Jar-Jar Binks, a member of the Gungan race. Jar-Jar
speaks like Roger Rabbit on a hallucinogenic drug, and is there for the
sole purpose of supplying comic relief. Yes, he is initially annoying,
but I can admit to laughing over some of his harmless, goofy antics.
There is some lack of dramatic pull in this Star Wars entry, but the
presentation almost makes you forget the plot and character lapses. The
final light-saber battle, between the Jedi's and the horrific (and
terminally underused) villain Darth Maul, is spectacular to behold.
Jabba the Hutt, Yoda, C-3PO and R2-D2 have cameo appearances.
 Lucas has not forget how to captivate an audience, even if his latest
shows obvious signs of tiredness. One can only wonder what the possible
technology will present for the next two installments, Episode's I and
II. When they arrive, you'll know where to find me.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:   http://welcome.to/movieviews
movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
John Beachem
I will assume that the majority of the movie going public have either already
seen this film, or aren't going to see it at all. Therefore, I'm going to keep
the rather confusing plot summary quite brief. 
Trade routes have been further taxed by the Galactic Senate. The Trade
Federation, in an attempt to remove the taxes, has boycotted the small planet
of Naboo, ruled by the benevolent (and elected) Queen Amidala. The Senate hopes
to resolve this by sending two Jedi, Qui-Gon Jinn and Obi-Wan Kenobi to force a
settlement out of the Federation. That about sets up the film, and I don't wish
to give much more away. Let's just say they go to several different planets and
pick up young Anakin Skywalker, who will one day be Darth Vader along the way.
Suffice to say that I loved this movie. I've always been something of a Star
Wars fanatic, so I went in fairly certain that I would enjoy the film. This is
not to say the film is flawless, but then, few films are. However, in my
personal opinion, the movie's strong points outweigh its flaws considerably.
First, I'll go through the things I thought were truly great in the movie. 
1) I must say would have to be the acting. Particularly that of Liam Neeson, as
the righteous, kindly Jedi Master; Ian McDiarmid, as the slimy Naboo senator
and Natalie Portman as the strong willed Queen.The other actors, I should
mention, are quite good. 
2) The Pod race, at about the midway point is really quite spectacular. A
wonderful sci-fi version of the Ben Hur chariot race.
3) The final half hour is remarkable. Four seperate conflicts taking place at
once. The most amazing of which, would have to be the lightsabre duel, which
puts those in the other three movies to shame.
4) The effects. I know this is obvious, and that everyone has said it, but I
felt obliged to repeat this.
5) John Williams's new score "Duel of Fates", which was played during the sabre
duel is truly phenomenal.
Now come the points whish I did not personally find so wonderful.
1) Jar Jar Binks. I know this poor fellow has been much maligned, and I did in
fact find many of his antics quite amusing. However, there also lies the
problem. A Star Wars character is not supposed to have antics. He simply
doesn't fit into the Star Wars universe.
2) I rather wish Lucas had stuck to his original idea of Aliens either speaking
in a subtitled dialect, or in one that we simply weren't meant to understand.
Having them speak in a strangely accented form of English did not seem quite
right.
3) More screen time for Darth Maul would have been quite nice. He was a
wonderful character in the grand tradition of Boba Fett from "The Empire
Strikes Back", and I wish we'd been able to see more of him.
4) Lastly, I do wish Lucas had not given the force a scientific explanation.
So, is The Phantom Menace the best Star Wars movie ever made? no, that title
still belongs to "The Empire Strikes Back". Is it a great film? Without a
doubt. See it in theatres, don't wait for it to come to video because it will
lose much being on the small screen.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Author
Luke Buckmaster
STAR WARS EPISODE 1:
THE PHANTOM MENACE
Cast: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Samuel L. Jackson, Oliver Ford Davies, Terence Stamp,
Pernilla August, Frank Oz, Ahmed Best, Kenny Baker, Anthony Daniels, Ray
Park
Director: George Lucas
Screenplay: George Lucas
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
I'm convinced that George Lucas is not the same acute, sharp-witted and
earnest-to-goodness Star Wars creator that perhaps he was twenty years
ago.  Either that, or he has become so infatuated with his phenomenally
successful franchise that he has lost the sense of what it takes to make
a good movie.  Thin representations and special effects have replaced
three-dimensional characters and an exciting story line, so the result
is a package that is visually impressive but ultimately soulless. Under
pressure, George Lucas has succumbed to the dark side of formulaic
filmmaking.
To be fair, anything that he created would have been criticized in some
way.  After all, how can the most hyped film in history live up to its
expectations?  Simply, it can't, but The Phantom Menace is a great
disappointment because it is ridden with elements that the other Star
Wars films generally avoided: a cliché script, wooden performances and
style over substance direction.  Granted, there are some very nice
touches in the film, but relatively every moment is over-worked by
Lucas' intrusive direction and John Williams' excellent but often
overpowering score.  When the movie starts and that familiar text and
audio begins, I'm sure that many viewers will feel the same kind of
adrenaline rush and excitement that I felt.  It is wonderful to feel
like a kid again, and this is the tactic that Lucas effortlessly uses to
immediately captivate his audience.  He sets us up, and all he has to do
is knock us down.  Easy, right?  Wrong.
The plot synopsis of The Phantom Menace reads a lot like a Star Trek
film: Jedi master Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his faithful apprentice
Obi-Wan (Ewan McGregor) are sent as ambassadors to negotiate between The
Trade Federation and Naboo, which is ruled by Queen Amidala (Natalie
Portman).  The negotiations do not go well, and the two Jedi's soon find
themselves rescuing Amidala from capture.  Escaping from the clutches of
robots and a strange alien race, the Jedi's flee to the desolate planet
of Tattoine and damage their ship in the process.  When he tries to buy
spare parts from a shady salesman, Qui-Gon meets a young boy named
Anakin (Jake Lloyd).  He senses that the force (for those who don't
know, is the almighty power "that binds the galaxy together") is
unusually strong will Anakin, and bargains for the boy as well as parts
for their ship to fly home.
Predictably, our heroes encounter some distractions on their mission to
protect the queen.  Qui-Gon accidentally saves the life of a
fish/bird-like creature named Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best), who is
dedicated to saving his life in return; Anakin volunteers himself to
partake in a high stakes "pod race;" and Darth Maul (Ray Park), the evil
apprentice to Darth Sidious (Peter Serafinowicz), is intent on wiping
out the Jedi.
Yes, the special effects are state-of-the-art, but contrary to many
reports I don't think that they're the best we've ever seen.  On many
occasions the vivid and obvious computer animation works to the film's
disadvantage, making it look like a sort of spectacular light show
rather than an exhilarating movie experience.  The pod race scene is too
long and predictably staged.  It bears very loose similarities to the
forest chase scene in Return of the Jedi, but this one is entirely
derivative.  By far the best moment that The Phantom Menace has to offer
comes towards its completion, in which the two Jedi's face off against
Darth Maul.  It's a riveting and exciting high in the film, but even
here Lucas doesn't manipulate his material to good effect.  Instead of
pacing the scene well and building momentum and suspense, he continually
cuts to different scenes and plays Williams' score at a distracting
sound level.  This light saber duel is spectacularly shot but its
editing is too tight and rigid.
Also lacking in The Phantom Menace is a spectrum of intriguing
characters.  Whilst Queen Amidala is convincingly played by Natalie
Portman, whose dialogue helps her come across as a wise leader, almost
everybody else (and their characters) fall short. This is primarily due
to the film's script (also by Lucas) which under-develops its
characters, and implies their personalities rather than examines them.
Darth Maul was a potentially menacing enemy but he barely speaks a word,
so his costume design is as frightening as he gets.  There's also that
hideously annoying creature, Jar Jar Binks, who is obviously marketed
towards those whose shoe size exceeds their age.  A lovable and fun
character like Han Solo is sorely missed, as is a truly sinister bad guy
like Darth Vader.
Occasionally, The Phantom Menace reveals Lucas' infinitive vision of the
Star Wars universe with imagination and color.  But he is a pretentious
filmmaker, who seems to think that he can throw absolutely anything into
a movie so long as it has a Star Wars label to it.  What else could
explain this film's obvious parallels to Christianity, ranging from a
virgin birth to the freeing of slaves.  Maybe it's true that the movie
will make more sense once the rest of the series has been completed, but
I saw precious few things in the film that reminded me of the wonder and
inspiration that the original Star Wars series evoked.  The Phantom
Menace misses out on the sense of adventure of A New Hope, the emotional
resonance of The Empire Strikes Back or Return of the Jedi's highly
satisfying climax.  It's a star wars film, sure, but The Phantom Menace
feels like a video game that you just can't get properly working, no
matter how much money you put into it.


Author
Bob Bloom

 Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999). 3 1/2 stars out of 4.
Starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Jake Lloyd, Natalie Portman and Samuel
L. Jackson. Written and directed by George Lucas.
 Something eerie happened when the 20th Century Fox theme blared from the
screen and those magical words, "A long time ago in a galaxy far, far away"
appeared.
 I felt an adrenaline rush, and I leaned forward in my seat.
 Then the familiar strains of John Williams "Star Wars" theme blasted from
the screen and I felt myself drawn into that mythical world created almost
a quarter of a century ago by George Lucas.
 "Star Wars: Episode 1 - The Phantom Menace" is not a great film, but it is
magical and majestic.
 Many people will dismiss it as an overblown, kiddie, Saturday matinee
popcorn confection. And they would be right.
 And that is exactly what makes "The Phantom Menace" a wonderful viewing
experience. It is a movie that resurrects the child in all of us. It
recalls a time of innocence in movies in which a clear demarcation existed
between the good guys and the bad guys.
 Like its predecessors, especially the first "Star Wars" movie from 1977,
"The Phantom Menace" evokes a feeling of nostalgia, which is ironic, since
it is one of the most technologically advanced features ever brought to the
screen.
 More than 2,000 effects were used in this 130-minute fantasy, yet the
movie does not feel cold or sterile.
 "The Phantom Menace" is a two-hour-plus appetizer, produced to whet our
expectations for the saga to follow. That also is the movie's main
drawback.
 It's more of a history lesson, a primer. Its main purpose is to introduce
us to its characters and explain a little about them.
 The movie is like those briefings combat pilots get before flying sorties.
They are shown the lay of the land and its outstanding landmarks in order
to familiarize themselves with the topography. The only difference is that
"The Phantom Menace" is much more enjoyable.
 The main objective of "The Phantom Menace" - besides being rousing
entertainment - is to show the beginnings of the downfall of the old
Republic as well as the machinations that lead to the rise of the evil
Galactic Empire.
 Along the way we are introduced to younger versions of characters we have
met or heard about in the first trilogy: a young slave boy named Anakin
Skywalker; the Jedi master Yoda; a young Jedi apprentice named Obi-Wan
Kenobi, a work-in-progress protocol droid named C-3PO and a feisty, round
little droid called R2-D2.
 We also meet some new characters: the Jedi Knight Qui-Gon Jinn, young
Queen Amidala of Naboo, Jar Jar Binks, a clumsy, childlike amphibious being
belonging to an underwater race called the Gungans, Darth Maul, a Dark Lord
of Sith who wields a double-edged light saber, and Lord Sidious, his
master, who stays in the shadows as he plots to overthrow the Republic.
 Lucas fills "The Phantom Menace" with much exposition, but it is balanced
with various and spectacular action sequences and jaw-dropping vistas.
 One of the most awe-inspiring scenes involves a pod race won by the young
Anakin. It is the consummate high-tech drag race, inspired by its creator's
fond memories of his hot-rodding youth.
 And, of course, what would a "Star Wars" film be without the obligatory
dogfight in space. As usual, computer-generated vehicles roll, dive and
soar like miniature hawks.
 Lucas has been accused of lavishing more time on his props and computer
effects than on his human actors.
 And while a case can be made that he seems to have left Liam Neeson as
Qui-Gon Jinn and Ewan McGregor as young Obi-Wan to their own devices, it
appears he put in many hours with young Jake Lloyd (Anakin) and Natalie
Portman (Queen Amidala).
 Neeson gives a stalwart, dignified performance as the veteran Jedi. But he
has played larger-than-life characters before ("Rob Roy," "Les Miserables,"
"Schindler's List"), so he is familiar with the territory.
 McGregor ("Trainspotting," "A Life Less Ordinary") is one of the finest
young actors in movies today. And judging by his previous performances, he
also has an intelligence and instinct that leads him to make the correct
choices. However, to be fair, he really has little to do except say, "Yes,
Master,"" over and over to Qui-Gon, as well as engage in various laser
saber battles.
 With young Lloyd, Lucas walks a tricky path. Anakin, ostensibly, is the
movie's hero. Lloyd is charming, confident and endearing, but ...
 This is the boy who, when he becomes an adult, is corrupted to accept the
Dark Side and is transformed into Darth Vader, one of the most memorable
villains in movie history.
 Lucas underscores this at time through the music of John Williams, who has
created a resounding score. His Anakin's theme is a bit pastoral, yet
undermining it are hints of the Darth Vader theme from the first "Star
Wars" trilogy.
 Portman is regal and resourceful as the young queen, and it will be
interesting to see her mature if she retains the role in the two sequels.
 Also bringing heart to the proceedings is Pernilla August as Anakin's
mother. Their scenes together are poignant, the best in the movie.
 Also on hand are the vocal talents of Frank Oz as Yoda and, in what
amounts to a cameo, Samuel L. Jackson as Mace Windu, a member of the Jedi
Council.
 Unfortunately, Jackson has little to do except sit, ponder and issue dire
warnings about Anakin's future.
 The real stars of "The Phantom Menace" are the thousands of
behind-the-scenes people at Industrial Light and Magic who brought Lucas'
creations to life.
 This movie is a good 95-plus percent computer-generated effects. Yet the
characters, especially Jar Jar Binks as well as the rest of the Gungan,
seem so real, so human, that you soon forget they are pixels and bytes.
 "The Phantom Menace" is a rip-roarin' good time. Like its predecessors,
it's a throwback to an earlier era in movie history, while at the same time
it is in the vanguard of a cinematic future in which computers will create
worlds and landscapes we could only imagine.
 The Force is alive and well and beats strongly in "The Phantom Menace."
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Author
Peter Berry
    As the days wore on, plodding a slow course towards the 15th July, I
said to myself, whenever I saw yet another article hurling abuse at The
Phantom Menace, I would wait until I had seen it before passing any kind of
judgement.
    The day of reckoning arrived. Today I would see, for the first time, a
really bad film. Usually, I buy a medium sweet tub of popcorn to see my
stomach through the film. I made the decision to forego it this time, (maybe
I wouldn't need it), as I wanted as few a distractions as possible. From the
start, the omens were good. Nobody sat in the seat directly infront of me, I
could watch the film without having to worry about some hyperactive idiot
squirming throughout, or having to stare at a very tall persons head with an
afro, and a bowler hat.
    As I sat and watched the various advertisements and film trailers
beforehand, which seemed to go on and on, (I was getting impatient now), my
haed was filled with worry and trepidation, and......worry and trepidation.
Worry because all I'd heard over the last two month's were accusations that
the film was a huge disappointment, and that it was all a big waste of time.
Trepidation for myself, did I want to go on, did I want to find out after
all this time that I couldn't sit through such an undoubted pile of trash?
    Then it started. Great. And it was. Then it finished. Bloody hell. And I
meant it, I wanted to go and see it again. It wasn't the best film I'd ever
seen, but let me see, what had people been saying about it? Crappy and badly
used characters, much too reliant on SFX, bad guys under-used, bad guy's not
bad enough, stilted script, etc......... All I can say in response is
rubbish, rubbish, rubbish, rubbish, etc............ Yes, unhook yourself
from that lampshade and listen, my opinions on The Phantom Menace are
overwhelmingly positive. I know, I know, I'm leaving myself open to endless
abuse and should probably be shot in order to put me out of my misery. It's
just that, well, it's just that I think all the bad press that The Phantom
Menace has recieved is totally unjustified, and all that critics firmly on
the warpath are fundamentally wrong.
    I'll start with what many people blame for the film supposedly being so
bad, for eclipsing everything else, the SFX. Many people had written that
The Phantom Menace was merely a showcase for digital technology saying look,
c'mere, this is what we can do. I thought that the SFX brought the film to
life like no other film has ever been able to do, it's not just there to
paste over the films problems, it compliments it perfectly. If George Lucas
had had the same technology in the late seventies and early eighties that is
available now, he would have done exactly the same thing. I expect Chewbacca
would have been CGI! Oh my god! Therefore, he would have been crap to would
I suppose. Don't say anything yet, I'll come back to that particular
hornet's nest later. The SFX built on the original trilogy, pissed on the
original trilogy, not because they obviously look better, but because they
allow for so much more imaginative scope to be employed by Lucas. Nobody,
when the original trilogy was released, could have ever imagined some of the
things that The Phantom Menace has done. Not even Lucas himself. It just
wasn't seen as possible. To all The Phantom Menace's critics, suppose that
Star Wars had looked as good as The Phantom Menace, shown as much visual
imagination, would it to have been crap? On Tatooine, there was a scene in
which Jar Jar Binks had an unfortunate encounter with Sebulba. It was
entirely computer generated. I suppose that makes it shit does it, too
artificial to be any good. If Star Wars was being made with such technolgy
available, Lucas would probably have done the same kind of thing. It looked
great, it added another dimension of life to the space port. In Star Wars,
everything looked naff, everything, yet that is being praised to the hilt.
The original Star Wars suffered from what I call Star Trek Syndrome. This is
telling us that we are seeing another alien culture, but actually it looks
like what, off camera, it actually is, a few buildings in the middle of
nowhere with a politically correct selection of rather human looking aliens.
The Phantom Menace actually appears to have not just one, but many alien
cultures, in every nook and cranny. You can believe it. I can't look at the
original Star Wars, (anymore), or any Star Trek, without knowing that there
is a camera just to the left. I can gladly say that that thought didn't
enter my head during The Phantom Menace. Basically, the point that I am
trying to make is that The Phantom Menace has made a huge effort to surpass
it's predecessors; and in doing that it was going to be different and
snazzy, most certainly not looking camp and corny. What, I ask, is so wrong
with making a film, particularly a science fiction one, look as good as it
possibly can?
    What next, ah yes, Jar Jar Binks. Or, bastard bastard bastard as most
people would probably re-christen him. He's a computer generated character.
That's the first thing that should be praised. He's not a man in a suit.
Chewbacca yeah, Chewbacca great. Actually, man in a suit and a bit crap. Jar
Jar accent is not racially insulting. In an alien culture, they would
probably not have the same racial problems that we have. I don't expect they
get so hung up on how people sound or what colour skin you have. IT DOESN'T
BOTHER THEM, IT'S NOT AN ISSUE. It concerns us because we are idiots. The
same goes for Jar Jar's accent, (which does take some time to understand,
there's no denying that), and the Gungan's accents in general. It's just how
they speak. It's not directed at anybody. Only deeply paranoid people could
think that it is. Everybody compares Jar Jar to the Ewoks from Return of the
Jedi. That, I believe is a bad comparison. A comparison with Chewbacca is
much fairer, as they have both, (I've read), will have appeard in all three
of their respective trilogy's. Chewbacca is basically a monster, tamed. He
illustrates really well the things which sorely limited the original
trilogy. Jar Jar is an imaginative creation, with a personality derived from
more alleyways than one, because now Lucas can. Alright, sometimes his
personality was a little overplayed, but as I said, this isn't the greatest
film ever made. I know that. I accept that, so please don't bother telling
me.
    What about all of the, shall I say, less contentious characters. Namely,
all of them. Yes, I know, they're crap to. But wait. Maybe, just maybe
they're not. Leave that lampshade alone and listen. This is what I thought
of the other characters. One slight admission before though. I did think
that a little bit more character development would have been a good move. I
did think that they were as good as the original trilogy's characters, or
gang as they'd probably rather be known:
    Qui-Gon Jinn - An accompolished and very efficent Jedi Knight. Whenever
he did somthing, he did it because he knew that he was correct, and it was
the right thing, in the long term to do, (Anakin). There was no charging in
and hoping for the best, that, as far as I was concerned, made him much more
believable than you're usual run of the mill action adventure hero.
    Obi-Wan Kenobi - A little under-used I thought. Worryingly, it didn't
immediately strike me as to why. This, in my book, makes him the weakest
link in all the characters. He seemed to spend too much time servicing the
plot developments that were, all too often, executed by Qui-Gon. This was
especially prevelant on Tatooine. But, never mind, he's an apprentice, not
the hero of the piece. He will become the hero. The Phantom Menace isn't
his, it's not supposed to belong to him. Just because he is protrayed by a
big star, does that give him the right to do everything? No, I don't think
it does. Just because he is a well known and well loved character, and is
destined to become a major player in the future, does that mean he has to be
a major player now? No, I don't think it does.
    Anakin Skywalker - Tremendous. He becomes Darth Vader, fine. He was
seduced by the dark side, fine to. But not here, not now. Now, he is a
little boy. A slave. Bought and sold for money. I believe that the fact he
is a good little boy, makes it even more interesting. It makes you even more
mindful that something truely monumental and dramatic will happen to turn
him. If he was a little tear-away, he would have got even more criticism
thrown at him. People would have whined on about the fact that it was
soooooooooo obvious that he had a troubled future ahead of him. Yoda senses
much fear in him. That, at this point, is all we need to know. If you were
seeing this film with a blank canvas, you would emerge with a geniune
feeling of worry about little Anakin's future. You don't because you know
his future, so worry is impossible. Remember, these films, when finished,
are meant to be seen as a six part opera. You are not meant to have prior
knowledge of what is going to happen. But, as you do, it allows Lucas to
load the film with foreboding. Anakin is, because he is the chosen one, a
fragile character, unlike Luke who was very strong and un-wavering). It
shows so well how the dark side is so easy to fall into. Anakin IS fearful.
    Darth Maul - People have been slagging the character off for not
appearing often enough. Personally, I believe this was a good move by Lucas,
it provides us with some of the mystery surrounding him that the Jedi
Council feels. He is not well known to the other characters as Darth Vader
was. The characters are continually stating that they don't know who he is.
Is he a Dark Lord of the Sith? They, and we, are not supposed to know. The
only reason that people have been disappointed by his scarcity is because he
has recieved so much publicity as the big baddie. He is not, he to is an
apprentice. The film doesn't have one. That is a problem that the film does
have, it does need a more prominent bad guy. Neither Darth Maul, or Sidious,
are prominent enough. But, as I said, there is a good reason for that. The
Phantom Menace tries to create a conspiracy feeling, in that nobody has a
monopoly on evilness, something that I didn't think it did too well. Darth
Maul is an introductory character to familiarise is with the Sith. When the
Duel of Fates arrived on screen, (wow), the fact that you hardly got to know
Maul helps wonderfully to portray the sense of mystery that surrounds him,
and all the Sith. Just because we are watching the film, we like to think we
know everything, it gives us a pleasent sense of superiority over the
characters. This is mercilessly removed from our grasp with Darth Maul, and
I thought that was a wonder to behold. If you had gone into the cinema
having not seen any Star Wars, (which, after all, is the idea), you would
hsare the Jedi Council's worry that they don't know who he is. Is he the
master, or the apprentice?
    Senator Palpatine - Sensational. Stole the show. Although, he does
embody a great contradiction. You need to have seen the original trilogy to
understand how significant he is and will become. That's a problem. But,
accepting that, it is tremendously ironic that the start of his rise to
power is sanctioned by a goodie, and the mother of Luke Skywalker, (problem,
relies on original trilogy), Queen Amidala.
    Queen Amidala - It was a weeny bit confusing as to when it was, and when
it wasn't her on screen, what with her handmaidens and other such
shenanigans. However, she successfully portrayed a geniunely distressed head
of a small planet who was way out of her depth. That is why she was so
easily influenced by Senator Palpatine. Who is, as long as it suits him, on
her side. She wouldn't sign the treaty to allow the invasion of Naboo. This
showed that she could clearly see the distinction between good and bad,
(light and dark), but when the two are so cleverly intertwined as they are
with Senator Palpatine, she is nothing more than a pawn.
    Darth Sidious - Menacing to say the least. That's about all I can say
about him at the moment.
    So then, it all boils down to what you were expecting. If you were
expecting another brain dead action adventure, then don't see it. However,
if you want a wide ranging piece, with action in the right amount, and
unfortunately dodgy political bit's, (necessary to document Senator
Palpatine's rise to power. You wouldn't want the future Emperor of the
Galactic Empire explained away in one scene, or even worse, one long speech
would you), and boiling over with imagination, then go see it. Now. This
minute.
    Finally, and in conclusion, the plot. This was also universally slated
as being crap. Supposedly, the plot is plot-less and lacking any discernable
direction. Again, I disagree. The Phantom Menace set's everthing up
wonderfully. The plot thickens at marginally below optimun speed, which
isn't ideal but is nowhere near as bad as what had been said. It moves
about, doesn't stay in one place for too long, and climaxes in a fantastic
battle scene containing many threads that come together in just the same way
that they did in A New Hope and Return of the Jedi. The Phantom Menace
brings together all the best bit's of the original trilogy, (yes, despite
what I've said, there are many), and mixes them with a whole bunch of
fantastic new ones. Super, smashing, great. So, contrary to the over-riding
consensus that The Phantom Menace is no good. I reckon that it is far, far
superior to A New Hope and Return of the Jedi, and as good as, if not
better, (gasp), than The Empire Strikes Back. Even though it is marketed as
a kid's film, it does show a greater maturity than the original trilogy.
There are places i nthe film that require something above the level of
intelligence of a 12 year old to enjoy. Taht is, of course, if you bother to
try to enjoy it at all because, after all, it's very, very bad isn't it? The
Phantom Menace isn't hit and hope, it's hit and know. No cowboy's. No silly
womanising actions heroes like Han Solo. I'm not saying he was bad, far from
it, but The Phantom Menace doesn't need anybody like that. The Phantom
Menace has a much more accomplished buch of individuals, we don't have to
sit and watch then all grow up.
    Lastly, I have read a lot of reviews whinging on about the crawl,
costumes and Darth Maul's red face paint. These people are presenting biased
opinions. They were going to hate the film, and went in with a notebook to
note down all the things that they were going to slag off. And the things
they are talking about in their reviews are desperate attempts to do just
that, slag it off. That, is not good reviewing.
    The Phantom Menace is really Act One. Now, we're at the first
intermission. I've just finished my ice cream, packet of crisps, coke, and
have used the toilet. I want to settle down to Act Two. Unfortunately, it
can't be shown yet, as the theatre has to repeat Act One, somebady wasn't
paying attention.
"At last we can reveal ourselves to the Jedi, at last we can have revenge."

Author
Scott Davies

Right. So, I just got back from the very first "open to the public" showing.
Now, I'm sure by now, you've read many a plot synopsis, so I won't
reiterate what others have said.
I'm a Star Wars fanatic. I'm very very biased. I had to love this movie no
matter what it turned out like.
As it turns out, I didn't have to rely on that blind faith in the force.
The movie is good. Very, very good. Its visually the most stunning
movie I've ever seen, and likely to remain so until the next Star Wars
episode hits theatres.
In keeping with the other movies, the acting has that slight "cheesy" feel
to it, which I personally believe suited the movie just perfectly.
If I had to have a problem with the movie (and I do...) I'd have to say
its the way some of the enemies are defeated. One scene with Jar Jar Binks
springs to mind, showing such uncanny luck that you'd think that goof was
force-sensitive. whichheisdefinitelynot.
Hey...its 3 am. I may be wired on Jolt, but I don't think this is the best
time for me to be writing a review. 
Go see the freaking movie already. You know you will.
All in all, a fine addition to the Star Wars legacy....now if they can
only hurry up and bring us the clone wars and the Mandalorians...
--
%$^$^@%@!#$#!#*%&%^)%_@$($my984#@nameQ##%is$#%*!45oedipus$#@%!!!@#$85#@444@#1!!

Author
Stacey Oziel
You've heard all the hype. You've seen all their faces -
Natalie Portman (The Professional) as Queen Amidala,
Liam Neeson (Schindler's List) as Qui-Gon Jinn, Ewan
McGregor (Trainspotting) as Obi-Wan Kenobi, and Jake
Lloyd (Jingle all the Way) as young Anakin Skywalker.
If you've read any reviews, you've also probably heard
that this movie fails to live up to the magic and humanity
of the first trilogy. You also may have heard that this
one's too kiddie-friendly, and doesn't have enough content
for adults.
The effects are stunning, the digitalized creatures are
amazingly realistic, the lightsaber duels are amazing,
and Queen Amidala's sumptuous robes are fit to be
worn by Queen Elizabeth.
But there's something missing here, and it isn't budget
or effects - it's everything money *can't* buy.
The actors struggle as best they can to flesh out
broad-stroked and flat characters. The most successful
at this is Liam Neeson who, as Qui-Gon Jinn, a Jedi
master to young Obi-Wan Kenobi, has quiet dignity
and a wise, commanding presence. He is the anchor
to this movie, as he is the one character who George
Lucas apparently spent some time fleshing out.
Portman's Queen Amidala and McGregor's Obi-Wan
Kenobi don't fare nearly so well. Amidala, the future
mother of Luke and Leia and the queen of a peaceful
planet being invaded by the Trade Federation (?!?),
comes off as stoic, stilted and caricatured (it appears
as though she was a Vulcan Geisha in a former life).
And Obi-Wan, although McGregor makes him very
endearing, has so little screen time that he's nothing
but a Robin to Qui-Gon Jinn's Batman.
However, McGregor does struggle manfully to infuse this
surprisingly small supporting role with a spark of genuine
insight and humanity, and he does a good job. He also
absolutely NAILS Alec Guiness' (Obi-Wan in Episode
4 - 6) Scottish accent, and that really makes his presence
in the film more profound than it might have been
otherwise.
In fact, Lucas seems to bank on that preexisting
knowledge quite a bit, and that's one of the problems
with this film. I would never call myself a "Star Wars"
fan - especially not considering what it means to be
a fanatic these days - but I've always enjoyed the films
along with everyone else in America. However, if you
are the one person in America who *hasn't* seen the
films at all or even recently, or who doesn't bother
to brush-up on the names of obscure characters, you
may be hopelessly lost.
For example, one of the film's main (nefarious) characters
is Senator Palpatine. For those of you not recently steeped
in "Star Wars" trivia, Emperor Palpatine is that scary hooded
apparition who was Darth Vader's master in "Return of the Jedi"
and "Empire Strikes Back." So, obviously, his appearance in
"Phantom Menace" is meant to stir some echoes of his later
role in the series, thus making his role here more meaningful.
A lot of the movie is like that. R2-D2 and C-3PO make token
appearances, and it's obvious that Lucas is banking on the
audience's pre-existing fondness for them... because he
doesn't do much to add to it in any way. Same goes for
Jabba the Hutt, who doesn't look as much mean here
as he does corpulent and lazy. Even *planets* make
foreshadowing guest appearances in this film - Tatooine
(the desert world where Luke grew up), Coruscant (the
cloud city from "Empire Strikes Back"), and Alderaan
(Leia's home planet - which we never actually see -
that gets blown up in "Star Wars") show up or are
mentioned briefly in passing.
What's the result of tying so many plot points and
characters to future films? The answer is that this one
seems surprisingly empty. There's no meat - no substance -
that makes you want to love the characters as they are,
not as they will be.
Another problem is that there are actually *too many*
alien characters in the film. I was distracted by the
fact that two of the main evil characters - strange
looking aliens who looked like Gila monsters -
had mouths that barely moved, making them
look more like Muppets than actual characters.
And Jar Jar Binks, a silly Roger Rabbitish amphibious
character, is intended as comic relief, but what he
really becomes is annoying - and fast. Unlike
Chewbacca and C-3PO, who got their humanity
(if you'll pardon the expression) from their interactions
with the human characters, Jar Jar is often left to
interact mostly with others of his kind, at times
making the movie seem like nothing more than
a very expensive "Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles."
Furthermore, the dialogue is often stilted and corny,
and sometimes downright infantile, thereby rendering
some characters into nothing more than bystanders
to the plot. Oddly, this isn't just *my* judgment -
Lucas has said that he designed this film for kids.
Well, he's done a good job.
The hero of this film, of course, is young Anakin,
but it was very hard for me to feel any kinship or
identify with an eight-year-old boy. That's not
Jake Lloyd's fault, though - he does a good job
of being a cute kid, which is apparently all Lucas
asked of him. That's another mistake, of course,
because the cute tyke becomes Darth Vader.
In my opinion, there was not nearly enough
foreshadowing of Anakin's future evil in the film.
The boy is all blond flowing hair and rosy cheeks,
and there's nothing more than a spark of aggression
in him throughout the entire movie. He has a doting
mother (Pernilla August, making her first English-
language film) and is a slave to a gross flying gnome
on Tatooine. But the only indication the audience
gets that this kid isn't all hearts and roses is Yoda's
hesitation in allowing him to train as a Jedi under
Qui-Gon Jinn. His explanation? "His future is clouded."
(Warning: MAJOR spoiler ahead. Enter at your own risk.)
Of course, the noble Qui-Gon dies at the hand of
Darth Maul, a scary-looking Sith lord who excels
at the Jedi arts, but has turned to the Dark Side.
This dude has maybe two lines in the entire movie,
but he establishes his presence through his amazing
moves with his double-sided lightsaber, and his
scary facial makeup.
Because Qui-Gon never gets a chance to train the
young Anakin in the ways of the Force, Obi-Wan,
Qui-Gon's young Padawan apprentice (one level
below Knightdom), must take over the training
himself.
So, at the end of the movie, we end where the saga
actually begins - with Obi-Wan Kenobi and his young
apprentice, Anakin "Darth Vader" Skywalker.
Did this story need to be told? I would say no. But
is it a worthwhile movie to see? Absolutely. If you
don't enter the theater with Jedi-size expectations,
and you simply want to be treated to an enjoyable
visual spectacle, then this is your movie.
The Tatooine pod races are a triumph of effects
and computer animation. The digitalized backgrounds
on some of the planets are an astonishing sight.
And Yoda and young Obi-Wan are worth seeing
for their origins in a simpler, happier time.
Above all, this is a fun movie. Not deep, not
meaningful, and not profound. But fun.
Maybe next time, Lucas will hire Lawrence
Kasdan to co-write the script, and the guy
who directed "Empire" will direct. Because
if Lucas does the next one himself, it will
be lacking the one thing it needs the
most - potential. :)
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Author
Fontaine Lien
`Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menac' Review
by Fontaine L.
(SPOILERS.  SOME YOU'VE HEARD ABOUT, SOME YOU PROBABLY HAVEN'T.)
**This review is dedicated to Lori `McGregor,' who yelled `SEXY!!' whenever
Obi-Wan appeared on-screen.**
Imagine someone who's never seen or heard about Star Wars before coming up to
you and asking you what `Phantom Menace' was about and what kind of movie it
was like.  It would mostly likely be difficult to describe creature fighting
with atomic gumballs, a little boy who is allowed to race `pods' at hundreds of
miles per hour, and villains who are never entirely introduced without some
misgivings.  But this is `The Phantom Menace,' the prequel sequel to what is
perhaps the most successful science fiction franchise in the history of the
western hemisphere.  This is LucasFilms moviemaking, where they rely on
mindboggling effects, breathtaking graphics, and moviegoers' partiality to win
the hearts.  
This comes from me, X-Phile extraordinaire who has never been especially
inebriated by the Star Wars phenomenon.  I am no `Star Wars groupie,' as a
friend attempted to label me a few days ago.   I have no Skywalker or Han Solo
action figures.  I never dressed up as Princess Leia during Halloween.  I never
_wanted_ to be Princess Leia.  I don't own the trilogy.  I don't _remember_
most of the trilogy.  I did not see `Phantom Menace' the first day it came out.
  But nonetheless, the characters in Star Wars has become as familiar to me as
they have become to the millions of Star Wars fans out there.  R2D2, C3PO,
ewoks, Yoda, Obi-Wan, Darth Vader, Jabba the Hut.  Oft-used terminology.  To
sum it all up, I find it extremely difficult not to extol this movie with high
enthusiasm and let that be the end of it.   
The idea that the `complete' story will be told in three sequels is enticing,
ingenious, but unfortunately, the integrity of `Phantom' was sacrificed because
of the same reason.  Those of you who were under the delusion that we would
find out how little Anakin becomes evil will be disappointed.  Most of the
characters were given little treatment, with the primary focus being in Anakin.
 At the end of the movie, we know little about Qui Gon Jinn, Obi-Wan, or even
Queen Amidala (except that she is an extremely dedicated queen.) These are all
characters that I would've liked to spent more time with.  Darth Maul, who
makes an interesting villain, only appeared when he was required to look
intimidating or to be the enemy of the good forces.  He makes an appearance in
only two to three fantastic `duels' but is killed off too swiftly, too easily. 
Goodbye, painted face.  The primary villain in the movie is thus wasted.  The
federation, it seems, is entirely subject to the control of the hooded
hologram, and the hologram's purpose remains unknown (a story to be told in
Episode II, I suppose.)
Most of the action scenes are filled with typical Lucasian improbabilities. 
The Naboo troops never seem to take aim when they fire, and yet they rarely
suffer even a bruise.  The ultimate improbability comes when the movie pulls an
Independence Day -- oh no, we can't disable their shields, here comes little
Anakin who can do it just be flying into the ships interior and flying
randomly, thus enabling a swift victory on ground.  Of course I realize that
all of these events are essential for the movie to continue, and they weren't
quite so annoying given the context.  This is Star Wars, after all.  The cheesy
dialogue is no rumor, folks; it seems great directors are incapable of writing
sensible dialogue (see Chris Carter's monologues or James Cameron's `Titanic.')
Any angst I felt during the Anakin/mom parting scene dissipated with the soap
opera ish writing.  In contrast, the Qui Gon Jinn death scene was more
effective because it had more matter, and less art.   Again, the cheesiness
seems oddly in place in the scheme of things.  Nobody goes to this movie
expecting `The English Patient.'
Most annoying character of the year goes to--yep, you guessed it- Jar-Jar.  He
is comical, yes, maybe even funny (though I find most of the humor forced), if
he hadn't been used so much and if his jokes were more aptly-placed.  Portman,
McGregor and Neeson were all reasonably satisfying in their roles: Portman
successfully portrayed the different qualities of the queen all-dolled up, the
decoy queen, and the gentle `handmaiden' queen.   She looked for all the world
a 14 year-old teenager forced to take on the responsibilities of a planet yet
strong enough to shoulder it.  Neeson was also convincing as the wise Jedi
Knight, and his `moves' were none too shabby for a man his age; McGregor was
often reduced to saying `Yes, master,' but when the occasion called for it he
put an admirable amount of intensity into Obiwan Kenobi, foreshadowing the
future that is to come.  All three were aptly cast.  Jake Lloyd is extremely
adorable, but sometimes the artificiality of his acting comes through; but I
suppose that's okay, because 12 year-olds don't have a tremendous degree of
depth anyhow.  In any case he compensates with his innocence and charm, which
is all the more poignant given the fact that Anakin turns into the monstrous
Darth Vader.  Most of the other minor characters (for example, Anakin's mother
and the captain), however, seemed lifeless. 
I think most will agree that the most successful element of the film was its
graphics and effects.  Lucas combined his powerful vision with state-of-the-art
technology and the best artists in the trade to produce a world more
breathtaking than even the previous Star Wars trilogy.  Tattooine excites a
degree of nostalgia; and the underwater city, the Capitol, and the Naboo city
are all works of arts on their own.  Each city offers its share of curious
creatures: the amphibians, the oddballs at the Tattooine marketplace, the
creatures of the Jedi Council (I especially got a kick out of Mr. Conehead). 
The dress and language seem to be successful combinations of different world
cultures -- I did not have a big problem with the accents as others do.  I
think it is mere coincidence that many of the creatures ended up sounding like
some ethnic groups on this planet.  After all, if an actor is to emulate an
accent, he's got to model it after something he knows.   It just goes to show
the diversity that exists in the Star Wars universe.  Some people also find the
CGI art to be to unrealistic, but this also wasn't a problem with me -- this is
a fantasy, and how can you make a fantasy world look realistic?  It would take
away the surreal quality of it.  
While I am mindful of the flaws this film has (plot, characterization,
acting), I admit that for the most part they went unnoticed during the 2 hours
and some minutes I was in the theater (except Jar Jar -- you just *can't* tune
him out).  I was simply too much in awe that I was watching Star Wars, that I
had a chance to participate in this even like my parent's generation had been
able to do with the first three Star Wars movies.  Seeing Portman and Mcgregor
I couldn't but see shades of young Hamill, Harrison, and Fisher.  However, I am
not saying the flaws are excusable; I make no attempt to disguise the fact that
I am extremely biased when it comes to Star Wars.  It's Star Wars.  Basically
it comes down to this: if you are as enchanted with the universe that Lucas
singlehandedly created as I am, you will enjoy this film; if you go in as a
casual viewer, you'd enjoy the film as well; but if you watch the movie as a
critic, you probably won't enjoy the movie.  I say let go for a while.  Let the
force take over for a bit.
(I will say that again and again, and I am sure its meaning will not escape
anyone who is in tune with pop culture to any extent.  When you see the movie
in this light, it becomes not just a movie but part of a whole, an event that
symbolizes the creation of an entire new world.  A continuation (precursor?) of
the saga.  A chance for two generations to connect in the collective worship of
a phenomenon.  As mentioned in the beginning, this film relies heavily on the
success of its predecessors to engage the audience and to make them care for
its characters.  I'd say, for me at least, that they've succeeded.  I think
I've found the ideal fantasy heros for my generation.)
It's light and magic, sound and effects, heroes and princesses, science
fiction and drama, the allegorical good and evil.  And y'know?  It's funny how,
in the end, no matter what misgivings and cynicism I might have had about the
film, it all added up to one neat little ball of elation and belief.  
*Tip I got from somebody: Stay till the end of the credits.  You'll get a
`surprise' (or more like a foreshadowing).
*The federation aliens look a lot like the `little green men' we are so
familiar with today.
*Thanks to Catherine for the `amphibians' idea, and Spero for the character
names.  
Silver-Screen List Administrator and PVPHS Class of '99
http://members.aol.com/saitiau/welcome.html

Author
Michael Dequina
_Star_Wars:_Episode_I--The_Phantom_Menace_ (PG) *** 1/2 (out of ****)
        There are a couple of angles at which to approach
_Star_Wars:_Episode_I_--The_Phantom_Menace_: in comparison to the three
episodes that have been released; or, ideally, as an individual film, in
and of itself.  In the latter regard, _The_Phantom_Menace_ is the type of
exceptionally well-made, highly imaginative science fiction adventure
that one would expect from the mind of series creator George Lucas, who
makes an impressive return to the director's chair after a self-imposed
22-year hiatus.  It is in the former respect, however, that the film
cannot help but fall short.
The shadow of the first three films released in the series--1977's
_Star_Wars:_A_New_Hope_ (Episode IV), 1980's _The_Empire_Strikes_Back_
(Episode V), and 1983's _Return_of_the_Jedi_ (Episode VI)--looms large
over _The_Phantom_Menace_, and it's not just because those landmark films
have such an enduring legacy.  Rather, it's because Lucas's
_Phantom_Menace_ script is a hodgepodge of different elements from those
three films.  To start, the Gungan, an amphibious race on the planet
Naboo, are scrappy warriors along the lines of _Jedi_'s Ewoks; a pod
racing scene is pretty much _Jedi_'s forest speeder bike chase
transplanted onto the desert; dual light saber-wielding villain Darth
Maul (Ray Park) is a badass scenestealer in the tradition of Boba Fett,
who first appeared in _Empire_.
The installment that _The_Phantom_Menace_ most closely resembles,
however, is _A_New_Hope_.  There's a wise elder Jedi Master, Qui-Gon Jinn
(Liam Neeson), not unlike _A_New_Hope_'s Obi-Wan Kenobi.  Obi-Wan is also
in this episode, in a younger, wilder incarnation (played by Ewan
McGregor) that recalls Luke Skywalker.  Other similarities include a
lavish celebration scene, the destruction of a space vessel, and the
intricate, Princess Leia-to-the-next-level hair design of her future
mother, Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman) of Naboo.
Unfortunately, _The_Phantom_Menace_ also falls into the same narrative
rut that _A_New_Hope_ did in its first act, but to a much larger degree. 
After an interesting opening section, from Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan's rousing
slice and dice through squads of battle droids aboard a Trade Federation
spaceship to their rescue of Amidala from evil Federation forces on
Naboo, the story gets bogged down in exposition once our heroes land on
the desert planet of Tatooine.  There, Qui-Gon discovers young Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), the future Darth Vader and focal character of
this trilogy of _Star_Wars_ films.  As Qui-Gon and Amidala's handmaiden
Pradmé get to know "Ani" and his mother (Pernilla August), the film slows
to a crawl.  Making the proceedings no less tedious is the strained comic
agony (as opposed to "relief") of Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best), a chatty
Gungan who becomes Qui-Gon's sidekick.  Far from lovable, I wanted to
strangle the critter by his second scene.
Things pick up with the aforementioned pod race sequence (which, I must
say, is every bit the thrill ride the _Jedi_ speeder bike chase is), only
to fall into more talky exposition, which only serves to make
_The_Phantom_Menace_'s main story needlessly convoluted and, as such,
largely uninvolving.  Basically the plot boils down to Amidala being
violently strongarmed into a treaty with the evil Trade Federation, which
has been working with the mysterious Darth Sidious (the "Phantom Menace"
of the title), whose main enforcer is the deadly Darth Maul.
        However, this is not to say that the first two-thirds of
_The_Phantom_Menace_ is as dry as a Tatooine summer (or spring... or
fall... or winter).  Far from it--though the story may not keep one
consistently engaged, there are other things that do.  Always capturing
one's attention--and imagination--are the state-of-the-art visual effects
on display.  One of the greatest delights of this and the other
_Star_Wars_ films are the new worlds springing from Lucas's fervid
imagination.  Tatooine is the only familiar pit stop; also on the travel
itinerary are the Coruscant (briefly seen at the end of the _Jedi_
Special Edition), the city-covered planet that serves as the home of the
Galactic Senate; Naboo; and the Gungan's hidden undersea home on Naboo. 
Then, of course, there are the various effects used to populate the
streets of these worlds with exotic alien creatures, as well as those
used to depict the spaceways and the crafts that travel them.  Some CGI
shots are more convincing than others, but they never fail to be the
slightest bit believable or intriguing.
The new troupe of actors holds their own against the largely digital
landscape.  Neeson exudes the right air of authority and solemnity as
Qui-Gon, as does Samuel L. Jackson in a much-publicized cameo as Jedi
Council member Mace Windu.  While Mark Hamill and Carrie Fisher did not
settle into their acting stride until _Empire_, Portman and McGregor have
comfortably nailed down their roles in their first outing, though
McGregor's fairly limited screen time is somewhat surprising.  On the
other hand, not so surprising is the fact that Lloyd is the weak link in
the core four.  In all fairness, he does an adequate job as a whole, but
that does not mean that he's immune to the stiff and cloying moments that
often befall child actors; prepare to cringe when Lloyd lets out a forced
"Whoopee!"
The numerous slow patches ultimately just makes one more appreciative of
the pure visceral excitement of the slam-bang third act.  Lucas cuts
loose, following no less than four concurrent battles in which many shots
are fired from pistols and space craft, light sabers are crossed, energy
balls are flung, and more than a little property is destroyed.  The
highlight by far is an exhilarating, series-best light saber duel pitting
both Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan against that dastardly Darth Maul, who more than
lives up to his pre-release hype.
         That mostly all of the action comes at the end will undoubtedly
disappoint die-hard _Star_Wars_ fans and casual moviegoers alike.  But
with so much hype surrounding it (largely generated, in a nice change of
pace, by the fans, _not_ the studio), there was no way
_The_Phantom_Menace_ could live up to the overinflated expectations. 
What it could have possibly lived up to is the _Star_Wars_ legacy, and in
time, it very well may--with _Episode_II_ and _Episode_III_ still yet to
come (in 2002 and 2005, respectively), it's impossible to judge how well
_The_Phantom_Menace_ plays within the context of the entire saga.  At
this point in time, however, _The_Phantom_Menace_, as polished and
entertaining as it is, has nothing in it that quite compares to
_A_New_Hope_'s euphoric sense of wonder and discovery; the exciting
action highs and the despairing emotional lows of _Empire_; or the
emotional catharsis of _Jedi_'s highly resonant climax.  (opens May 19)
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com___________________________________________________________________
You don't need to buy Internet access to use free Internet e-mail.
Get completely free e-mail from Juno at http://www.juno.com/getjuno.html
or call Juno at (800) 654-JUNO [654-5866]

Author
Scott Renshaw
STAR WARS: EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Jake Lloyd, Natalie Portman, Ian
McDiarmid, Ray Park, Anthony Daniels, Kenny Baker, Frank Oz, Ahmet Best.
Screenplay:  George Lucas.
Producer:  Rick McCallum.
Director:  George Lucas.
MPAA Rating:  PG (violence)
Running Time:  131 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Contrary to conventional wisdom, The Force is not a mystical,
all-encompassing power; it's what George Lucas must be feeling in the
middle of his chest as he revives the STAR WARS saga after a 16-year
hiatus.  In one sense, of course, EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE is the
ultimate can't-lose proposition.  It's also the ultimate can't-win
proposition, a monolith nearly impossible to separate from the ridiculous
expectations.  Curiously, critics face a similar predicament.  A rave
could be interpreted as succumbing to the hype, while a jeer could be
viewed as anti-hype backlash.  How do you talk about a film that virtually
demands the creation of a new set of rules -- for the film-maker, for the
media, for the audience?
     I can only explain my reaction to THE PHANTOM MENACE this way:  when
John Williams' now-iconic fanfare burst forth over the sound system, I was
9 years old again, shivering with anticipation at being transported by
Lucas' singular mythology.  And transported I was...into a hard drive.
There's no other way to explain the chilly experience of THE PHANTOM
MENACE, which opens with Jedi Knights Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his
apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) on a diplomatic mission to
resolve a dispute between the Trade Federation and the planet Naboo.  When
it becomes clear that the Federation's trade blockade is part of a more
sinister plan, the Jedis flee Naboo with the planet's Queen Amidala 
(Natalie Portman) and amphibian Gungan Jar-Jar Binks (Ahmet Best).  A
repair stop on the planet Tatooine introduces us to young Anakin Skywalker
(Jake Lloyd), a slave boy whom Qui-Gon believes is the Chosen One destined
to bring balance to the Force.
     There are plenty of other plot fragments floating around in THE
PHANTOM MENACE -- most of them involving political machinations -- but the
ho-hum plotting may actually be the least of its flaws.  Quite simply,
this is a film devoid of personality, filled with characters who never
inspire affection or close identification.  STAR WARS, for all its dazzle,
had three fundamentally solid characters at its core:  conflicted
hero-on-a-quest Luke; tough, no-nonsense Leia; and lovable rogue Han.  THE
PHANTOM MENACE counters with the stoic Qui-Gon, the slightly-less-stoic
Obi-Wan, and the stoic-in-a-slightly-different-way Amidala.  Meanwhile,
young Jake Lloyd brings little gravity to the character which will become
the crux of this universe, and Jar-Jar's brand of comic relief is
intensely grating.  It's almost funny to hear Qui-Gon described as 
rebellious, since he seems about as capable of a rash act as he is of
cracking a smile.  There may be heroes in THE PHANTOM MENACE, but there's
really no one to like.
     And, for that matter, there's really no one to hate.  Darth Sidious,
the Sith who will be Emperor, is the primary villain of the piece, yet he
only appears in the form of a jittery transmission, hardly the stuff of
genuine menace.  Darth Maul, meanwhile -- he of the marketing-friendly
Day-Glo visage -- is effective considering his limited screen time, yet
he's really a glorified henchman for all his double-bladed lightsaber
tricks.  THE PHANTOM MENACE is missing that unifying, ultimately hissable
bad guy that makes for great archetypal conflict.
     What we do have is a triumph of art direction and technology which
creates alien worlds like no film ever has before.  The streets of a
Tatooine town bustle with creatures both familiar and unfamiliar; the
megalopolis of Coruscant, capital of the Republic, features eye-popping
architecture and the kind of traffic flow of which civil engineering
legends are made.  Though the pacing of the opening hour is on the pokey
side -- which places it in good company with the first STAR WARS -- Lucas
eventually produces a few dynamic set pieces like the desert pod race.
When THE PHANTOM MENACE goes for pure visual satisfaction, it usually
delivers.
     Ultimately, though, there's a more basic satisfaction the film lacks.
Its structure and imagery are reminiscent both of STAR WARS and RETURN OF
THE JEDI -- particularly the latter in its three-ring climax -- but it
doesn't even achieve JEDI's level of old-fashioned fantasy fulfillment.
When Gungans and battle droids clash on the fields of Naboo, every last
figure a digital concoction, you begin to sense the absence of a primally
appealing human story in this blockbuster.  It may be true that it will
feel more complete a few years hence when its backstory has turned into
relationships between Obi-Wan and Anakin, between Anakin and Amidala.  For
now, all that remains is spectacle without resonance, without magic, 
without even all that much fun if you happen to be over the age of 10.  In
this era of computer wizardry, Lucas has sapped his story of the thing
that made it a phenomenon in the first place.  The result is an adventure
that feels...well, Forced.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I am not a Star Wars fanatic, but I do love the Star Wars movies, and own
the first three in my personal collection (A little background on the critic
always helps...). This first episode of the Star Wars films goes back 30-odd
years before the first movie took place, and uncovers the origins of many of
the films' biggest attractions, with an emphasized focus on the young Anakin
Skywalker, later known simply as Darth Vader.
PLOT:
Suffice it to say that there is plenty of turmoil in the galaxy, and Queen
Amidala needs the protection of two Jedis in an attempt to save her people
from further suffering. Along their route, the Jedis pick up a bizarre
creature who helps them out (sort of), and a young boy, who carries within
him a very strong kinship to the Force.
CRITIQUE:
A visual feast. This movie is a perfect example of why the word "eye-candy"
was invented. More enjoyable than THE RETURN OF THE JEDI, but not as
interesting as THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK or STAR WARS, this film smashes all
previous science-fiction flicks and their claim to futuristic authenticity
with a flawless display of humans, robots, droids and every other kind of
freakazoid in the universe, meched into a wonderful world of special effect
wizardry of a society living in a galaxy far, far away...a long, long time
ago. Every scene contains plenty of beautiful and impeccably integrated
pieces of an artificial world made real by the genius of a man named George
Lucas. This film is a joy to watch and a wonder to inhabit.
Having said that, I found the story line confusing, a little slow in the
midsection, and ultimately boring. I won't numb you with the details of the
plot, but the bottom line is that there are bad guys, and there are good
guys. The Trade Federation, chancellors, blockades, I could do without. Not
very interesting. That being said, there is always something fantastic to
keep your eyes on at all times, so boredom was never really a big issue with
me. I also enjoyed the whole "getting to know" your characters information,
with plenty of background info on most of the prime members of the Star Wars
universe, and some fun cameos as well. The actors also kept up their end of
the bargain with Liam Neeson excellent as the main Jedi Knight, and Natalie
Portman pulling off a solid Queen. The little kid was also pretty good, but
Sam Jackson distracting, due mostly to his enormous presence.
My favorite new character was without a doubt Darth Maul who seemed to ooze
evil and had some cool light-sabering scenes with the Jedis. Too bad they
decided to use him in very little of the film. I also dug on young Anakin's
boss early on in the film, who is a perfect example of a CGI-created
character, who was fun to watch, and not overdone. On the other hand, my
least favorite new character is one that has seemed to rub many adults the
wrong way, and that is Jar-Jar Binks, the CGI-generated creature, which
annoyed me mostly because I didn't understand 3/4 of the things that he was
babbling about. Anyway, enough about him has been said already.
All in all, the film managed to enrapture me in its web of fantasy and space
adventure, strapping me in with its impeccable array of computer-generated
characters, holding me down with its great action scenes and interesting
background info, and blasting me off and into its exquisitely created
universe of special effect magic, majestic palaces and quaint villages, and
visually stunning characters.
Note: Forget the hype, forget this review, cleanse your mind. Just remember
that this is just a movie, so go stand in line and buy yourself some nachos
and Coke, sit your ass down and enjoy the visual story as it floats past
your eyes.
Little Known Facts about the movie and its stars: (courtesy of the IMDb)
George Lucas reportedly wrote this film in the same binder of yellow ruled
paper in which he wrote the original STAR WARS, and apparently financed this
$110-million film entirely out of his own personal stash. The character of
JarJar Binks was named by George Lucas' son, Jett.
During filming Ewan McGregor made lightsaber noises as he dueled. It was
noted and corrected during filmmaking. McGregor is the real-life nephew of
Denis Lawson, who played Rebel pilot Wedge Antilles in the original STAR
WARS.
In 1997, a fierce sandstorm destroyed several of the Tatooine sets in the
desert ouside of Tozeur, Tunisia. Filming resumed two days later. Director
George Lucas considered this a good omen, as the very same thing had
happened during filming of the original STAR WARS in 1977.
Natalie Portman re-dubbed nearly all of her lines after filming was
completed. Lucas' reasoning was that her voice has changed mildly during
filming and there was bad background noise during several of her other
scenes. Her Queen Amidala's throne-room dress took eight weeks to design.
During the first week of the first trailer's release, many theatres reported
up to 75% of their audiences paying full price for a movie, then walking out
after the Star Wars: Episode I trailer was shown.

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
rated PG
20th Century Fox
starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd,
Pernilla August, Frank Oz, Ian McDiarmid, Ahmed Best, Ray Park
written and directed by George Lucas
So..."Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace" has arrived, and as
we all know, it is less a movie than a national phenomenon. Over the
past two decades, we have grown to love the characters that George
Lucas created in his trilogy; the films entitled "Star Wars", "The
Empire Strikes Back", and "Return Of The Jedi". These movies have
changed pop culture as no other movies ever have, creating a mass
following of people whose love for "Star Wars" can be best described
as...religious.
I have to admit that I rented the "Star Wars" trilogy last week, and
it was the first time that I had seen a couple of the films in their
entirety. In other words, I have never been much of a "Star Wars"
fan. But seeing the films, I realized that this cultural phenomenon
began because a film had finally taken the time to transport viewers
into a new, entirely different world. When watching "Star Wars", time
stops, and the viewer learns the lessons of the characters. "Star
Wars" is about the conflicts between good and evil, and how good will
always prevail eventually.
The films in the "Star Wars" trilogy were episodes 4, 5 and 6, and
they told the story of Luke Skywalker's rise to Jedi stardom. The
latest entry into the collection, "The Phantom Menace", is episode I,
and it takes place a long time before the Dark Side of the Force
transformed Anakin Skywalker into the lord of evil, Darth Vader.
A long time ago, in a galaxy far, far away...special effects were much
more developed and everything looked a lot cooler.
I'm not going to give away much plot, since everyone in the world will
no doubt see this movie. It is the tale of how two Jedi knights, a
young boy, a queen, a couple of droids and a sea monkey attempt to
save the galaxy.
Is the film any good? Well, it is definitely "Star Wars", as any fan
will be able to tell. The special effects are absolutely incredible,
but it's too bad the plot isn't. The film feels like merely an
introduction to bigger things, hopefully setting us up for a
mind-blowing Episode II. It's a lot of fun, but it lacks many of those
quiet "Star Wars moments", despite the fact that we get a glimpse at a
lot of familiar characters, such as a younger Yoda, a half-built
C-3PO, and a newer R2-D2.  A lot of characters are left
underdeveloped, and Darth Maul, the hyped villain who was supposed to
have had such a large role, is merely a secondary player. Also,
Obi-Wan Kenobi comes off as uninteresting, quiet and selfish.
Most of the performances, however, are top-notch. Liam Neeson as the
swashbuckling Qui-Gon Jinn and Natalie Portman as the Queen Amidala
are both playing their roles with typical "Star Wars" vigor. It is
Jake Lloyd, though, the young boy who plays Anakin Skywalker(Darth
Vader as a child) who grabbed my attention the most. Lloyd, who
appeared in "Jingle All The Way" and "Unhook The Stars" has a long
career ahead of him.
"The Phantom Menace" is by far the most anticipated film of all time,
and despite not being nearly as good as the other "Star Wars" films,
it is not in any way disappointing.  The cash is rolling in in large
numbers, and hopefully George Lucas will use it to craft an amazing
Episode II. Despite huge production costs, "The Phantom Menace" is
actually an independent film, since Lucas raised all the money on his
own and made the film without a major studio(Fox then stepped in to
distribute the film). "The Phantom Menace" is nothing great, but it is
another solid entry into an ongoing saga that has changed the world as
we once knew it.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film


Author
John Carroll
It could never live up to the hype. For over a decade, fans have been clamoring
for the latest installment in the Star Wars saga, and they got it.
Unfortunately, it never had a chance. 
The Phantom Menace never stood a chance. There was too much hype. However, Star
Wars fans should be pleased with the outlook of the other two prequels. If this
were just an ordinary film, I would be giving it a lower grade. However, this
is Star Wars and when you look at it from that context, it all makes sense.
To state the obvious, this film has the most up-to-date visuals in the special
effects industry and it shows. Naboo is beautiful. The Senate Chamber on
Coruscant is mind boggling. The Gungan City is ahead of its time. The visuals
have set a new watermark for the industry and the only film in the future that
looks like it can topple it is Episode 2. 
After the visuals, some aspects of the film falter. But, there still are some
bright spots. Natalie Portman gives a stubborn performance, but its fitting for
what Lucas wanted to show for Queen Amidala. All things considered, Portman
probably gave the best performance in the film. Many doubts were cast on Jake
Lloyd as Anakin Skywalker. He has a solid performance, but nothing
extraordinary. The acting problem arises with Liam Neeson and Ewan McGregor.
Both of these men have extraordinary talents, but it seems Lucas never decided
on whom should take the lead role in the film. It seems both characters never
shine bright, they only cast light rays of hope. In the end, Qui-Gon dies and
leaves McGregor with the task of leading the way in Episodes 2 and 3. 
The dialogue is a bit dry at times, but is not all that bad. My real concern
comes with Jar-Jar Binks and the Gungans. Jar-Jar, to put it simply, is the
most annoying motion picture character I have encountered. The choice to give
him a strange language is good, but if you lose your attention for one minute
when he is speaking, you will be totally lost. The Gungans were not that bad.
They play a huge role in the end of the film during the battle with the Droid
Army, but the kiddy factor comes into play. If you watch closely, you will see
the battlefield strewn with dead warriors. However, if you look at these
bodies, ninety-five percent of them belong to the droids. Then, the Gungans
retreat. It seems Lucas did not want to "upset" the children by killing off
many Gungans. Of course, no kids will realize this aspect which tailors to
children, but makes the scene totally unbelievable to the mature viewer, which
most Star Wars fans are.
The last factor to consider is that this is Star Wars. This alone makes the
film entertaining. John Williams' score for the film is once again amazing and
adds a whole new dimension to The Phantom Menace. It is a great feeling to see
Darth Maul appear on the screen and then hear "Duel of the Fates" start
blasting across the theatre. The lightsaber battles are tremendous. This is
nothing like the first battle in A New Hope with Obi-Wan and Vader practically
just standing around and hitting sabers. The lightsaber fights are well
choreographed and Ray Park and McGregor show off their agility with perfection.
All in all, The Phantom Menace turns out to be an entertaining film. Star Wars
has never been known for terrific acting or spicy dialogue. At best, it's a
little bit above average. But, it is still Star Wars and it is the first
episode of a new trilogy. With work, the trilogy will progressively get better
and we, the fans, will benefit the most.
Three Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
David Sunga
Starring: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Jake Lloyd, Ahmed Best, Natalie Portman
Synopsis:
In Phantom Menace the galaxy is divided into power groups whose interests
will inevitably collide in later sequels. There is an overarching galactic
United Nations-type organization called the Senate presided by a weak
Chancellor. Within the senate two camps are at odds: a bickering,
isolationist alliance called the Republic and their aggressive rival the
Trade Federation. Preserving law and order are a council of Jedi Knights
who are meanwhile searching for a prophesied chosen one of virgin birth.
Manipulating events behind the scenes is a dangerous, reemerging clan
called the Dark Lords of Sith, so shadowy and secretive that they comprise
a "phantom" menace.
Jedi knight Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi
(Ewan McGregor) witness an invasion of teenage Queen Amidala's home planet
Naboo and befriend a Gungan named Jar Jar (Ahmed Best). On the desert
planet of Tatooine the two Jedi, Jar Jar, and Amidala (Natalie Portman)
attend a lengthy drag race involving the young boy Anakin Skywalker (Jake
Lloyd). The five protagonists try to solicit help for freeing Naboo by
visiting the city planet of Coruscant where a lot of debate and political
maneuvering takes place. Can they free Amidala's helpless planet?
Opinion:
On TV last night I watched young, wannabe celebs pay $400 a ticket and come
running out of theaters to bask in front of news cameras, gushing with
testimonials of The Phantom Menace's greatness in exchange for a few
seconds of being on national television. Given this kind of media mania I
wondered if Phantom Menace, the most anticipated movie of 1999, could
possibly live up to the extraordinary hype that preceded it. Does Phantom
Menace match the exaggerated hype? Director George Lucas answers, "It's
only a movie." 
To me, any movie with Russian-sounding accents for bad guys, Jamaican
accents for good guys, and Middle Eastern-sounding accents for seedy
gamblers accents can be expected to be more tongue in cheek than profound.
Visually, Star Wars: Episode I --The Phantom Menace (1999) is a kid show
where parents can take their young ones to marvel at child-friendly CGI
characters and wondrous backdrops even if the character dialogue (mostly
geopolitics) is beyond the level of children. It is left to parents to
patiently explain the conversation: droid origins, family lineage, the
definitions of terms like blockade, appeasement, federation, alliance,
symbiosis, satellite-controlled robots et cetera. At least this much is
clear: there's plenty of eye candy, and in the last few minutes it's good
guys and Joe Camel lookalikes versus a caped, horned red devil character
and his mechanical hordes.
Weaknesses:
Weaknesses lie in the writing and in the performance. At first it seems
like the film is to be an invasion story, but then Phantom takes an
hour-long detour to cover one chariot race before returning to the invasion
theme. This dilutes the central story. Additionally, smaller scenes seem
written self consciously, as if they were added more to fill us in on
extraneous background information for other movies rather than form an
integral part of the present movie. Veteran actors Liam Neeson and Ewan
McGregor noticeably outperform the other acting leads. Better ensemble
chemistry between the five leads and background information that is central
to a tight story line could have made have given Phantom stronger
performances and storytelling punch.
Strengths:
On the bright side Phantom Menace as a big-budget production is far ahead
of the competition in terms of making whimsical creatures, worlds and
vehicles appear real. The film boasts sophisticated, top-of-the-line
visuals and quality exotic costumes, a musical score entertaining enough to
stand alone, and three worthwhile sequences in the second half. 
Bottom line? Seeing the film is entertaining and informative, like a visual
theme park with Star Wars filler information serving as dialogue between
impressive money shots. We are bound to be completely inundated by Star
Wars publicity, music and tie-ins for the next few months. 
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
The verdict:  my wife and two children and I liked it more than we thought 
we would.
With all of the hype surrounding the first episode of the 'Star Wars' saga, 
who would expect any mere human effort to succeed completely?  Yes, we had 
heard lots of lukewarm reviews from critics - but hey, critics are not the 
main target audience of George Lucas.  As for us, we were enthralled more 
than we were skeptical.
The premise we knew before going to view:  LucasFilm's finely-tuned 
advertising had exposed us umpteen times to the main characters and their 
quest.  At the heart is political intrigue:  the huge Trade Federation has 
blockaded the small planet Naboo, whose queen is Amidala (Natalie Portman).  
Two shady heads of the Federation have already tried to assassinate the Jedi 
knights sent as ambassadors - Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) and his master, 
the hulking Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson).  After the Jedis liberate the queen 
and her retinue, her highness appears before the galactic senate, 
complaining about the persecution of her tiny planet.  What follows is a 
series of complications typical of the other installments.  The underdog, 
equipped with cleverness and unfailing determination, faces off with the 
darker forces, equipped with superior numbers and weaponry.  The hidden card 
is a supposed legend:  the Federation lackeys report to a mysterious Sith 
lord named Darth Sidious.  We discover that the Sith are in fact real, and 
that there are only two at any one time;  Sidious' apprentice is named Darth 
Maul.
Really the plot is thin.  Lucas is obliged to incorporate countless elements 
that had their genesis in episodes four, five and six - so many that there 
is little room for plot development, aside from the knights guarding the 
queen from being coerced into signing a treaty with the despicable trade 
ministers.  Another necessary plot detail is the introduction of Anakin 
Skywalker.  He's a slave boy on Tatooine, the planet where the Jedis have 
landed to repair their ship on the long voyage to Coruscant.  The boy, 
played by Jake Lloyd, soon joins up with the venerable warriors.  His 
advantage is that the Force seems incredibly strong within him.  Qui-Gon 
(pronounced 'KWAI-GONE') recognizes this latent gift, and insists the boy 
become another apprentice.  The plot detours into various complications, but 
it turns out that this boy has talents that belie his years.
On the whole, the movie has preserved a good deal of the light-heartedness 
and camp of the earliest treatment.  True, there is not a character of Han 
Solo's ilk, nor of Chewbacca's;  but the tone is light in the right places, 
and the pace does keep the interest it needs to keep.  I had the impression 
that the plot would find better and grander settings sooner than it did.  
Hence my judgment that the first minutes could have moved faster, a la 
flicks in the 'Star Trek' series.  The wandering plot builds, however, a 
series of wonderfully rich subtexts.  We see an astonishing underwater city 
inhabited by the Gungans, the home of the computer-generated Jar Jar Binks.  
The other architectures are equally eye-catching:  Amidala's Italian 
Renaissance palaces, for instance.  It's true in this episode that the 
backgrounds - and thus the special effects - play an even greater role than 
they did in the other episodes.  Perhaps this prominence is noticeable 
because some type of CGI appears in 95% of the shots;  but perhaps it is 
because of some lapses in acting.
Jake Lloyd is cute, but some of his lines include the Beaver-like "Yippee!"  
Plus, in many scenes he looks like he's trying to act:  the absence of 
contrivance is not yet perfected.  Even worse, when Queen Amidala dons a 
disguise, dressing as the handmaid Padme, Natalie Portman delivers the most 
wooden style in the picture.  She is much better as the subdued queen.
Then there is Liam Neeson as Jedi Master Qui-Gon Jinn.  His bearing is 
always natural and stately, and he delivers his lines with the dignity and 
wisdom fitting his role.  Qui-Gon is especially effective when chiding 
Obi-Wan, his apprentice who is almost a full-fledged knight.  I'd argue that 
just as imposing a presence as Neeson is McGregor - this actor commands our 
attention in much the same ways as the originator of the role, Sir Alec 
Guiness;  McGregor seems to have the solid demeanor of a host of British 
actors - Trevor Howard, even Claude Rains.  In short, if you are reading 
this, Mr. Lucas, put more focus on the best actors that you probably already 
have in the bag for the next two films!  Ewan McGregor should be the 
cornerstone of Episode Two.  Finally, the baddest villain here is the 
physicality of Darth Maul, played by Ray Park.  His evil stare is unmatched 
by the threatening visages of any other baddie in 'Menace'.  The light saber 
fight - a three-way between Maul, Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan - is perhaps the best 
small-scale combat footage in all of 'Star Wars'!  (On the topic of combat, 
my son complained about the paucity of space dog-fights.  I personally 
missed Wedge, who appeared in Episodes 4, 5 and 6.)
As for Jar Jar Binks, he is a wonder of computer animation, but does speak 
in a quasi-Carribean accent that makes him annoyingly marble-mouthed.  He's 
an ineffectual side-kick, along as a guide as he owes a life-debt to 
Qui-Gon.  He provides occasional comic relief, especially in a large battle 
with the Federation's droids.  But, uh, Mr. Lucas, say it won't be Jar Jar 
who is the only Chewy wannabe in the next flick!
Some assorted tidbits of amusement:  we get to see the origin of CP30, the 
droid voiced by Anthony Daniels.  Typically, in his first acquaintance with 
R2D2, CP30 acts flustered over his nudity (his gold "coverings" are not yet 
installed).  "Artoo" collects his laurels of heroism by saving the queen's 
ship, and later by acting as the rear-riding sentry in a craft filched by 
the precocious Anakin.  A bigger bit of fun is the pod race, which has been 
compared to the chariot races in 'Ben Hur' (in keeping with the Biblical 
symbolism that pervades the narrative);  this race is exciting and fast.  
The vehicles themselves are plain cool, uncontrollably dangerous - two 
jet-like engines with a cockpit suspended somehow behind them, a stream of 
neon electricity coursing about.  Though it is gripping and displays 
Anakin's prowess as a pilot and thinker, the race does not play an important 
role in the plot - unlike the speeders in the forest of 'Return of the 
Jedi'.
Cartoonist Jim Borgman of the 'Cincinnati Enquirer' drew two teens emerging 
from a cinema showing 'The Phantom Menace':  "The movie was good, but I 
liked the hype better," is what one says, which leads me to believe 
overexposure can hamstring the best of entertainments.  But entertainment 
value is high with this episode, and I have to admire the PG rating.  As 
parents of a girl nearly eleven, we would have had to compromise our usual 
enforcement of the ratings.  Go to see 'The Phantom Menace' and do it in a 
theater first;  it's never the same on a home screen.


Author
DeWyNGaLe
STAR WARS EPISODE I: THE PHANTOM MENACE 
by DeWyNGaLe (John Sylva)    Rating: A+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
There is only one word in the English language that can describe my feelings
right now.  That word is "Woah!"  Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom Menace,
which is the most anticipated movie of the century, was released into theaters
this week.  Many early reviews have trashed The Phantom Menace, accusing it of
not developing characters, and stating many other negative aspects of the film.
 How could you dare trash this amazing masterpiece?  Many reviewers have
reviewed the film in comparison to the other three Star Wars films that were
released from 1977-1983, but not the actual film itself.  Well, here's a review
of the film itself, and I hope it's what you are looking for.
The Phantom Menace takes place a few decades before the events in Star Wars
Episode IV: A New Hope occurred.  In The Phantom Menace, we are introduced to
two Jedi, Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), who is a newcomer to the Star Wars
series, and Ben Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), who is depicted in Episodes IV,
V, and VI by Sir Alec Guinness.  The two Jedi are off to save the innocent
planet of Naboo from the evil forces of the Trade Federation, which is
threatening to take over the planet.  Upon their arrival at Naboo, they come
across a creature of the species "Gungan", named Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best),
who they have tag along for their adventures to serve as a guide to them.  The
two came to Naboo to hopefully rescue the 14-year old Queen Amidala (Natalie
Portman) from the planet before it is too late to save her life.  Knowing that
the Trade Federation isn't in existence on the remote planet of Tatooine (sound
familiar from Episode IV?), they take her there to hide her, and on their
journey, discover a young child named Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) who they
believe has the force strong inside of him.  Also discovered at Tatooine is a
new Sith, Darth Maul, played by Ray Park.  Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan realize that he
has Jedi training and could be a huge threat to themselves, as well as the
worried Queen Amidala.
Above is a basic plot outline of The Phantom Menace, but there are many more
details to each one of the plot, which all tie into Episodes IV, V, and VI. 
One of these major plots is the fact that Anakin Skywalker is actually a young
Darth Vader, and if you have seen Episode VI: Return of the Jedi, you know so. 
The Phantom Menace ties in with Episodes IV, V, and VI in every way.  It was
amazing how George Lucas enabled everything to fit together so nicely, making
it seem as if this film was released before the other three Episodes.
The acting in The Phantom Menace isn't what I would call the best acting in a
movie ever, but it certainly added much content to the film.  Liam Neeson and
Natalie Portman in particular stood out from the cast, making every line that
came out of their mouths believable and realistic.  Ewan McGregor, who I think
should have been used more in the film, turned out the best performance of his
career in the time that he was present on screen.  Many reviewers are also
trashing Jake Lloyd's simple but effective performance as the young Anakin
Skywalker.  Remember folks, he is supposed to be nine years old, so most likely
his acting performance will be very immature and childish.  Considering Jake
Lloyd was supposed to be playing a nine year old, he did a great job.  Ahmed
Best, who brilliantly voices the cute, realistic, and hysterical Jar Jar Binks,
was sometimes hard to understand, but added much comic relief to the film.
Although I have stated some characters were underused, I am not saying it took
away from the film at all.  The point of Episode 1 was to build a bridge to the
next two Episodes, and that it did.  Sure, I would have loved to have seen
Darth Maul for more than ten minutes, or some more of Samuel L. Jackson's
character of Mace Windu, but nothing was taken away from the overall effect of
the film.
Where do I even start about the marvelous special effects?  I guess I will just
put it plain and simple- The Phantom Menace contains the best special effects
you will ever see in a film.  The armies of battle droids, the ships flying
through the air, and the amazing podrace sequence soar above any special effect
that I have ever seen used in a film.  Those who were wondering if The Phantom
Menace would have better special effects than The Matrix have now had their
questions answered.  The special effects in the lightsaber battle scenes are
extraordinary.  The choreography during these sequences is much better and are
much more exciting than the lightsaber battles in Episodes IV, V, and VI.
The use of sound in The Phantom Menace is overwhelming.  I can certainly award
The Phantom Menace with the loudest movie I have ever seen.  Don't get me
wrong, the sound is not loud and obnoxious, and it is loud when it should be
loud, and quiet when it should be quiet.  The sound of podracers and ships
speeding through space were the most effective of the many different sound
effects in the film.
Costume design and makeup both added quite a bit to the film as well.  As you
can probably tell, Queen Amidala makes up the majority of each one of these
categories.  Her outfits are so original, creative, and fun, it is amazing. 
Others, such as the eerie Darth Maul, or Senator Palpatine (later to become the
dreaded Emperor Palpatine seen in Return of the Jedi), all of the outfits for
each and every character are stunningly original.
What George Lucas has done with The Phantom Menace is simply genius.  How many
filmmakers would be willing to do a prequel to the biggest movie saga of all
time with little known actors, sixteen years after the last one has been
released?  I can only think of one, and that would be George Lucas.  The
Phantom Menace is done with style, and I mean George Lucas style.  It follows
pretty much the same feel, despite what others say, that Episodes IV, V, and VI
followed.  Although comparing the film to others is not any part of my rating,
The Phantom Menace soars above all three of the other Star Wars films.  In
almost every way, The Phantom Menace stood out.  I would say it is most like
1983's Return of the Jedi, which used to be my favorite of the Star Wars bunch,
but has now been replaced with this brilliant piece of work, Star Wars Episode
I: The Phantom Menace.
The Bottom Line- Argue with me all you want to, but I think I just found the
best movie of all time.  

Author
James Brundage
Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace
Starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Llyod, Frank Oz,
Ray Park, and Ahmed Best
     Seeing as I've been turning in about two reviews a week for several
weeks now, there is no possible way I could have been standing in line all
this time. No, I was smart about the affair. I found the best sound systems
in the theatres outside of the city and then reserved a ticket. Opening day,
I was surprised to find that there were still seats available, but that is
another story. No, I'm not a Star Wars fanatic, and no, I didn't make
lightsaber noises when I was stick fighting as a kid, but I like the
trilogy.
     I've heard the hype by the people and I've heard the hype by the
critics. Although I am not a Star Wars fanatic, I have had my own obsession
about the movie that proves the 2nd Rule of the Critics Bible: Time,
formerly measured in years, is now measured in movies. I mean who (besides
the people CNN hand-picked to say they didn't) didn't know that May 19, 1999
was the day?
     Let's face facts, Star Wars has always been an event. It was an event
22 years ago when it came out, it is an event today when it attempts to
break $200 million in the first weekend by enforcing a very strict embargo
on passes. Star Wars was an event in box office records, always has been and
always will be. It was also always an event in special effects, which it is
now only by bulk. It was also always a story. In the case of The Phantom
Menace, however, the story is its weak point.
     People have said that the weak point of George Lucas is that he has
lost his touch directing. He hasn't. People have said that the weak point of
George Lucas is that he can no longer think little. He can't, but that's not
his mistake. His weak point in The Phantom Menace was threefold: he didn't
hire someone to help him write the script, he didn't know when to stop with
the Special Effects, and he didn't find a better coach for his actors.
     I will tell you first, before I begin my ripping of the bad, that The
Phantom Menace is by far the most fun I have had at the movies since The
Matrix, and is a fine adventure film.
     Taking the bad points down, the script for The Phantom Menace displays
the bad dialogue that adventure films are infamous for. It isn't terrible,
but its dialogue that gets on your nerves. Star Wars creates good
characters, but The Phantom Menace seems to gain a few bad ones in the need
for comic relief. A perfect example is Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best), an
annoying computer-generated creature that seems to serve no other purpose
than to annoy adults. Good characters include the young Anakin Skywalker
(Jake Lloyd), Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman), Obi Wan Kenobi (Ewan
McGregor), and Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson). Following my normal suit, I
really love the central villain of the film, the already infamous Darth Maul
(Ray Park). Yoda (Frank Oz) is the funny little guy he's always been.
Another annoying tidbit about the script is that it is completely
predictable.
     The special effects are best described in a Fruedian slip that I said
on the way out: "The sloppy effects aren't as special as I expected them to
be." The Phantom Menace represents a new era of film: one where the line
between animation and live action is irrevocably blurred. One must remember
that, in the field of special effects, blurred lines are exactly what we
loathe. The animation is impressive in the fact that they were able to
successfully incorporate as much as they did, but the special effects (which
will, despite my vehement protests, win the 2000 Award for Best Special
Effects) were highly inferior to the rather reserved and very innovative
effects used in The Matrix.
     As far as the actors go, I hated the kid. I am extraordinarily glad
that he is not, to my knowledge, signed on for the next one. If I have to
stand through one more forced "Yippee" being uttered from the little boys
lips, I will boycott Star Wars movies. Ewan McGregor, normally an excellent
actor, does a fine job of his physical acting but fails utterly in his
attempts to control his voice. He seems not to be able to decide whether he
wants a British accent, a Scottish accent, or an American accent. Natalie
Portman pulls her weight and then some, but, as I compare her performance in
1994's Leon (known in America as The Professional) and her role in 1995's
Heat, I can only think of an ironic comparison. Her transition between
character-driven stories without lavish sets and huge special effects to the
world of computer animation and eight week dress designs is one of going to
the dark side. Liam Neeson is a great Jedi Knight, and the only actor about
which I have no problem.
     To laud the film, I will say that I had a great amount of fun. The
battle scenes are a treat for the eyes, the chase scenes something to be
praised on their energy (they are high-octane while not using fossil fuels).
Lucas does an excellent job of setting up the film for his next one. Despite
what others may think, it resembles his other films only peripherally. It is
neither Star Wars, nor Empire Strikes Back, nor Return of the Jedi. Nor is
it a mixture of the three. It is, instead, a film of its own. However,
unlike the trilogy, of which each film can stand on its own, The Phantom
Menace relies on the support of the other three. They are a tripod that
surrounds the movie.
     The plot, to wrap up, is a very simple one. A planet is facing invasion
and trade embargo. Two Jedi's are sent to negotiate, which sparks a
conflict. Good and evil face of over the span of two hours, of which one
hour is used to set up parts II and III. They enlist the help of aliens for
impressive battle scenes and eventually, as always, good wins with a shadow
of evil in the wings waiting for the sequel. I still have no idea what the
title means.
     It's enjoyable. It is a landmark. It is Star Wars, and this is the year
of The Phantom Menace. If you are going to see it, my review will mean
nothing to you. If you're not, than my review does nothing either. The very
few people who are up in the air, I am giving it my blessing, albeit
somewhat reluctantly.

Author
softcell@geocities.com
I'm not sure how to review Star Wars: Episode I  The Phantom Menace.
Watching it was, for me, a little like finding an old love.  It's
fairly easy to speak intellectually about my memories, like it was to
review the original trilogy, but sitting there in a darkened theater on
opening day with the darkened lights, seeing the words `Episode 1  The
Phantom Menace' scroll up the screen, I had that kind of inner reminder
of how much I love the `Star Wars' series.
I was on the edge of my seat through nearly the entire movie, stressing
and cheering and laughing along with the characters and the plot,
exactly the way I should.
The controversial elements, Jake Lloyd's acting, Jar Jar Binks, etc.
all worked out for me.  The things Jar Jar said that seemed so
obnoxious, didn't seem so in context and Jake Lloyd's performance as
the young Anakin Skywalker was quite good, I felt.  The only major
complaint I'd offer is with the underwater sequence, which I didn't
think did much to move the story along and lacked any sort of dramatic
tension.  It merely felt like it was there to keep some `action' in the
film and to introduce the `There's always a bigger fish' philosophy,
which was something of a running theme.
The level of sophistication, which is the key issue people take with
the film is a more complicated subject.  Reducing a movie that hinges
on complex political plotting to a `kiddie' movie somehow doesn't make
sense, yet it would seem equally ridiculous to try to pretend that a
movie with Jar Jar Binks and a child prodigy military pilot is some
kind of new Manchurian Candidate.  It fits into a very strange gray
area that I think is part of what makes the `Star Wars' series such a
delight.
A lot of the information that comes in layers, but you have to be
paying attention.  The story of Queen Amidala and Padme is woven
carefully through the story, using both Lucas' storytelling and Natalie
Portman's acting, developing her as an interesting, believable and well-
rounded heroine  and ultimately among the smartest characters in the
movie.
The villainous background scheming, which being the `phantom menace' is
of more importance than the foreground dueling and droid battling, is a
delight, but still feels incomplete.  We've clearly only begun to learn
the whole story of where this goes
But all of that is to somehow neglect the ass-whuppin' Destroyer
Droids, the mighty fighting Gungans, which I think manage to more
effectively do what the Ewoks were meant to, the breathtaking views of
Coruscant, the dazzling effects, the highly engaging pod race scene,
the assorted fun characters and the best light saber duel ever.  The
action moves quickly and intensely, but that should go without saying
although I guess some are saying differently.
And then there's Qui-Gon Jinn, the Jedi played by Liam Neeson with a
level of cool just below the level with which Alec Guinness played the
old Obi-Wan Kenobi.  He is the focal character.  He leads the story to
where it's going and he is the gel that holds it together.  He has a
calm that feels very real and plays well off the younger Obi-Wan and
his attempt to accomplish that state.  Ewan McGregor's Obi-Wan is a
brilliant step of a brash young man trying to become the Obi-Wan we saw
in the later films and a promise of what he will do with the part in
the next two films.
I think that's the problem that haunts judging this film is that it's
like trying to judge a long prologue to a book.  It can seem at once
shallow and sophisticated and it will be impossible to judge properly
until 2005 when I can watch all six movies and see how all the pieces
fit together.
As for my movie-going experience in itself, loving something the way I
love this series can blur one's ability to judge properly.  Sometimes
they look and feel better than maybe they are, but this I can say for
sure.  The Phantom Menace is more fun than The Empire Strikes Back but
not quite as fun as Star Wars.  The writing is deeper and more
sophisticated than the writing for Star Wars but not so much as the
writing for The Empire Strikes Back.  The sum of that equation is that
it's definitely right in there in the middle of the best of the series,
but isn't quite as good as either of them overall.
When does the line form for Episode II?
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Author
Ross Anthony
The "Star Wars" logo bursting on the screen opened a time capsule of
memories that exploded in a spontaneous applause from all of us. We were
charged and ready to be flown out of our seats in the same way the original
"greatest story ever told" had done it nearly a quarter century ago. And to
be sure, "The Menace" has some thunder under the hood; though I hate to say
it, not enough to match the infinite expectations orbiting in our heads.
"The Phantom Menace" is Episode 1 of 9 (episodes 4 through 6 were produced
prior). So your favorite characters are either young or not born yet, hence
played by different actors. The set up for things to come is all here,
cleverly planned, but rather plainly executed. The dialogue spills out of
passionless characters with little more purpose than to explain their
plight. Where was the drama? Where was the guts?
Part of the answer lies in robotic enemies. Scores of daffy duck soldiers
hardly fill the storm trooper boots. They shoot a lot, but never seem to hit
any human targets and are as easily knocked down as green plastic army
guys -- I didn't fear them. So how could I respect a "hero" who took them
out? The only formidable enemy is Darth Maul. With a double-edged light
saber, he steals the show -- taking on both the young Obi (Ewan McGregor)
and his Jedi Master (Liam Neeson). That's the drama I want! Unfortunately,
it's not enough to carry the movie. The only other characters that display
any spirit are 1) an annoying alien camel-like creature replacement for the
nagging C3PO droid and 2) the cocky young Skywalker. The latter is charming
and provides the closest being to a character with which to sympathize.
That said, in addition to the saber duel (or should I say trio), there's an
absolutely all-out-wonderful pod (hover craft) race that makes this episode
worth catching in the theaters. Spectacular in their imaginative designs,
the pod-chariots whirl around a coliseum type race course, seemingly weaving
in and out of the theater's audience. Sparks fly, as the screaming engines
blare from left to right, back to front -- this race will engulf you.
The choice to keep the main characters reserved and poker-faced, drains the
picture of many juicy possibilities. Why can't the young Obi be drawn
romantically to the Noboo Princess, causing an internal conflict? He is the
apprentice this time, but already seems rather flawless.
Quite uninteresting in its stale moments, the "Menace" soars from time to
time. And after all, it is "Star Wars." You can't stop respecting a Jedi
Master just because he's getting slower in his older years.
Starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake LLoyd and Ian
McDiarmid.
Written and directed by George Lucas.
Produced by Rick McCallum at Lucasfilm LTD/20th Century Fox.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Jerry Saravia
Review of Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace
I can't even begin to tell you what a big Star Wars fan I used to be. The "Star
Wars" movies were terrific entertainments, full of sound and fury and
encompassing great characters, who by the end of "Return of the Jedi" became
our own best friends - we knew them as if they were family. Han Solo, Princess
Leia, Luke Skywalker and those two witty robots have become a permanent fixture
in our pop culture psyche. "Star Wars: The Phantom Menace" has to be the most
anticipated blockbuster event in the last decade or so. The prognosis: It's
thrilling but never truly involving. 
        Episode I marks the beginning of the Star Wars saga, and it is a world only
Lucas could have conceived. During the rousing title sequence following the
familiar 20th Century Fox logo, we learn that the Trade Federation wants Queen
Amidala (Natalie Portman), ruler of the planet Naboo, to sign a peace treaty.
Her refusal sparks a war between her planet, which includes the Galactic
Republic, and an Empire-of-sorts regime ruled by Darth Sidious and his
apprentice, a red-faced, anti-Jedi named Darth Maul (Ray Park). It is up to two
freelance ambassadors (!) named Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), a Jedi master, and
his apprentice, good old Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) with a ponytail, to
rescue the Queen and take her to the relatively safe planet of Tatooine. It is
there where the fate of the Jedi lies with a young, precocious boy named Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), the future Darth Vader, who has a way of repairing
machines such as pod racers, and creating droids like the unfinished C-3PO! He
also has this dream of becoming a Jedi.
        The movie unfolds with one amazing sequence after another. We see vast
landscapes of different planets and underwater cities. We watch in extreme
derision an explosive pod race, presided by good old Jabba the Hutt, where
these flying race machines make accelerated turns through rock formations and
narrow tunnels resembling Monument Valley - they are too fast for the eye to
catch. We see dozens of digitally created creatures, including wildly ferocious
sea animals, and there are the bland-looking battle droids that easily come
apart. The most distracting of the creatures is a floppy-eared, amphibious
Gungan animal named Jar-Jar Binks, who speaks with a Jamaican accent. We
witness many battle sequences, and the most electrifying is a lightsaber duel
between Darth Maul and the two Jedis that is pulse-pounding and superbly staged
and edited. 
        George Lucas certainly went out of his way to create a world unlike anything
we have ever seen before, even as far as the previous "Star Wars" films. This
time, however, he has invested less interest in the human characters. Lucas may
have never been a great storyteller but he always paid great attention to
character details and subtleties. The most profound and memorable character is
the Jedi Master Qui-Gon, nicely underplayed by Liam Neeson, who resorts to
having too much faith in the young Anakin - he wants to train him despite the
Jedi Council's objections. MacGregor's Obi-Wan mostly nods and obeys his
master, but he may be a more prominent character in Episode II since he
reluctantly becomes Anakin's trainer in the Jedi arts. Portman's Queen Amidala
is to be the future mother to Luke and Leia, yet here she seems cold and
distant - very uncharacteristic of her future daughter's stubbornness or sex
appeal. And there are fleeting cameos by Samuel L. Jackson as Jedi council
member, Mace Windu; Ian McDiamid as Senator Palpatine, the future evil Emperor;
Terence Stamp as a Supreme Chancellor; and the exquisitely restrained Pernilla
August (from "The Best Intentions") as Anakin's mother, a slave to some
floating bug named Watto. These characters are so noble and fascinating that
you wish Lucas gave them more screen time, and less to all the sluggish,
superficial exposition given to the Trade Federation and their plans. And I
would have loved to seen more of the nefarious Darth Maul - one of the best,
most enigmatic villains since Boba Fett. 
        "The Phantom Menace" is still one helluva show and definitely a treat for all
Star Wars fans, including myself. I loved the experience of watching it, and it
was great to see brief appearances by C-3PO and R2-D2 again, not to mention the
great Yoda and the hysterical cameo by Jabba the Hutt. But the movie does not
have the freshness, sense of wonder or magic that the other films had - some of
it is too plodding and superfluous. You'll come away wanting more (and wish
there was less of Jar-Jar Binks). Perhaps that is what Lucas had in mind all
along.
You can find more reviews at JERRY AT THE MOVIES located at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Susan Granger's review of "STAR WARS: EPISODE I, THE PHANTOM MENACE"
(20th Century-Fox)
  The Force is definitely with George Lucas in this first of
three "Star Wars" prequels which attempt to awaken a mythic, sci-fi
kind of spirituality as they chronicle the life and times of young
Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) who eventually becomes Darth Vader. For
those of you to whom this cultural icon is unfamiliar, rent videos of
the original "Star Wars," followed by "The Empire Strikes Back" and
"Return of the Jedi." It also wouldn't hurt to read Joseph Campbell's
musings on heroes and "The Uses of Enchantment" by Bruno Bettleheim,
which analyzes how myths affect young people. "The Phantom Menace"
tells how two stolid Jedi knights, Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and
Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), meet nine year-old Anakin and join the
Gungan, a scrappy race of amphibioid creatures, to save Naboo, the
planet ruled by gutsy Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman). She is destined
to marry Anakin and give birth to Luke Skywalker and Princess Leia,
but that comes later in Episode II in 2002 and III in 2005. Right now,
the excitement lies in the action, particularly a heart-thumping "pod
race," reminiscent of the chariot race in "Ben-Hur." Sure, there are
flaws: die-hard fans may chafe at the recycled Good vs. Evil plotline
and the chatter of one creature, Jar-Jar Binks, is almost
unintelligible. Nevertheless, on the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10,
"Episode I, The Phantom Menace" comes at you with a thrilling,
meteoric 10.  Not only is it a fanciful phenomenon but it's also the
most eye-popping spectacular special-effects picture ever made as
George Lucas integrates the fantasy of computer imagery with
reality. The only question is: Will it beat the all-time box-office
champ "Titanic"?

Author
Alex Ioshpe
After 20 years of hope and pleading, George Lucas finely directs a prequel
in the Star Wars-saga. Visually mesmerizing it is also extremely flawed as
it displays the magnificence of modern special effects and the simplicity of
modern storytelling.
As imminent conflict brews between the powerful Trade Federation and the
peaceful planet of Naboo, Jedi Master Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his
apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) travel to Naboo to warn the Queen
(Natalie Portman) of the galactic fallout which is to follow. Eventually,
Naboo is invaded forcing the Jedis to evacuate the planet with the Queen and
her court. They travel to the desert planet of Tatooine where they meet a
slave boy called Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd (I) ) who is evidently one
with the Force. They enlist his help in fighting the war, while the Jedis
confront one of the Dark Jedis behind the invasion, Darth Maul, while his
master Darth Sidious (who by the way is the corrupted, but respectable
senator of Naboo) continues to lead the invasion as a mysterious "phantom"
behind the scenes.
Because of the high expectations the film may be a disappointment to the
die-hard-Star-Wars-fans.
The major difference between "Episode 1" and "Episode IV" is that the first
film had a fresh plot and was as original as entertaining. This plot was
supported by special effects. In "Episode 1" it is vice versa. Here the
special effects are supported by a story. At times the film looks more like
a demonstration of visual effects (as the unnecessary pod-race).
Besides the thin story there were other things that troubled me. One of
those things is acting. Lucas has assembled a solid cast, including Liam
Neeson (Qui-Gon Jin) , Ewan McGregor (Obi-Wan Kenobi) and Natalie Portman as
Queen Amidala. It is only Neeson  and Portman that give above average
performances. At the same time, acting is something you can't demand of
"Episode 1", because of the computer graphics. Actors are mostly talking to
themselves at the set, and the script is likewise nothing to boast of.
Another thing is that there are almost none comic relieves in "Episode 1".
In the previous Star Wars-episodes you had the energetic Harrison Ford ,
whose witty and humorous commentaries are very missed. You also had Yoda,
R2-D2, C3PO in many episodic scenes. In "Episode 1" you have only Jar Jar; a
charecter that is meant to be funny, but isn't. The rest of the characters
mentioned above, are present, but absolutely not developed as the time is
instead granted on beautiful visual effects.
But there are not only negative things that I have to say about "Episode 1".
Lucas' extraordinary taste and visual imagination transports us from the
Royal Palace of Naboo to the glittering underwater city  and then to
Coruscant, the political heart of the Republic and the headquarters of both
the Galactic Senate and the Jedi Council. Visually the film is above
stunning. It's a feast. The revolutionary visual- and sound effects are
certainly the greatest ever. Equally magnificent are Trisha Biggar's costume
design, Gavin Bocquet's production design and makeup by Paul Engelen and
Mark Coulier .
As far as common adventure and science fiction films go, "Episode 1" is one
of the best. But as the controversial prequel to the classic cult-film, it
is a bit disappointing, because of its simplicity.
Lucas has probably figured out that everyone saw his previous Star Wars
episodes. He has certainly flattered himself. The evolution of Anakin
Skywalker from an innocent boy to the servant of darkness is completely
unknown to the new audience. Yoda, R2-D2 and C3PO are total strangers. If he
has chosen to direct a film mostly to please the old fans of Star Wars, he
has taken the subject very lightly.
After creating a revolutionary film that received a cult status all around
the world, George Lucas has a lot to live up to. And if he has chosen to
continue, he can't just serve emptiness on a beautiful plate and expect the
audiences to throw themselves over it.
Offcourse everything depends on the point of view of every individual. If
you have never seen the previous Star Wars-films, you will probably think
that "Episode 1" is marvelous. If you have, you will probably share my
opinion. The best thing you can do is not expect too much.
See this film simply to experience the unbelievable special effects and try
to relive the magic of the first film as it came out more than 20 years ago.
Review by Alex Ioshpe ">ioshpe@online.no>
Story summary by Matthew McQuillan {mjment@hotmail.com}

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
Let me start by stating the obvious.  "Star Wars, Episode 1: The
Phantom Menace" is wonderful to look at.  Every scene is littered with
activity: ships flitting across the horizon, people and creatures
scurrying from hither to thither.  One of the major characters, the
splendidly-goofy-bordering-on-annoying Jar Jar Binks, is entirely a
creation of computer graphics, and we're never less than convinced that
he's there in front of us at all times.  This is one of the hallmarks
of the "Star Wars" universe: things that would be the centerpiece of
another movie will simply insert themselves casually into the frame.
The movie is exploding with sights and sounds.
And that's the problem. Here is a film that was created with the most
magnificent of panoramas, and one of the most flimsy of screenplays.
It's full, but not fulfilling.  It does everything... except tell a
story that engages us emotionally.  Friends of mine have said that the
movie improves on repeat viewings -- but shouldn't a movie like this
just work the first time around, period?
Twenty years, it seems, have made all the difference, in both us and
George Lucas.  "Star Wars" exploded out of nowhere and changed the
level of expectations for moviegoers everywhere, permanently. "The
Phantom Menace" is evolutionary, not revolutionary, and for that reason
is not as remarkable a movie. But it's also hampered by a muddled, one-
dimensional drama and a gallery of characters who engage everything
except our sympathies.  "Star Wars" was about adventure; this movie is
about people talking at each other and occasionally fighting. No one is
REALLY put to the test. The movie is worse than soulless -- it is
gutless.
In the abstract, there's plenty of story to work with: a brutal
blockade of a planet that could turn into a full-out war; light-saber
duels; closed-chamber politicking; a forbidden attraction between a
queen and a young slave; a father-and-son apprenticeship; a deadly and
mysterious assassin with vicious weapons. But somehow, Lucas and his
team of compatriots haven't spun these elements together in a
compelling fashion.  The film drags.  There are far too many scenes of
people explaining everything to each other, again and again; there are
endless moments where we HEAR about what's going on instead of SEEING
it, or its consequences.  For a "kid's movie", as Lucas has billed it,
it's distressingly complex, static and talky.  There is no one person
we are carried through the whole of the story with -- and no suspense.
Nothing ever really seems to be at stake; it all just seems to be a
rather large inconvenience.
Some examples. Part of the movie's major lack of empathy is found with
Natalie Portman's character, Queen Padme. Her planet is being blockaded
by the Trade Federation, and she has to go undercover (in a sense) to
save her planet. Lucas goes to great effort to present her to us as a
queen, but all of her sympathy for her people is verbal, not tangible.
We admire her, but we don't care about her. (PLOT SPOILER!) There's
some tedious bait-and-switchery with one of her handmaidens that's less
fun than it should be -- probably because we're not privy to it until
it's too late to delight in the subversion.
Then there are our two Jedi, who feel obligatory without feeling
neccesary. Ewan McGregor is excellent as the young Obi-Wan Kenobi; he
inhabits the part with great grace and unforced style. He is fun to
watch. Liam Neeson, as Qui-Gon Jinn, however, seems vaguely bored and
dissatisfied with the whole thing; his expression always seems to be
saying, "As soon as I can get out of here and have me a Guinness..."
I also mentioned Jar-Jar Binks, who is so convincing as a digital
creation that it only makes him all the more insufferable. He is a
comic relief whose lifespan was extended far beyond any reasonable
amount. And then there is Jake Lloyd, as the young Anakin Skywalker. He
is possibly one of the few totally unproblematic things in the movie --
he is simply nine years old, nothing more than that, and we accept that
on face value.  The problem is the movie often exploits that for
developments that aren't even internally consistent -- such as when he
strikes a blow for the heroes by accident... again and again.
Another problem is that watching all these characters deal with each
other is a chore. Lucas has written his own script, and the dialogue is
cheesy without ever being enjoyably so. It doesn't have the fun and
frolic of a high-camp adventure. Instead, it's just pained and forced.
There's none of that kidding by-play we all loved. When Leia
said, "Will someone get this big walking carpet out of my way?" we all
laughed. Nothing is that spontaneous and unforced here.
The high points, of course, are when the movie's set-pieces kick in.
Here is the only time "The Phantom Menace" actually feels like a "Star
Wars" movie.  The action centerpiece of the movie is a high-tech race
sequence that borrows freely from "Ben Hur", "Bullitt", and even the
speeder chase from "Return of the Jedi"; apparently Lucas's creative
exhaustion has extended to the point of autocannibalization.  Yes, the
chase is exhilarating and excellently done -- but because it's not
hooked into anything we really care about, it's disposable.  It's just
another random something to look at.
My criticism of "The Phantom Menace" is not with its surfaces, but with
its core. The original "Star Wars" movies possessed a kind of cultural
telepathy, a power to tap directly into a silent sense of wonder and
possibilities.  Yes, it WAS possible for a farm boy from Tatooine to
become a Jedi knight (and have Darth Vader for a father), and for a
band of rebels to strike a blow for freedom against the all-powerful
Empire.  Goofy and hokey as it was, we bought it.
The new trilogy, judging from its opening chapter, is full of images,
but somehow none of the wonder and the narrative gravity.  In place of
wonder, we have comings and goings, explanations and justifications,
and never a quiet moment when we are allowed to have it all sink in. In
place of narrative, we have picaresqueness without impact. We go a lot
of places, but we never really get out of the bus.
Roger Ebert reported in his own review of the movie: "We are standing
at the threshold of a new age of epic cinema, I think, in which digital
techniques mean that budgets will no longer limit the scope of scenes;
filmmakers will be able to show us just about anything they can
imagine."  True.  But digital filmmaking technology is like the movie
camera itself.  Point it at something and all of its attributes are
magnified, good and bad.  "The Phantom Menace"'s visual splendor
explodes tenfold when given a CGI treatment, but so does the thinness
of its underlying story.
Epic movies like "Lawrence of Arabia" were full of intriguing people
and conflicts; "The Phantom Menace" is little more than a glossy tour
booklet, all setup and no payoff.  Presumably, that's by design, but
the original "Star Wars" movies also worked magnificently as
standalones. I re-watched them before seeing "The Phantom Menace" and
felt like I was revisiting old friends at a party. "The Phantom Menace"
plays more like a noisy Shriner's convention where nobody really wants
to talk to anyone else.
One more thing. There is a single moment in the original "Star Wars"
where Luke Skywalker stands outside his house and watches a dual
sunset.  The suns bathe Luke's face in red; the music swells; we feel
his need to escape.  It's an elementally simple moment, unadorned and
moving, and it works.  "The Phantom Menace", too perpetually busy to be
really interesting, never lets itself have a moment like that.
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---
